


The terrifying monsters lost their head that was their only weak point. It was done so easily as though the berserkers were toy that had interchangeable head. *dou-* They fell down while raising such noise.



The lord stood up quietly. Of course he didn’t forget to sharply push up his sunglasses with one hand while making cool pose of half his body to the back. Seeing the lord like that, the berserkers growled while throwing their killing intent.



The lord took it stride while going「fuh」before he introduced himself.



「A battle is killing each other with strength and will. You all who are lacking will, you won’t be able to stop this abyss. Now, let’s pull down the curtain. ――Kousuke E Abyssgate, has arrived!!」



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I caught a cold……



When I went to buy cold medicine, my bicycle’s wheel punctured……



When I was ironing my suits, I noticed that a part was torn……



It couldn’t be helped, so I drunk the cold medicine and Nico Douga.



John Wick’s Udonge is super cute……



Shootout Dream and Battle of Koumakan are lovely.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 216




The bodies of the berserkers who were surrounding from four directions were slowly collapsing like a blooming flower.



The figure that appeared from behind the tough meat wall that lost their head, was the lord whose body was wrapped in black outfit and two jet black short swords held in reverse grip. The one-lens type sunglasses was reflecting light even under the cloudy sky, it glittered with a sparkle. Surely it was an optional feature.



GAAAAAAAAAAH!!!



It was a dissonant sound of many overlapping roars. The roars of berserkers shook the air.



Lord Abyssgate who was cool at any time with his body kneeling on one knee and his short swords readied to the front and back, he wasn’t perturbed by that shriek that stimulated human fear. He stood up silently while putting away one short sword to the back.



And then, he took a half-body stance toward the berserkers who were tightening their encirclement and thrust one hand forward, his palm was facing up――*kui kui* he moved his fingertip. It was as though he was telling them ‘come at me’.



「Let me tell you, this lord isn’t so soft that the like of mindless beasts can possibly win.」



It was as though that whisper become the signal, the berserkers roared and began charging from three directions. The vibration of their steps made it felt like the ground was shaking. Normal people would surely lose strength from their waist and felt their groin going cold from feeling that pressure. Just like Emily-chan the other day. Just like Emily-chan!



In contrast the lord――vanished.



It happened in an instant. The berserkers that came from three directions were blown away all at once. They went back the path they advanced through with a fierce momentum as though they just got hit by a dump truck. Naturally the berserkers approaching from behind also got grandly dragged into it.



At the spot where the berserkers were just at, there was the lord in an unmoving pose――three of them.



「Abyss-style Assassination Martial Art – Phantom Attack Form――”Roukyouka”」(TN: Haze Frenzy Flower)



It seemed the lord was pleased with the naming of Abyss-style. He looked pleased that he could unveil the numerous naming (centered on existing techniques, especially the martial art moves that weren’t named before this) he had thought up through the whole night last night. The smile on his mouth indicated that.



By the way, what he did was only making clone bodies and simultaneously blew away the enemies that were coming from three directions using palm heel. The ability of the lord’s lovely fingerless glove produced unrealistic power that could make huge body in the middle of charging forward to double back. Of course, the lord properly transmitted the impact to the brain, so he didn’t fail at dealing the fatal blow.



「aAAAAAAAAA-!!」



Three berserkers swung down their stout arms like a hammer from behind the three lords. The next moment, the clones easily vanished along with a comical sound. The attack from two berserkers ended up striking the ground in vain.



And then, the true body of the lord――



The enlarged fist the berserker was attacking with was already larger than the lord’s head. That fist hid the figure of the lord and without stopping it squashed toward the ground without compromise.



That was how it looked, but there wasn’t any remain of the lord in the small crater. The lord that was supposed to be the real body shouldn’t be vanishing like a phantom. The berserker who lost his target moved his bloodshot eyes everywhere in search of the target.



「If you lost your reasoning power, then at least sense using instinct.」



「-」



A voice came. From below the berserker.



The berserker looked down on his own feet in shock. His figure that was peering into his own feet with his body leaning forward looked as though he was bowing. He looked really comical acting like that with his large build and the mad atmosphere he was giving off.



A short sword that stretched out from the ground attacked the berserker that was peering at his own feet. The short sword flew out as though it was growing out from the ground, it then pierced the eye of the berserker, destroyed his brain, split the skull and flew out from the back of his head.



Light left the eyes of the berserker that received a lethal attack, his body tilted unsteadily, and at the same time the other hand that was reaching out similarly like the short sword grasped at the berserker’s hair and pulled into the ground.



Using that recoil, the lord flew out beside the berserker that was buried into the ground as though its upper body was prostrating. Of course, the lord flew out in a pose of a wild eagle!



「GAAAAAAAH」



The approaching berserker leaped at the lord midair. Using their charging momentum, they threw their body to the air like a cannon ball to shoot down the lord.



「How unfortunate. That’s an illusion.」



The body of the berserker passed through the lord’s body without hindrance. The one jumping was the clone body of the lord that didn’t have substance.



Then, where was the real body?



Of course, the lord was normally right beside you with his painfully thin presence. Even now he was closely nestling beside the berserker-san. However,



「Be embraced by the dark hell fire――”Katon – Enryuuga(Annihilating all creation – The abyss’s world-destroying conflagration)”」(TN: Fire Escape – Flame Dragon Fang)



*von* A unique sound resounded. The true shape of that sound was at the body of the lord that was dancing midair beside the berserker, the flaming short sword that was in the lord’s hand without anyone noticing――it was the sound of “Heaven Destroying Sword of Lightning Flame” cutting through the wind.



―― Katon – Enryuuga(Annihilating all creation – The abyss’s world-destroying conflagration)



The highest class of fire element magic “Azure Sky”――that magic in a compressed state was enveloping the short sword. The sword that was clad in super hot blue fire cut and melted the target. It made unique sound *von* when it was swung. Because it was a sword that was filled with magic power, it could repel magic attack.



Yes, it was a peerless sword that melted and cut every obstacle while leaving a beautiful trail of light behind in midair――so to speak, it was a lig○ saber!



When this ability was first unveiled, it went without saying how the creator and the lord wordlessly exchanged high-five. And then, unable to contain themselves, the two did make-believe of a certain knight. It was a little bit of black history for the two of them how they received a lukewarm gaze from the two rabbit-ears witnessing their act.



The berserker whose neck was melted and cut by the light sword rolled on the ground right after. Berserkers were attacking the landing lord one after another.



「It’s hard to move with that large body right? I’ll make it lighter for you――”Demolish Yoke”」



The lord made a sonorous finger snap. Right after that, the surrounding berserkers were blown away to the sky.



――Gravity magic Demolish Yoke



The magic that Miledy Raisen once used at the legendary decisive battle, a magic that forcefully liberated the target from the wedge of gravity. The berserkers who lost the shackle of gravity were thrown to the air helplessly due to a reason that couldn’t be resolved using physical strength.



And then, if someone looked at far above the sky, there were two lords standing back to back in bilateral symmetry, as though looking at the mirror reflection. They both were taking stance of half their body shifted to the back, each of them were holding kunais between their five fingers and displayed a throwing stance.



「「Thy art judged by the dark god――”Juuton – Saika no Seitsui(Inescapable Judgment of Abyss)”」」(TN: Gravity Escape – Star Fall of Calamity Judgment)



What was launched was a downpour of kunai that multiplied weight until the territory of several tons.



The dozens of berserkers became helpless due to the restriction that was zero gravity in midair. The only thing that they could do was only using their hand instinctually to cover their head. Even so, perhaps they could possibly defend using those thick arms that looked like a log.



Although, in the first place, Juuton – Saika no Seitsui(Inescapable Judgment of Abyss) wasn’t a technique for piercing the target. This was an attack that was labeled as judgment. And then, from time to time judgment was carried on by reaping the head.



The result,



「At least, have a peaceful life at the next world.」



At the surrounding at the lord on the ground, a sudden squall poured on the berserkers, where their head was separated from their torso like a joke.



The cause was one thing. The rain of kunai was something to reap the head from the beginning. The super heavy kunais falling to the ground had super-fine steel string tied to each other. Yes, so to speak, the steel string was like a guillotine falling down from the sky.



White smokes were raising from here and there. The ability of Berserk was trying to keep the berserkers alive by repeating super-regeneration, but there was no way it could regenerate the whole body from the head, and it was also impossible to regenerate the brain from the torso. Before long the bodies reached their limit and withered as though in resignation.



The rising white smokes looked like the soul of the people that were liberated from Berserk transformation.



The lord standing in the middle of those white smokes shifted his sunglasses slightly and offered a silent prayer to the white smokes, and then his eyes narrowed quietly toward the remaining berserkers.



Around him were kunais that were connected with steel string floating. *step* The two clones landed down at both sides of the lord. The lord swung the short sword clad in azure flame while making *von* sound, and then the clones were also swinging a similar sword of azure flame.



「Now then, let’s end this quickly. ……This futile fighting.」



The lord muttered, at the same time his presence got thinner drastically. Even though he was right in front of them, the berserkers’ gaze looked around in puzzlement.



Right after that, the lord rushed out.



Five minutes.



「……Impossible. What the hell is that……just what in the world is happening……」



A man’s voice that sounded shaken was resounding in a dim monitor room located in a corner of the research facility. What that person clad in a lab coat looking like a researcher was looking fixedly at with intense concentration, was the image from the security camera that was facing toward the heliport.



It had been anticipated that someday the security bureau or the army would come to assault this place, therefore, the distant place that could be landed by helicopter and the path that could be passed through by car were all monitored. Therefore, when a communication came from the lumbering site, the people here only thought「Aa, they are coming here really early huh」.



As long as they had groups of berserker, they didn’t need to fear most armed group. It wasn’t like they needed to hold the place and carried out do-or-die resistance. The berserker group was simply for buying time. While the attacker was spending their time dealing with the monsters, they would carry the research data and escaped using the prepared method. After that they would continue research at another research facility.



If they kept repeating that later, they wouldn’t be able to be captured that easily. That was what they were thinking.



Yet despite so,



「Impossible. This is impossible-. Just what is that brat-. This is ridiculous! It’s like a poorly made American comic-. Who can accept that such thing exist in reality-」



「……Ingram.」



Beside the man, an armed man with an air that seemed used to battle punched down on the desk loudly while shouting.



The armed man――his name was Weiss Ingram. He was a guard that Kaysis put in charge of the security for this research facility. Narcotic smuggling, human trafficking, inducing war, arms trade, and so on, he was a leader of a mercenary group that would do anything as long as it produced him money.



Weiss had a large scar running from his cheek until his right ear. His face was distorting as though that scar was twitching while he gave some kind of instruction to his subordinate through wireless device. And then, his gaze turned toward the man in lab coat.



「Oi, what the hell are you doing staring idly like that. Finish your preparation to skedaddle right away. I don’t wanna die fighting that kind of incomprehensible American comic bastard here. We are going to use all the remaining berserkers and “that” to buy time. We are going to leave this place in five minutes.」



「A, aa, got it. No, wait a second. You are going to use “that” too?」



「Aa? Isn’t that obvious? We cannot bring that kind of thing with us anyway. We only need the data of the result of the experiment, there won’t be any problem releasing that to send it to those guys.」



「That’s……certainly, you are right. Got it, I’ll prepare――」



The man in lab coat was nodding while he was going to say「I’ll prepare right away」, but his words stopped in the middle. Weiss turned dubious and his gaze moved to the man, where he saw the man in lab coat had his gaze fixed on the monitor.



In the monitor was reflected the picture of the helicopter landing on the heliport that had been safely secured, the troops of the security bureau’s special force quickly getting down from the helicopter, and then a girl with blonde hair tied into a side-tail getting down with the help from the man who annihilated the berserker group using supernatural skill.



The man in lab coat opened his eyes wide while muttering「Why, in this place……」. Weiss got irritated seeing the man in lab coat acting like that and called「Oi-」with a rough voice. The man in lab coat seemed to come to his senses from that, with ‘hah’ he took off his gaze from the monitor and shook his head once before saying「I’ll prepare myself」while exiting the room.



Weiss’s gaze returned to the monitor and he narrowed his eyes, staring at the girl who for some reason seemed to embrace the young man, or rather she somehow looked like she was clinging on the young man.



「A girl in the battlefield, huh. Well, she is wearing lab coat, might means that she is someone like that.」



The research facility had white outer wall. The Alpha squad was lining up along that wall with orderly formation. Bernard who was in the lead had his gaze fixed at the door that his subordinate was trying to break.



The other squads, Beta squad and Gamma squad were trying to infiltrate from other entrances. Each of those squads was accompanied by a clone of Kousuke.



Kousuke was vigilantly sensing his surrounding at the back of that formation while being aware of Emily who kept glancing at him with a complicated look.



「……Emily. I’m really not bothered, so Emily too don’t get bothered by it. Rather than that, focus your mind for now. Even though we are protecting you, that doesn’t mean it’s okay for you to not be careful okay?」



「Ye, yes. I’m sorry Kousuke.」



Actually, Emily was thinking that because she almost called Kousuke as Abyssgate just before he was about to jump from the helicopter, Kousuke accidentally fell down from the helicopter. Because of that she was a little down thinking that she had held the other back right away from the beginning.



Emily apologized right away when she got down from the helicopter, but Kousuke who had offhand knowledge that it was the easiest to get aimed at the moment when a helicopter was taking off or landing down was being busy acting vigilant at the surrounding, so he only replied「Aa, yeah, it’s fine」that sounded really curt.



Of course, he was also really didn’t mind, so his words sounded light coupled with that factor too, but from Emily’s viewpoint she felt that Kousuke’s words had different nuance. So to speak, for her it sounded like「Emily is the same with the other guys huh? Well, it doesn’t really matter though」.



As the result, Emily leaped at Kousuke. Kousuke was startled and he drew back, but Emily kept clinging at him while yelling things like「You are misunderstanding Kousuke! The bad one is the idiot troops of the security bureau! I just got unconsciously carried away by them, I actually wanted to call your name properly! Please, believe me Kousuke!」



In a site of a battle where a curbstomp play had just been performed, in a situation where they were surrounded by the special force troops around them, furthermore in a time where they were going to march into the enemy base after this, Emily-chan clung while imploring「Don’t hate me!」unashamedly. It seemed that her nerve had unexpectedly become thick and sturdy through the case this time.



「Oi, Aby. We are going to charge in. Keep your flirting with your girlfriend for later.」



Bernard warned with an exasperated voice seeing the love comedy of the two that was completely lacking in tension (seen from the side) just before they broke in.



「Oi, captain-san. The way you call me get even friendlier huh. If you want to get along with me that much, it’s fine to call me Kousuke you know?」



「Is that so? Then you can also call me with my name you know, Aby.」



「……I absolutely not going to.」



The ignoring phenomenon occurred really naturally. It wasn’t like it was caused because of sarcasm, ill will, or teasing. Bernard was calling Kousuke as Aby with so much naturalness like a leaf that would fly if it was blown by the wind.



Beside Kousuke who was making a sour look, Emily who was called as “girlfriend” had red cheeks while her mouth was smiling broadly, she was also throwing a gaze that was mixed with slight jealousy to Bernard who called Kousuke with pet name Aby, even though it was Kousuke’s alias. She was busy with various things.



「……How envious. How jealous. Flirting with a cute girl in this kind of situation……damn Abyssgate.」



「Who do you think you are addressing without any honorific just now? I’m going to get rid of you while dressing it up as accident you know?」



Allen had a handkerchief that he took out from somewhere and bit on it while going ‘mukii!’. It seemed that he was considerably broken. In respond to such Allen, Vanessa was giving a warning with a voice that didn’t sound like a joke……as for her, surely she was already at a point of no return.



The troops including the captain who were emitting nervousness from preparing themselves with the possibility that they themselves might get infected with Berserk exchanged gaze at each other with wry smile seeing the exchanges of Kousuke and co.



「Captain, we can proceed.」



Bernard received the report from the troop that succeeded in unlocking the door and he used his radio. Both Beta squad and Gamma squad also returned affirmative signal for their breaking-in preparation.



Bernard started counting. Inside the tightly tensed atmosphere, the count――turned into zero.



「GO-!」



The troops were invading into the facility with fluentness like a flowing water from Bernard’s signal.



Emily was desperately following at the middle of the troops while being surrounded from three directions by Kousuke, Vanessa, and also Allen.



The safety confirmation「Clear」reported back through the radio from each squad.



The corridor was dim. It seemed that the place was only installed with fluorescence lamp for emergency use. The existence of Kousuke and co was known from the battle at the helicopter. Therefore the facility personnel must had already turned off the facility’s function and starting to escape.



The squad’s objective ranged from capturing to erasing the essential personnel that were important even among the staffs of this facility. And then, their most important duty was to not let the water supply got polluted by Berserk no matter what happened. There wouldn’t be any advantage for the enemy to spill the current version of Berserk, but the possibility of what these cornered people might do……it couldn’t be viewed optimistically.



Therefore, now that they had been detected, they had to suppress the whole facility swiftly. The troops were confirming their current position with a device in hand while advancing without hesitation inside the ominous facility without any human presence.



They could see the end of the corridor ahead. It seemed that the path became T-junction there.



It was at that time,



「Enemy-. At the front, they’re armed!」



「Spread out!」



Kousuke’s yell reverberated. Bernard gave instruction swiftly in a flash. The troops parted to left and right in a second and took cover behind pillar or room entrance. Kousuke also hugged Emily and dived behind a pillar.



Almost at the same time with that, *dadadadadada-* Consecutive gunshots were reverberating. Muzzle flashes blinked at the corridor ahead, at the next moment impacts ran on the wall and pillar where Kousuke and others were hiding and smashed up the surface.



It seemed that it was an ambush by human.



The reaction of the troops was also swift. They aimed toward the spot where muzzle flash was visible and began firing with polished accuracy.



「We cannot waste time in this kind of place! Jazz-, grenade!」



「Yes sir―!」



The troop called Jazz pointed the grenade launcher attached under his rifle muzzle and fired deep into the corridor. Right after that, heat wave blew through along with a fierce roaring sound.



「Go-, Go-, Go-!!」



Bernard’s command resounded while the wave of the explosion hadn’t ended yet. The troops were firing simultaneously while rushing deeper into the corridor. Their gun point was directed ahead at where the corridor was divided to left and right. In a moment they could see the figure of a man running away toward the corridor turn.



The following troops saw men collapsing on the ground, perhaps they were late to escape from the grenade explosion and crouched down. The men were groaning in pain, but right after that, they started to convulse. At that moment,



*tan-tan-tan-*



Gunshots echoed. The troops drilled the head of the men without hesitation.



「Clear」



「Clear」



The troops reported the confirmation of safety with calm voice. And then, as though nothing happened, the troops advanced forward once more with flowing movement toward the direction where they saw men escaping just before.



(……As expected, the real deal special force is amazing huh.)



Kousuke reflexively sent praise with a small voice. Vanessa beside him showed her affirmation with an expression that looked slightly proud.



(Naturally. They aren’t anything overwhelming like Kousuke-san, but the assault special force of security bureau is unmistakably elites. As long as their opponent isn’t a mass of absurdity, they wouldn’t fall behind that easily.)



As though to proof those words of Vanessa, the Alpha squad led by Bernard was exterminating the armed group lurking everywhere inside the facility to buy time, as though they were facing children. The squad kept advancing without stopping.



It seemed that the other squads were also the same from the report coming through the radio. There wasn’t also any report of someone injured. Kousuke who was sharing information through his clone bodies also understood how his clone bodies didn’t really need to do anything, so he once again felt for real the strength of the special force.



While they were advancing like that, Kousuke and co arrived into a spacious room. According to Kaysis’s data that they had downloaded before, this room should be the main research room.



As though to show that, there were several machineries that seemed for research use, incomprehensible items left around on a desk, and several personal computers here and there.



「Captain-san.」



「Aa, I know.」



Kousuke called with a small voice, to which Bernard nodded. He already finished giving out hand signs and the troops also aimed their gun to cover all blind spots.



「Yoo yoo, ain’t this the great elites of security bureau. Just what are you doing, standing around silently in this kind of place?」



The one who was saying such thing with joking mood was a frivolous man with a large scar on his cheek as his peculiarity, Weiss. Perhaps as the expression of his composure, he didn’t even touch the light machine gun hanging on his shoulder by a strap. Both his hands were raised up as though to show his surrender.



「……Weiss Ingram. I never thought that you are in this kind of place.」



Allen sighed with his gun pointed. When Vanessa asked with her gaze「Who?」, Allen said that he was an inhuman mercenary who some time ago was failed to be caught by Agent L from JD Agency and then went missing after that.



Hearing that, Bernard’s motivation to leave the man alive turned zero, and then was about to give erasure order in a snap.



「O, oi oi, wait a second. If you kill me, something disastrous will――」



「Fire-!」



Weiss was about to say something, but Bernard was merciless. He signaled the men to fire without compromise. Weiss jumped to the side without delay and countless bullets passed through the spot where he was just at a few moments ago.



Weiss hid behind a desk while cursing「This is why I hate the spoiled elites-」and sent instruction through his radio. The subordinates of Weiss who were hiding everywhere inside the room pulled their trigger toward the troops right away.



The troops immediately scattered to position where they could cover each other and began firing back to every directions. Kousuke was also starting his half Abyssgate transformation in the little chance some stray bullet would go to Emily while suppressing the enemy force.



「Shit-. That Kaysis bastard. The pay is not worth it at all for something like this! Oi-, old man! Not yet!? We cannot hold on any longer here!」



「――」



Weiss threw an angry yell while firing back with his light machine gun. Right after that, a man was crawling out on all fours from the shadow of a desk located deeper in the room. It seemed that the man was crouching because he couldn’t move due to the intensity of the gunfight.



Weiss who saw that clicked his tongue and took out a smartphone from his breast pocket, and without hesitation he pushed on one of the buttons lighting the screen. When he did that, a scream immediately surged.



「My bad. Die for my sake a bit.」



The button Weiss pushed was the detonator for the【Berserk】that he made his subordinates drunk.



Naturally, Weiss’s subordinates knew the true nature of the thing they were made to drink. They knew yet they drunk that kind of thing. If they were asked why, it wasn’t because of loyalty but because of fear. Simply because if they didn’t drink it then they would be killed by their boss Weiss. That fear allowed them to take the drug even knowing the true identity of the drug.



Because in Weiss’s mind he didn’t think that he would be able to escape while leading all his subordinates, he made this inhumanly ruthless decision. He made everyone except his close aides and useful subordinates to take in the drug.



「Chih. All troops, concentrate at the berserkers! Don’t get hit by any splash!」



Bernard’s order was given, at the same time Kousuke began to deal with the berserkers. He didn’t neglect guarding Emily, but there were Vanessa and Allen beside her. It was Danessa-san who recently only showed her unfortunate side, but her strength was an authentic one.



After all, by herself she protected Emily from the dozens of pursuer led by Kimberly while being isolated and helpless, she was a formidable fighter that could overcome even a berserker if it was one-on-one with leeway to spare.



As for Allen, it went without saying. he was a murder specialist that could take on at the same time several berserkers that were the primary source of infection who got dashed with the undiluted solution of【Berserk】. Even now he wasn’t letting any enemy getting nearby by means of martial arts that looked like Gun-Kata using two handguns resembling a certain demon king.



But, even so, in this kind of situation where they were surrounded by berserkers from all directions, and it was at a range this close, it couldn’t help that the attention would be directed to that way……



「Ah」



Emily unconsciously raised her voice. Ahead of her gaze there was Weiss who was trying to get out of the room quickly where right now he was opening the door, and a man in lab coat who got his collar grabbed by Weiss before he got thrown into the place behind the door.



Kousuke lopped off the head of a berserker, and then he was about to set forth to capture Weiss――just before he could do that,



「Then, sayonara everyone. Please enjoy your welcoming party until the end no matter what.」



Saying that, Weiss pushed the smartphone button and the solid door closed loudly.



It was unclear just what his reason of pushing the button was. But that reason was immediately turned clear.



「Guruurururururu」



A low growling voice resounded between the gunshots.



「Captain-san! The door deeper inside!」



「-, oi oi, what’s that……」



Kousuke was pointing ahead. There, the door that was at the wall on the opposite side of the door Weiss and others went through was being opened before they knew it. And then, Bernard stiffened reflexively when he saw the thing coming out from there.



The thing coming out from there, was a large body that might reach two meters in length――a beast. Its appearance looked like a cat. It had lean limbs and a tail swaying relaxedly. However, it had a large body that couldn’t be found anywhere on earth. Its eyes were bloodshot, and saliva was dripping down from its mouth.



From behind that beast, there were also things that weren’t cat, but they were also enlarged beasts that looked hungry without any sanity. There were dogs, mouses, and also monkeys. Every one of them was literally a monster.



「I see. There is no reason to not use Berserk on animal. And this place is a research facility. It will be stranger instead if there is no animal as guinea pig……」



Bernard muttered that with a disgusted expression. He then gave instruction to his subordinates and they rearranged their formation. But, at the same time there were angry yells resounding from the radio. It came from Beta squad and Gamma squad. It seemed that at their side they also encountered berserk animals.



Thanks to Kousuke’s clone, currently there wasn’t any troop who became unable to fight, but they didn’t seem to be in the situation where they could link up with each other soon.



「It can’t be helped. We don’t know how many of this things there are, but I’ll clear――」



「No, Aby. You go chase Ingram and others together with Doctor Grant.」



Kousuke who was in Abyssgate transformation once more was about to take on the berserk animals――the Berserk Beasts. But Bernard stopped him.



Kousuke reflexively turned an expression of disbelief「Are you sane?」to Bernard. Bernard gave a glance to such Kousuke before throwing a flashbang and tear-gas grenade. If they were animal, then even if they were turned mad, they might falter a bit in front of objects that intensely stimulated their sight and smell. That was Bernard’s thinking but……



Unexpectedly, it seemed that his thinking was right on the mark, The Berserk Beasts didn’t falter, but they leaped back greatly.



Bernard was including that useful information into the tactic inside his head while he spoke to Kousuke using the time he bought.



「Both Ingram and that man he took away are both preys that cannot be allowed to escape. We don’t know what kind of escape method they has prepared, on top of that we cannot let they buy any time. Besides, there won’t be any meaning of you taking the girl here if they get away isn’t it?」



Bernard said that with a smile. His gaze turned toward Emily who was desperately looking at the situation around even while he was turning small with both her hands holding her head.



It was exactly as Bernard said. The reason they picked this place from among the places that should be suppressed was for Emily’s sake. Emily herself knew that she was asking for something selfish, even so she earnestly requested and arrived here. It wasn’t for the sake of the world or even for the sake of the security bureau. It was for the sake of Emily that he came here. It was none other than Kousuke who declared that.



Kousuke looked at Bernard once again. The berserkers around had mostly been dealt by the troops, even so if they had to face the Berserk Beasts then it would be a struggle between life and death for them.



But, the gaze that Bernard returned to Kousuke contained not even a shred of hesitation or fear. He would give his all for the sake of doing what must be done. There was only the resolve as a professional in his gaze.



「I’ll send my clones here quickly when they finish taking care the guys at the other places. Don’t be reckless and focus on buying time.」



「That’s really reassuring. If it’s just buying time it will be too simple that I might let my guard down unconsciously.」



Bernard smiled fearlessly. Kousuke also returned back a fearless smile while he helped Emily stood up.



「Bernard. You are a good guy.」



「You notice it this late? You are unexpectedly slow huh, Aby.」



Saying that, Kousuke and Bernard thrust their fist at each other. For some reason Vanessa’s eyes were sparkling at the exchange of manly smile between the two, but they ignored it for now.



Kousuke pulled at Emily’s hand and broke into a run right away. Vanessa and Allen were also following behind.



At the same time, the Berserk Beasts might instinctually hate letting their prey got away more than feeling disgusted toward the tear gas. They all rushed off toward the four.



「Don’t let them hinder Aby and others-!」



The troops laid out a barrage following Bernard’s order. The berserk beasts were blown away to the side and made to be unable to stop the charge of Kousuke and co.



Using that opening, Kousuke was able to reach the door where Weiss went into. Kousuke opened the door while he looked at Bernard and the troops who were facing the berserk beasts who had changed target.



Seeing Kousuke and others stopped moving and looking here, Bernard yelled angrily.



「Don’t mind us, just go quickly-! Heh, no need to worry, we are going to catch up with you guys soon.」



「Wai-, stupid-! Just why did you say that just now!?」



The speech of Bernard that was said with a fearless smile caused Kousuke to make a retort. Just how could Bernard say that kind of lovely speech in this critical hour? There was no way Bernard who wasn’t an otaku was running a joke here, which made that speech sounded excessively ominous.



But, in a perfect form Bernard added more lovely flag as though he was being possessed in this critical hour.



「Aby! Let’s get some beer when this case is over!」



「Stop it already! In the battlefield,『When I go home~』type of speech is something that mustn’t be said the most!」



Of course, Kousuke’s words were ignored so naturally it was unnatural like usual.



「Doctor Grant! There is one thing I want to say to you along with my subordinates if we can meet again later! Will you hear it then!?」



「Eh? Ye, yes! It’s a promise!」



「That’s why stop ittt! Emily too don’t reply back! It’s seriously not funny at allll!」



‘As expected, perhaps it was better that I remain here.’ Kousuke thought so, but right after that, one of the berserk beasts approached Kousuke and co. But because Allen pulled in the other three into the door’s other side while saying「Please hurry!」, the beast didn’t manage to get near.



The solid door was closed, and in the end the sight of Bernard giving them a thumb up with a nice smile was seared into their brain.



The door was dented then from the tackle of the berserk beast, after that the sound of gunshot resounded *gan gan gan*.



「Now, let’ stop standing idly here and proceed!」



Vanessa and Emily stood up from Allen’s words. Kousuke also stood up with a speechless expression.



Like that, Kousuke and co started running deeper into the corridor. Vanessa suddenly whispered.



「What a sorrowful affair.」



「You are annoying!」



Kousuke’s retort exploded toward that extremely imprudent line. *bachikon* Vanessa’s head was struck with such sound while Emily and Allen were bewildered at that incomprehensible act of the two. Kousuke then prayed.



「Bernard. I’ll send help there as soon as possible so seriously, don’t die.」



For some reason, the figure of Bernard giving a thumb up with a nice smile couldn’t vanish from Kousuke’s mind.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I don’t have writing time at all with 7 days of continuous working, but this chapter made it in time somehow with just a bit of lateness……but I’m sorry for the lateness.



Next chapter will be the climax.



The next update will be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 217




Kousuke and co dashed through the dim corridor that was only illuminated by emergency lamps.



They couldn't see the figure of Weiss and the man in lab coat they were pursuing, but there was no hesitation in the steps of Kousuke who was in the lead. He was advancing while his gaze was focusing to the ground of this complicated passage that seemed like an underground labyrinth. There wasn't any map for this place even in Kaysis's data.



Kousuke was following the trail and presence of the escaping Weiss using the skill of "assassin" vocation, [+Tracking]. He didn't miss even the faint trace that was even vaguer than mist which a normal person wouldn't be able to perceive. Putting aside Vanessa who was ecstatic, even Allen's face was twitching for who knew how many times already from seeing that figure chasing after the prey accurately.



「「oOOOOOOO-」」



「Don't mind them. Run!」



Berserkers appeared from the corner of the passage. The two berserkers were charging at them right from the front, causing the ground to vibrate. Allen and Vanessa spontaneously began to stop their feet to intercept, but Kousuke accelerated faster instead and raised his voice. The two of them reflexively obeyed him.



Kousuke tensed his legs and put strength into them. He soundlessly accelerated and approached the wall. Emily and others followed behind thinking that he was going to pass through from the side, but they soon knew that wasn't his intention.



Kousuke put his foot on the wall and ran on its surface while his body was turning sideways. When he climbed until the ceiling where his body became upside down, he kept running on the ceiling without pause. ――Skill "Shadow Dance". It was Kousuke's favorite skill.



「Hah」



Kousuke sprinted on the ceiling. The movement of the two berserkers who was about to tackle halted for a moment seeing the impossible position of their target. Kousuke rushed into between the two.



Still being upside down, a short sword flashed in a rotation like a whirling wind. A beam of light the color of blue sky gently caressed the necks of the berserkers, melting and cutting without reservation. Shockwave flew from the fingerless glove too as though it was only done as an extra, blowing away the berserkers to the wall.



Kousuke landed lightly and then he resumed running in the lead as though nothing happened.



The body of the berserkers convulsed in vain on the wall, without any splash or without being any obstacle at all.



Even before reaching this far, there were berserkers and berserk beasts attacking them incessantly. Most likely they were prepared by Weiss to hinder them, but they only came sporadically and couldn't hope to stop Kousuke on his track.



Before long Kousuke and others ran into a steel door at the end of the passage. The width of the passage was quite wide, but there were large boxes and machine parts cluttering the floor that if multiple people wanted to pass through they would need to line up in a single line.



「Vanessa-」



「Roger.」



When Kousuke called, Vanessa moved instantly in understanding. She hugged Emily who was at her side and hid behind a large machine part. Allen also took cover smoothly after her.



A beat.



*DA DA DA DA DA DA DA DA DA-* Thunderous roar echoed. A machine gun in full auto spouted fire and a great number of bullets scattered the packages filling the corridor. Kousuke smoothly evaded the flying bullets and threw a kunai.



「Kousuke-san. Your Vanessa is desiring to see the scene of cutting bullets with katana.」



Vanessa-san who was loyal to her own desire even while getting exposed to gunshot. Emily who was being embraced inside Vanessa's embrace was dealing the slaps of straight man repeatedly *pechi pechi* even while turning small.



「No, putting aside getting out from line of fire, but a stunt like cutting apart bullets from full-auto shooting with unparalleled accuracy is beyond me okay?」



Vanessa's eyes turned round while she went「Ee……」hearing what Kousuke said. It seemed that the Kousuke inside Vanessa had been turned into someone who could do anything.



Vanessa turned a gaze that seemed to want to say「You're kidding, you say that, but the truth is?」. Kousuke smiled wryly to that.



「Something like cutting all bullets fired in full-auto without even missing one, that kind of stunt is only possible for the demon king or the demon king’s wife the swordswoman-sama. As for me, I'm going with petty surprise attack just fine.」



Kousuke shrugged his shoulders, and then at the next moment, his figure vanished. In exchange, there was a kunai at the spot where Kousuke had been at until now. That was the kunai that Kousuke threw just before.



Naturall, for the kunai to be there meant,



「Guah!?」



「Shit-. Since whe――」



「Gafuh!?」



Kousuke was in the middle of the enemies.



It was one of the abilities possessed by the kunai. Space substitution. The subordinates of Weiss were panicked at the sudden appearance of Kousuke at the wall where the kunai had stabbed. They aimed their gun muzzle without delay, but at that time they could do nothing but having a tearful separation, between their head and body.



A single attack of heat and slash given them an unreal death. Their torso and head rolled like broken toy without even any time to transform into berserker and they departed for their journey to the other world.



Even so, different from a berserker's last moment who would have their body dried up completely and broke down to a degree they couldn't keep their original shape, now the space was filled with human corpses rolling around everywhere. That factor was enough for Emily who wasn't used to death to turn pale and bile to rise up in her throat.



「Emily, right now think only about forward――」



「I, I'm fine, Kousuke. Let's go!」



Her smiling face was twitching and pale, but Emily stopped Kousuke's words with a strong voice. And then, she stared at the solid-looking steel door in front of her eyes, as though she understood something.



「Kousuke. Ahead of this is……」



「So you realize. Yeah, that's right. They are at the other side of this door. It looks like they are flustered, but they still aren't escaping. Looks like we made it in time.」



「I see……」



Emily took a deep, deep deep breath. And then, she closed her eyes just a little. By doing that, spectacles revolved behind her eyelids like a revolving lantern. The days she spent at Down classroom. The smile of Hendricks and Lizzie who looked after her, the quarrel between Rod and Dennis in place of greeting, Jessica's mischievous smile, the joyful and fun joke exchange between Sam and Milo.



They were Emily's beloved big brothers and sisters. They weren't here anymore. She could never meet them again, her precious family.



Emily opened her eyes quietly.



「Kousuke, please.」



「Ou」



Her words were few, but the respond she got was strong. Kousuke's short sword left azure trail behind and pierced the steel door. It was as though a knife stabbing through butter, the short sword smoothly pierced without meeting resistance. The place pierced by that super-high temperature had the surrounding area melting in the blink of eye.



*plop, plop* The steel door was turned red hot and melted down. The sight behind the door was starting to turn visible bit by bit from there.



It seemed that it was an underground parking lot at the other side of the steel door. There were several passenger cars and freight cars, there were also particular vehicles like forklift and so on.



Beside one of those cars, at the side of a medium-size pick-up truck, there was the figure of two people. They were at the side of the truck load that seemed to be filled with luggage, but it appeared they were astonished with the steel door melting. They were standing still without a twitch.



*plop, plop* The door was vanishing, The door separating Emily and the man was vanishing.



Their knees were starting to be visible. One set was Weiss that they saw before this, while the slack of the other man was something really familiar for Emily. That slacks was dark brown and Jessica and Lizzie always said that it was too plain. Surely if the slack was seen from nearby, there would be a small fray that could be found around the right knee.



The belt was starting to get visible. That belt was slightly thinning recently and the holes were shifted. Everyone was worried if the wearer of that belt was eating properly because he often went on a trip.



The necktie was visible. It was a bright navy blue necktie with sharp stripes on it. To tell the truth, it was a present from Emily to him for his birthday. The expense choked out her pocket money while she chose the necktie with the help of Lizzie and Jessica.



「Aa……」



Emily unconsciously leaked out her voice. That voice came from her fleeting hope――that "It could be a mistake by some chance", that hope which she herself would laugh at, it was now crushed to bits.



Kousuke swung his arm. The steel door was blown away without leaving any trace.



There was no more thing that stood in their way.



The remains of the steel door illuminated the surrounding bright red even though they were rapidly cooling down. Emily slowly walked forward while the remains were scattering. At her right side was the protector from the Far East who was wielding the mystic, at her left side was the heroic protector who would stand up even against her motherland if it was necessary, and behind her was the protector who shouldn't exist that symbolized the necessary evil. She entered while taking them along.



The fluttering lab coat, that was Emily's pride. The proof of her pride of the things she had piled up and of the place to belong that was given to her by him. But right now, that pride felt really heavy, really empty.



Beside Weiss who was cursing「This is too fast, this damned monster」while holding his head, there was the man who was still petrified in astonishment. Emily looked like she was going to burst crying anytime, however her expression was filled with the resolve that she absolutely wouldn't cry. It was with that expression that she opened her mouth to that man.



「Why did, you do it……teacher?」



There was no way the man couldn't understand the meaning of that question.



The first voice Emily spoke out, it made him, Emily's teacher that was like a substitute of her father――Professor Reginald Down to come back to his senses.



「Emily……」



「Why did you do it, teacher?」



Hearing her name called by that voice that she thought wouldn't be able to hear for the second time, it caused Emily's heart to be shaken whether she wanted it or not. The words that she repeated had no intonation, perhaps because she was forcefully holding down her emotion.



「……Emily, I――」



Professor Down's words got caught up in his throat once more. He bit his lip hard, as though he was in pain, or as though he was holding back something. Kousuke and Vanessa watched over the scene.



Silence ruled over the place. In the middle of that, Weiss suddenly glanced at his wristwatch. At that moment, Allen who had never taken off his gaze from Weiss reacted.



He exchanged glance with Kousuke for an instant. That was him signaling to let Emily kept talking while he would capture Weiss ahead. There wasn't any reason to let an enemy at large, so Kousuke also showed an agreement with his gaze.



Like that, Kousuke and Allen were about to leap out, but just before they could,



「Whooops, don't move you two. If not I'm going to make this beloved papa of that missy get riddle with hole yeah.」



Weiss who anticipated that quickly move and circled his arm around Down's neck and pinioned him from behind. He was hiding behind Down and turned him into a shield while his gun muzzle stuck out on Down's side.



Weiss hindered Emily's talk with his gun muzzle not wavering. Vanessa gazed at him with a suspicious gaze.



「What are you planning?」



「What, nothing. Even though he is threatened, but as expected, with the girl who is like his daughter in front of him, perhaps this guy might do something stupid. That's what I think, you know?」



「Threaten? ……Are you saying that Professor Down is here because he is being threatened?」



「Hm~~, it's a bit of faulty expression to say threaten I guess. It's that, something like unwillingly complying with forced request for cooperation.」



It seemed that Weiss wanted to say that Down was here unwillingly. Down's face grimaced from the sensation of gun being pressed hard on him. Weiss grinned smugly while he jerked his chin toward Emily.



「Genius missy. This substitute father of yours is really gallant see. He will lick even other people's shoes with the term that they won't lay your hand on you. Even I got moved into tears by that devotion and thought that maybe I'll overlook you missy, but it's a different story if you come here by yourself.」



「Wa, wait, that's not what we agreed on. You said that Emily won't――」



Down showed his panic hearing Weiss being talkative. Just from looking at that, it really seemed as though Down was obeying without any choice because Emily was used to threaten him.



Weiss sent a vulgar gaze at Emily as though he was going to ridicule Emily's agitation――



「Teacher, please answer. Why, did you come to do something like this?」



「……」



What was there, was an Emily who wasn't shaken even for a bit, her straightforward gaze was unchanging while her expression looked as though she was desperately stifling her overflowing emotion. Rather, her expression was showing as though something was dirtied from how Down was still displaying that kind of farce at this point of time. Be that as it may, a strong will could be seen from her that made it clear that she had no plan of going along with that kind of farce.



Kousuke and Allen spontaneously made a small smile seeing how Emily acted. Vanessa too, even though she was gazing at Emily with concern, but her expression was proud toward Emily who was showing her "strength".



「What's this, I though you are going to get shaken at least a little. Well, I didn't expect that much from this anyway. It's fine because the sure thing will be from here on.」



Weiss easily separated from Down and he shrugged his shoulders, and then he cleared away in one go the cover enveloping the large box that was put on the back of the pick-up truck.



「-, you-」



「Ooh, so you are shaken by this. I'm glad I brought it here for just in case.」



Emily glared at Weiss with a furious look. Kousuke and others also weren't an exception. That special case with transparent surface was filled with children who hadn't even reach five years old. They looked really scared, three children were snuggling with each other at a corner of the cramped case, their body huddled down while trembling fiercely.



Weiss pushed his finger on the smartphone on his hand while his vulgar grin deepened.



「The American comic bastard over there, also the agents, and even Emily, don't move okay? If my finger slipped because of the spur of the moment, this brats will end up going with cheery monster debut yeah?」



Because Weiss knew about Kousuke's ability, he didn't take his gaze off from Kousuke even for a moment despite his frivolous attitude. Most likely, the moment Kousuke's presence vanished even for an instant in this situation, he would move his finger without hesitation and activated the detonator switch for the Berserk that was consumed by the children.



……And so, Kousuke was normally vanishing just like usual.



「You scum. Just the fact that you are living is a crime.」



Vanessa who guessed what Kousuke was doing cursed to buy time. Weiss's expression turned amused instead at the abuse from an opponent in a situation where he was overwhelmingly superior and he shrugged. Of course, he didn't take off his gaze from Kousuke……he didn't take off his gaze……



「It's better for you all dogs of the government to increase your cursing variation a bit more. I already got too used at what you guys will say, recently it was boring for me. Well, no matter. Come on, first of all, you guys toss the dangerous items to the floor.」



His gaze toward Kousuke wasn't taken o……wasn't tak……it was taken off.



Weiss's gaze smoothly flowed toward Vanessa who was talking at him. He did that really naturally, without any doubt, as though it was only the norm. He slowly lowered down his gun and he made a satisfied smile toward Allen and Vanessa.



「Not using skill is also advantageous sometimes……it's not like, I'm crying here.」



「Wha-, guwah!?」



Kousuke-san who was normally at your side, weeping like usual, was here. He ignored Weiss who jumped in shock, held his wrist and made him dropped the smartphone, and then held him down to his knees.



「Guh, god damn it-. This American comic bastard! Just why the hell something like you comes out here huh!」



「It's not like I don't understand your feeling, but be quiet for a bit. Right now is Emily's time.」



When Kousuke increased the pressure at Weiss's joint, Weiss leaked out a small anguished voice「Ngih」before he shut his mouth.



Down backed away from Kousuke who suddenly appeared at his side where Emily's gaze then pierced through him.



But, right after when they thought that Weiss's farce was over and they could start talking,



*goun-goun-goun-*



A suspicious voice that sounded like it was resounding from the bottom of earth resounded on the eardrum of Kousuke and co. It was the sound of some kind of machine activating. And it also sounded really loud. Kousuke and co ran their gaze suspiciously on the floor.



And then, their gaze caught a crack running through the floor. No, it wasn't a crack, but a circle line with its center split by a vertical line.



「Is that, elevator?」



Vanessa muttered. It was just as she said, there was an underground space further underneath this underground parking lot cum cargo storeroom. The diameter of the circle shaped elevator was around seven, eight meter. It was a large elevator for transporting large machinery and material.



It was climbing up. Kousuke and others had bad premonition welling up inside them fiercely. This time a muffled laughter resounded in their ears.



「Ku-, kuku-, fuhah. It finally arrived. It thought a lot of time to lure it until the elevator, but it's barely safe. I thought just what will happen when the distractions got easily broken through and we were caught up with, but it's worth it making up that kind of farce.」



Weiss said that kind of thing while getting pushed on the floor by Kousuke. They were about to question what he meant by that, but before they could, the elevator's door opened. The floor split to left and right, and a hole was opened wide on the floor――



Countless something instantly flew out from there.



「-, Get down-」



Kousuke yelled while taking position in front of Emily right away. And then, he mowed down those things attacking them with a flash of his short sword. Vanessa and Allen also quickly got down and they succeeded to evade the first attack somehow.



Those things intercepted and severed by Kousuke made raw sound *bicha* and fell on the floor. The fallen things convulsed with watery sound, while the sources of the things that lost its tips were pulling back into the elevator.



「Te, tentacle?」



「Looks like it. Those guys, just what in the world they are calling to here?」



The things that Emily mentioned while her face went pale were indeed tentacles. They were skin-colored, fleshy tentacles that even looked like human guts. Those things flew out simultaneously from the elevator.



「Old man. It's plan B! Run until the meeting point somehow!」



「-, Go, got it!」



The moment Kousuke left him, Weiss sprang up to his feet and jumped to the side. He barely avoided those things that also came attacking at him. And then he took out an attaché case from the pickup truck's driver seat that had its door opened all this time. At the same time he started up the engine.



But, he didn't enter the truck, but started running in full speed while still holding the attaché case.



On the other hand, Down also seemed to know what was coming from the underground, he rolled under the truck the moment the elevator's door opened and like that he came out at the other side and hid there, so he was safe. And then, just like Weiss, he took into his hands a shoulder bag and a rectangle case. He then started running toward a door at the opposite side of where Weiss was going.



Naturally, Kousuke and others aimed their kunai and gun to stop Weiss, but a lot of tentacles flew out before they could and hindered them.



On top of that,



「Ah, Kousuke-. Those children-」



「That bastard-. So this is his aim from the start-」



The tentacles attacked the pickup truck as though they were reacting to the engine sound. Even though each of the tentacles was only as big as an arm of a child, they instantly toppled the truck sideways without any difficulty. Naturally, the case where the children were entered into was thrown out from the truck. The children who were jostled inside the case screamed.



The tentacles reacted to that scream and entangled around the case. It seemed that it was a tough case, so the case wasn't crushed or squashed, but the case was dragged toward the elevator.



「Vanessa, Allen. Take care of Emily!」



「Acknowledged!」



「Aah, geez. This is completely out of my field you knoww」



They followed Kousuke's instruction and went to Emily's side to protect her, then they led her away to take distance from the elevator. Most of the rushing out tentacles was cut apart by Kousuke, even so, as expected from the two, their skill allowed them to accurately blow away the remaining tentacles using bullet.



Kousuke judged that it would be fine to leave them to fend for themselves for the moment and he was going to rescue the children.



However,



「No way I'll let you do that so simply yeah!」



「You-, this shitty bastard!」



Weiss fired his machine gun from the other side of the door. He was aiming at Emily. As expected, a feat of shooting down bullet using bullet could only be done by a certain demon king. It was impossible for Vanessa and Allen.



Therefore, Kousuke couldn't help but defending against that using his kunai to deploy out a barrier. Although it was only for a little while, but Kousuke was still being held in place,



「Yoo, American comic bastard! If you are a hero, then don't abandon those pitiful children just like a hero yeah.」



Weiss's disgusting laugh echoed, at the next moment――it flew out.



Like a spear that was thrown by an expert, countless tentacles stretched out and stabbed on the ceiling and wall. And then, by using expansion and contraction, and recoil, something that could be described as a lump of meat appeared from the bottom of earth.



It was weird and repulsive, like minced meats that were haphazardly kneaded to each other, with tentacles haphazardly growing a lot from there. That figure stirred up instinctive revulsion from anyone seeing it.



It wriggled with flabby motion and crawled up like a muddy stream, It scattered around flesh and liquid while covering over the nearest prey. ――Yes, toward the case where the children were inside.



「That case is a solid one, so it will be able to hold for a bit even if it was swallowed by that ruined experiment. Do your best and go all out to rescue those children. We won't mind it okay?」



A ruined experiment――just as those words stated, the meat lump was a product that was created from a process of an experiment. The reason this thing ended up as this ugly meat lump was only one, it was because of a demonic deed that was done for the sake of knowing the limit of Berserk's ability.



Berserk would repeatedly caused regeneration by forcefully invigorating the cells until past the limit of the flesh. Then, what would happen if Berserk was continuously administered while also continuously giving healthy and young flesh to the subject? The subject would fuse its former flesh with another flesh in the form of it getting swallowed inside regeneration. Such thing was repeated.



Like that, what resulted was the worst monster that didn't even retain its shape as a living thing――a Berserk Chimera. It was already incomprehensible just what was the former organisms that entered into the fusion.



It took time to lure this thing from the underground's deepest experiment room until here using any kind of bait. But, Weiss believed that it would be impossible to hold back this existence that was wielding supernatural without using the Berserk Chimera. This was his genuine trump card. That farce and all his talkativeness were for buying time to guide this Berserk Chimera.



Weiss immediately vanished behind the door at the same time with his spoken out parting remark. After the berserk chimera took the children's case, it continued to attack Kousuke and others without pause using his tentacles like a storm.



Kousuke defended against all those while gritting his teeth hard. Behind him, Emily called at him with a trembling voice.



「Kousuke, those children……what to do! They have to be saved!」



「……」



There was no reply. Normally, Kousuke should reply right away with words that were overflowing with confidence, but now he didn't reply right away. A bad premonition welled up inside her. By any chance, perhaps even with Kousuke here, those children were beyond salvation already. Was this the end, just like what Weiss said……



「Kousu――」



Emily slowly peeked at Kousuke's side profile with an expression that almost cried. She instantly swallowed back her words unconsciously.



Kousuke was always like whistling wind, or making a troubled smile on his face. Sometimes he showed a serious face, a resolved face, a nostalgic face. Emily had seen all those faces until now, but she had never seen Kousuke's current face.



There was nothing in it, an expression of "nothingness".



Honestly, she shuddered. The eyes without any emotion in it, staring straight at the berserk chimera, and the expression where all emotion had slipped off cleanly from it, it was as though the person there wasn't Kousuke.



「I somehow, understand. Even though I don't know how your former appearance looked like, I understand somehow. ……It's scary isn't it? It's painful isn't it? You were brought to this kind of place, and ended up like that……」



Those words lacked intonation. There, not just Emily, Vanessa and Allen also noticed.



Kousuke, had "snapped". It wasn't at the level of the anger he showed when Emily was cornered by the security bureau. At that time there was still some saving grace. The Grant family was in good health and they were already rescued, Chief Magdanese and her group also people with conviction, and the incident at the research building had a strong aspect as being an accident.



That was why, even though Kousuke was angry at that time, he wasn't totally angry. But, right now was different. What was in front of Kousuke was an inhuman act. Anavatar of malice and greed. He understood. Even though he didn't know the detail, but he understood, just what was the material used to make the meat lump before his eyes. He understood, just who was crying and screaming at that time.



That was why, the feeling that Kousuke held――was rage.



「Allen.」



「Ye, yes-」



Allen who was suddenly addressed twitched in reaction. Allen was sweating coldly from the terror that was silently, but surely eroding him. Kousuke commanded at such Allen still with a voice that was lacking intonation.



「Chase after "that". Stop him in place, until I catch up after I rescue those children.」



「Ye, YES SIR-!!」



Kousuke stabbed his short sword into the ground and made a path of flame ran on the ground. A path that was protected by a flame wall ran straight until the door where Weiss entered. Allen dashed through it.



「Emily.」



「Hy, hyes-」



「Chase after the professor. Vanessa.」



「Yes, Kousuke-san.」



「Protect Emily.」



「Ackinowledged.」



Flame ran, toward the door Down went through. Emily was hesitating, but Vanessa held her hand and pulled her. Even so, Emily was worried about the children and also about Kousuke. When she looked back, there, Kousuke was putting on his sunglasses while opening his mouth.



「Don't worry Emily. I'll save those children. I'll destroy this pitiful monster. I'll make "that" regret that he was born. I'll leave only Down to Emily, but I also won't let anyone other than those guys to get away. That's why, go.」



「Ye, yes, I understand. ……Kousuke, please, save those children!」



「Yeah, leave it to me.」



Emily started running, led by Vanessa. The berserk chimera instinctually shirked away from the flame wall, even so it still tried to capture the preys by stretching its tentacles in roundabout way through the ceiling, but all its efforts were pushed back by the barrier from the kunai and it couldn't approach the preys.



Emily and others chased after their respective target and their figure vanished from the room. Detecting that, Kousuke, no, the abyss lord declared calmly without even taking a cool pose.



「This rage, surely belongs to all of you who are toyed by others as they pleased. In return, I'll dispel your chagrin for you. That's why, please, sleep peacefully.」



The abyss lord who was driven by rage, began his battle for the sake of salvation.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Now then, at the last chapter I said that next will be the climax but……this chapter is one step behind the climax.



So far as it goes, Shirakome is looking on warmly from managing to put out a cool development following the template, that "the mastermind is the father" but,



Actually I wanted to end this all in one go with one chapter.



Everything is the fault of reality and workplace. I'm sorry.



Next week I will receive consecutive holidays, so I think I can go until the end.



It will make me happy if you readers can look forward to it.



The next update is planned to be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 218




AN: This chapter was late. I'm sorry.



He was running without making any sound, while paying the greatest caution to the surrounding, yet his running speed was still top speed. The agent of a nonexistent organization――Allen, was chasing after the escaping Weiss with an astounding speed.



It seemed that Weiss was heading toward the installation of this facility's power generator, Allen could see various pipes and electronics, big and small through the corridor.



But, at that time, Allen's gaze suddenly caught something that he ought to be careful against. It was a very fine wire that was set up on the corridor inconspicuously. A simple trap.



Allen's face didn't change, his running speed didn't decrease, he went to the wall and jumped. And then, by kicking on the wall he climbed until near the ceiling, his hands caught one of the pipes and he flew over the wire like a pendulum.



That jump looked excessive just for jumping over a single wire, but actually that wire was a bluff, there was an infrared-type trap set up ahead of that wire, so Allen's action was correct looking at the result. It was an instantaneous judgment based from Allen's experience of many years.



「This will be easier if I can run on the ceiling like him though!!」



「Chih. You bastard are also monstrous enough to be able to react to that-」



Weiss who was hiding behind a cover aimed at the moment Allen landed and fired. However, Allen also read that ahead, he got down looking as though he was clinging on the floor the moment he landed, so the bullet futilely passed through above his head.



Still lying down on the floor, Allen pulled his gun trigger without any time lag. His bullet counterattacked Weiss. Weiss leaked out「Uoh-!」voice, even so he managed to dodge by hiding his body with the agility that was in the level of a cockroach.



「Eat this too!」



「Are you idiot, doing that in this kind of place!?」



Weiss threw a hand grenade while roaring angrily. It was a cramped place like this, furthermore the place was packed full with pipes that were unknown what their function were. 'Just what the hell he is thinking throwing explosive here!' Allen sprang to his feet even while cursing and he aimed in kneeling posture using both his hands.



Like that, the bullet he fired accurately shot through the midair grenade, and it exploded right in the middle between Weiss and Allen. Allen rolled to the passage's wall at the same time with his firing and then he covered his whole body with his coat that possessed the function of bullet-proof, knife-proof, and impact resistance. Even so he gritted his teeth from the impact that made him felt enough pain while trying to snipe Weiss, at that time,



「Ih!?」



「Light is with you, I guess?」



Allen's cheeks twitched from looking at "that" rolling below him. Right after that, *kat-* intense light surged out.



Weiss who in a sense believed at Allen's skill had predicted that Allen would shoot down the hand grenade, so he also threw a flashbang at almost the same time.



With this, he ran out of grenade and flashbang. The double layered trap and the hand grenade was a preparation to steal Allen's sight in this moment.



At the same time when the light was starting to settle down, Weiss sent machine gun bullets at the spot where Allen was. His tactics was flowing smoothly without any hesitation and mercy, brought about by his overwhelming battle experience. He became the target of JD Agency because he was using this skill of his to accomplish immorality and turned the table at the many polices and agents coming to capture him.



He was even able to escape once from an agent of that JD Agency, his skill was something authentic in contrast with his frivolous attitude.



Although, if it was asked whether that skill could work that easily against the man who was named to work directly beside the chief of the state security bureau even from among the JD Agency,



*tan- tan-*



「Tsua!? Son of a bitch-」



Two gunshots echoed, at the same time Weiss's machinegun was blown away. It was merely luck that his fingers didn't get blown up too.



Weiss immediately drew out his handgun to fire back. But, he whispered「That just ain't possible」with a displeased expression seeing what appeared at the space where the flash had settled down.



「It's the standard for a spy to have seven tools right? My organization is a nonexistent one, but the guys affiliated with it are all comparatively a believer of romance you know?」



Allen said so with his hand holding that――a coat that hardened like shield and blocked the bullets. He waved it lightly. Inside his heart he was going「That was dangerous just now!」while sweating coldly, but he was hiding it with his usual foolish smile.



「Spare me from a real ○07. Don't tell me, that the developer of that thing is named Q or something, that's not it yeah?」



「……No comment.」



「So it's really Q huh!? Your organization is screwing around too much!」



「No, no comment.」



Both of them were acting the funny man and the straight man like television performers while at the same time they pulled their gun trigger. They were trying to take each other's life smoothly while talking jokingly. It was a black communication between a veteran mercenary and a first-class assassin.



As expected it seemed they had predicted each other's movement, the bullets grazed the cheek of the two who were in a stance of half-body. (TN: This half-body stance is like karate stance, where you directed one side of your body toward diagonally behind, so to make your body a smaller target)



Allen made his coat as substitute for a shield and charged forward in a dash. The passage wasn't that wide, so when the shield of the hardened coat that was spread widely launched a shield bash, it was impossible to dodge.



Weiss got a future vision where he got pushed down――and he instead stepped forward. If here he showed his back, he would undoubtedly get shot on the back and died. He judged that his path of survival only existed at the front.



Weiss slid the moment just before he came into contact with Allen. Perhaps he was trying to slip through between Allen's legs, but there was no way Allen would allow that and he swung down the shield――right before that, Weiss fired repeatedly toward the ceiling.



「-」



The fired bullets hit a pipe at the ceiling and it came back toward the ground by a complicated ricochet. Allen immediately lifted his coat as shield and blocked the ricochet. At that moment, Weiss was sliding on the floor while passing through……during that time he unsheathed a knife to mow Allen's foot.



Allen blocked that knife using his shoe that was inserted with a metal plate, he discarded his coat and at the same time used one hand as fulcrum and kicked with a reversed foot. The shoe of that reversed foot had a mechanical knife flying out from its tip.



Weiss blocked that using his gun barrel while retreating from the kick's range using the momentum of his sliding. He rotated once and then aimed toward Allen from a kneeling stance. Allen also aimed his gun from a kneeling stance too.



「Just die quickly, dog of the state.」



「Please die quickly, mercenary.」



A beat.



*tan- tan- tan-*



Bullets showered to each other from point-blank range. Although, the firing line of Allen's gun was slightly shifted by Weiss's knife, while Weiss's gun also had its firing line shifted by a retractable baton that Allen took out unnoticed. It finished with only their cheek grazed.



*jako-* Their bullet ran out at the same time with that sound. Weiss pretended to retract the knife in his left hand and in the middle he threw that knife to his right hand. His left hand caught Allen's baton without pause, while the knife landed on the right hand's grip as though it was absorbed to there and approached to carve Allen's throat.



Allen easily abandoned the baton and stepped in so low he looked like he was crawling on the ground. He dodged Weiss's murderous blade while he grasped his collar. And then he turned around. He threw up Weiss with his waist's motion.



Weiss that was flung away with a so called shoulder throw then had his back struck the floor.「Gahah」Air was driven out from his lung.



「Yep, the end.」



「Well, not yet actually.」



Allen pulled out his spare gun and he pressed the gun muzzle on Weiss's forehead. At the same time, Weiss also talked lightly even with his face grimacing and he pressed a button on his wristwatch.



The next instant, a thunderous roar and an explosion blast blew violently from behind Allen. Allen's gun muzzle shifted slightly due to that and because Weiss's head swung aside, the bullet veered away.



Weiss jumped to his feet and dashed fiercely toward the nearest door. Allen immediately fired, but Weiss stepped on Allen's coat while passing through and sent it flying to block the bullet. Even so he couldn't avoid all the bullets and he got his shoulder shot, but he didn't pay it any attention and opened the door with a tackle and jumped inside.



「Good grief, what obstinacy. I can understand how J can let him get away.」



Allen made a bitter expression at his failure of letting Weiss slipped away while he immediately move to chase behind.



He clung on the door and his face slowly peeked in. Right after that, storm of bullets rained down like a hail. It seemed that Weiss had a spare machinegun. Most likely Weiss was someone wary, so he had put weapons here and there through his escape route.



Allen took out the magazine from his gun and confirmed his remaining bullet. He only had few bullets left. There was one more magazine on his waist holster.



「Haa, I used up too much on the berserkers at the first half of this mission.」



Allen smiled bitterly while exchanging his magazine with the new one and put away the half-used magazine. And then, he pulled out a pin from his wristwatch and dropped it on the floor. Immediately, small legs like insect flew out from the pin.



Allen rotated the rotatable bezel of the watch halfway round. Right after that, the windbreak part of the watch turned into a display that projected the image on the floor level.



「This is the prided article of a real life Q. Just watch it thoroughly to your heart's content.」



The small metallic bug moved its legs with rattling sound and advanced toward the location of Weiss who was shooting his machinegun while talking provocatively. Allen was watching his watch's display while controlling the small insect using the bezel's rotation.



Like that the feet of Weiss were visible inside the display. Allen grinned widely, but as expected the one over there was Weiss whose obstinacy was in the level of a cockroach. Just before Allen could press the button, Weiss suddenly noticed below him. He discovered the metallic thing with strange legs crawling below him and his cheeks twitched grandly.



The next moment, *DOOON-* an explosive sound echoed and the gunshot stopped.



Allen rushed into the room with gun readied and his guard up. It was a large room. It was an atrium with height until around two floors, and there was also the second floor with wire-net type floor. It was a room that had a lot of power generator machines put there.



When Allen intruded deeper, he could see a crushed machine and a pipe that snapped in the middle and spouted out white smoke. Allen was instantly alerted in wonder if it was a poisonous gas, but there wasn't any warning from the air composition that was displayed in his watch.



Guessing that it was just vapor, Allen circled around the white smoke while he aimed his gun in a snap toward a cover that had human presence.



「Yoo, doggy. That thing, ain't it a foul?」



「That is a power I have exactly because I'm a dog of the country. That's not wrong isn't it?」



「Don't screw with me. This is why……I hate, the elite young master.」



Weiss talked frivolously. Allen talked frivolously back with his gun aimed at Weiss once more. But, although there wasn't any carelessness in Allen's eyes, but there also wasn't any great cautiousness in it. That was understandable. Weiss had his side largely gouged, he was already fatally wounded. Allen guessed that he would only have a few more minutes to live.



Weiss vomited out a glob of blood while sitting limply leaning on the wall. He took out a cigarette with a trembling hand. Allen was about to pull the trigger without caring about it but,



「Hey, doggy. You want……Hydra's, information right?」



「……No, not really?」



「Is that so? The case, this time, is from that bastard Kaysis's arbitrary……action. Hydra, has their own, different……plan. There won't be any harm……in knowing it right?」



Indeed, 【Berserk Case】was something Kaysis done on his own authority in order to triumph against Hydra's leadership. And then, Kaysis's data didn't include the big plan of Hydra that would be carried out soon. If Hydra had a different plan in progress, than it was something that the security bureau ought to know.



Therefore, Allen's finger slackened slightly from pulling the trigger. Weiss grinned smugly while his hand carried the cigarette toward his blood soaked lips. His figure enjoying the cigarette smoke didn't look like someone who would die with certainty.



「Why are you going to talk?」



「Just, for harassment. Because they gave me……this job that's not worth it, yeah.」



Allen showed a slight hesitation, and a beat later, he urged Weiss to continue with his gaze.



The light in Weiss's eyes were dimming already, his voice was small. His voice was whispering in a subdued tone, making it really hard to be heard in this room where there was the echoing sound of vapor jetting out. Without any other choice, Allen got closer to Weiss.



Of course, Allen anticipated that this might be a trap and the moment he got closer, Weiss would pull out a knife or a gun. Even so Allen had confidence in his reflex and he judged that he would undoubtedly be the faster one in this situation, so he got closer while putting up the maximum caution.



「So……after this, Hydra……」



「Please give it your all if you are going to die anyway. I cannot hear anything here.」



「This guy, how harsh……. But see, if you, get this close……that's enough yeah?」



Weiss's both hands sprang up right after that. He caught both wrists of Allen instantly with a speed that was unthinkable coming from a half-dead man. Although, Allen was calm. He was late slightly in his reaction because he was mostly being cautious against gun or knife, but it wasn't any problem at all just getting caught like this.



Allen made the knife inside his shoe to jump out and he kicked on Weiss's stomach. Weiss's vomited out blood with his body lifted in the air.



But, here an unexpected situation occurred. Weiss should have no more physical strength with his dying body and he should be blown away from Allen's finishing blow, but instead his grip strength was increasing further. He didn't let go of Allen's hands like a magnet.



「-, so this is what they called the great strength when at the death's door!」



「Hihih, this is a desperate grab for fellow traveler to hell.」



Allen kicked repeatedly. He broke Weiss's ribcage, his mechanical knife hacked Weiss's stomach into shreds, and furthermore he also stabbed Weiss's heart. But, Weiss didn't die. The pressure on his captured wrists, was increasing!



「Don't tell me-, the cigarette just now-」



「Spot on-! I'm not gonna let you aim at the head y'knoww」



With both his hands caught, Allen had no way to destroy the head. Being too close like this sealed his legs from destroying the head.



Allen twirled his gun using his fingertip like a sleight of hand. His pinky held the trigger and he aimed at Weiss's head with the gun in a reversed position, but Weiss's arm strength that was increasing further didn't allow Allen to aim accurately. Allen was continuously landing strong knife-attached kicks, but the created wounds were smoking white and gradually began to regenerate.



「Hahah, I'm easy to get lonely see. At least accompany me a little at my journey to that world 'kayy」



「You-. Release me already-」



Weiss laughed ghastly while getting drenched in blood. The cigarette that was crammed with【Berserk】had its content soaked with the drug. Weiss was pretending to smoke while actually he was biting off the cigarette and swallowed it. That was why Weiss was transforming bit by bit.



Because his transformation was slow, there was a merit that he didn't change into a berserker right away and could still think, at the same time there was also a demerit that it would be the end if his head was shot in halfway stage before he completely transformed into a berserker.



That was why Weiss was sealing Allen's both hands.



As expected, Allen was losing patience while he unleashed kicks like a storm at Weiss that was starting to rapidly change before his eyes. However, Weiss's regeneration ability was also gathering speed and the first stab wound was already completely healed.



「Guh-」



「Then, let's meet at the other side yeah, doggy.」



Weiss's insane words stabbed at Allen who groaned from feeling both his arms gripped so hard they were on the verge of snapping from the pressure. Right after that, a roar rose from Weiss. His muscles enlarged and his wound closed with a tremendous speed.



「DON'T UNDERESTIMATE MEEEEE-」



Allen pulled up both his arms together with a loud yell that was rarely coming from him while he struck Weiss's stomach with a fierce kick. Weiss's body was lifted up before it fell down right away, but before that Allen made his body slid to the floor and he put Weiss's body on his lifted leg. And then he pulled both his hands while his leg struck up with all his strength.



The body of Weiss that was in the middle of transformation got turned over with an overhead throw. He was sent flying face up to the opposite side. Even so Weiss's hands didn't let go of Allen, but Weiss that was turned over was on Allen's line of fire.



Allen twirled his gun once more with just his fingertip and he pulled the trigger repeatedly. He didn't manage to aim at the head, but it was enough to strike at the shoulder. Perhaps the bullet hit a good spot, because one of Allen's hands was released.



Allen quickly got up and aimed at the other hand that was growing like a log holding his hand, and he fired. The moment his hand was released, he rolled away to take distance while firing toward Weiss's head.



But, here there was further unexpected situation occiring.



「Wha!? He dodged!?」



「AAAAAAAAAAAAH!!」



Yes, he dodged. A berserker dodged. It detected the approaching bullet and leaped aside.



A berserker was a lump of instinct. It would at least cover its weakness the head with its arms, but fundamentally a berserker would only charge forward like a boar. It could do nothing but charging forward relying on its body and super regeneration. Until now, there wasn't a single berserker that had ever taken "evasive action".



「Chih, a troublesome guy even after becoming a berserker huuh!」



Allen took out a throwing knife and threw it toward Weiss's eye. Allen thought to fire at the head the moment Weiss dodged. But, as expected, this berserker――Berserker Weiss didn't seem like a normal one.



The throwing knife was struck down this time without dodging. Furthermore, it didn't keep charging without pause, but it dripped its waist deeply like a beast while groaning「uUUUUU-」and glared at Allen.



Yes, as though it was observing Allen's move.



「Wa, wa wa wait……this is different from what I heard! A berserker that can "fight" is not a joke-」



Allen was complaining greatly. He fired at the same time. The moment Allen aimed his gun, the berserker charged forward with a terrific step in. Although, that charge wasn't a bull rush like every berserker before this, but a counter rush that was accompanied with the evasion of the bullet by lowering its stance instantly.



「Seriously spare me-」



This time Allen jumped to the side. Berserker Weiss rushed through the place he was at just now and created a crater on the concrete floor.



Allen jumped to the side while doing handstand with one hand and fired further. The bullet approached the head with terrifying accuracy, but Berserker Weiss lifted its hand as expected as though it had predicted it from the start, and the bullet was blocked by that hand.



Berserker Weiss raised a war cry while grabbing the nearby broken pipe. It tore it off with brute strength and threw it toward Allen.



「HiIIH」



Allen screamed pathetically while clinging to the floor and rolled away. He somehow managed to dodge. However, the fact that the berserker was using tool caused Allen's expression to shudder with fear.



But, at that time, a light machine gun on the floor was reflected at the corner of Allen's sight. Most likely it was the weapon that Weiss used before and it got sent flying to there due to the insect explosive. Allen leaped so close to the floor as though he was hugging the ground and he pulled the trigger toward Berserker Weiss that was bending down in preparation for a charge.



*dadadadadada-* A rhythmical sound resounded and a swarm of bullets assaulted Berserker Weiss.



「GAaH」



「He dodged as expected! Aa, geez-」



Berserker Weiss dashed to the side at the same time when Allen pulled the trigger. And then, it sometimes used obstacles for cover while running in circle around Allen.



*gachin-* That sound echoed, showing that the light machinegun ran out of bullet. Allen's face paled.



With timing as though it had aimed for the moment the bullet ran out, Berserker Weiss turned into offensive. Its step-in made *DON-* sound as though a cannon had been fired and it approached Allen.



「Shi, shit-」



Allen took out a small cylinder from his belt's buckle and fired it at the pillar of the second floor. A wire stretched out and its tip then clung tightly and got fixed on the pillar. Allen pushed his belt's buckler at the same time and the wire got reeled in quickly, pulling Allen to the air.



Below him, Berserker Weiss passed through just within a hair's breadth, while smashing some kind of machinery into pieces overenthusiastically.



「This isn't a joke. Just what part of it is a lump of instinct! A berserker that is this used to battle is just……」



Allen was drenched in cold sweat while taking refuge in the air and suddenly a conjecture welled up inside from his own words. The berserkers that he faced until now were basically just civilian or fellows that more or less were used to some scuffle. That was why charging like a bull was only natural for them if they followed their instinct.



But, if, it was a first class fighter whose body moved in subconscious level to predict the chance to attack and took the optimum evasive action when in battle, what would happen if that kind of person was turned into a berserker? A person with combat skill in the level that it was engraved into their subconscious, would they become a monster that only charged forward like civilian in the end?



By any chance, the answer to that might be this Berserker Weiss before his eyes. A skilled mercenary that could battle a top-ranking agent equally was transformed into a berserker resulted into this. Of course, it was nothing more than a conjecture, perhaps there was another factor contributing to this.



「Hahah, perhaps this will be seriously bad if this is turned into weapon.」



Allen reflexively muttered such thing, but his face tensed right away. Berserker Weiss was tearing apart the fixing implement of a machine that was almost as big as a car so that it could lift it up.



It was obvious what was its reason of doing that.



「Crap crap crap crap-」



Allen manipulated his buckle to cut the wire and he fell on the ground. After that, the car-sized machine came flying at the same time. The pillar Allen fixed his wire at was pulverized with a thunderous sound and then the second floor's path was also destroyed by the machine.



Allen landed with ukemi technique, but naturally Berserker Weiss didn't overlook that opening. The rock-like fist was already approaching by the time Allen was recovering his stance.



「Gahah」



Allen could only guard by crossing his arms while taking a back-step with all his strength to lower the impact as much as possible. He was blown away horizontally above the ground and his back crashed on a machine behind him. He couldn't even scream with how intense the impact was and like that his body slipped down slowly to sit on the floor.



'Kahah' Blood was mixed in the breath that he finally could spit out. It seemed that his internal organ was injured. Both his arms limply hung down with their direction facing to a strange angle.



But, even so he was alive. What's more he was conscious and he was able to watch the Berserker Weiss slowly approaching him. Surely that was thanks to his miraculous impact neutralization and ukemi technique.



「Aa……gehoh. This is really, not a laughing matter. ……Haven't I, buy enough time already? Ayssgate-sa~n, it's fine if you rush here……gohoh, anytime noww」



Allen smiled bitterly at his body that couldn't even twitch from the impact while calling for help with a listless voice. But, even Allen understood. This was checkmate.



Berserker Weiss had arrived until right before him. Perhaps it was just his imagination, but it somehow looked like the berserker was sneering at him.



Allen was always side-by-side with death in his duty. Therefore he didn't feel fear. However, if he had a regret then that would be……



「Before the end, just once. I wanted to have a date……with super beautiful woman or girl.」



'Even though I'm also an agent, but why is Jame○ Bond that popular while I'm not? Regret……' Allen whispered.



Berserker Weiss's fist was lifted up. And then just before it was swung down,



「FIREE-」



A command. A storm of bullets assaulted Berserker Weiss. It was a concentrated fire from four directions above. Berserker Weiss couldn't endure and threw its body between the machineries in evasion.



「Chih. It wasn't finished off from the first attack. Its instinct is really something. Oi, Allen, what's with that berserker?」



The one saying that while jumping down from the second floor using other machine as foothold was,



「Be, Bernard-san!」



「Ou, you really got done in huh, Allen. You don't get splashed by any liquid right?」



Yes, the one firing from the second floor was the person who had displayed an outrageous skill of raising death flags in high speed, that Bernard!



It appeared that he had struggled through that deathly battlefield and came here as reinforcement. Allen who was saved in a hair's breadth like a heroine in some tale felt an emotion welling up inside his heart. Driven by that feeling he spoke to Bernard who was making a fearless smile.



「Anyway, I request a change.」



「How regretful. He is infected with Berserk already.」



*click* Bernard's gun muzzle locked on at Allen's forehead. Allen made justification「I'm lying, lying! You aren't a beautiful girl, but I'm really happy that you come to save me!」in panic.



Bernard made an exasperated face at the agent whose talkativeness didn't decrease even when wounded all over like this while helping him to stand up.



「Err, you saved me Bernard-san. But, that guy, he is really a bit of bad news.」



「No, it will be fine.」



Allen suggested caution against the out of norm Berserker Weiss, but Bernard was indifferent. Bernard opened his mouth with a wry smile toward Allen who looked dubious.



「We are here. So there is no way he isn't here too right?」



「A. Aa, that's right. Hahah, really I'm saved……」



Right after that, *GOBA-aAAA-* Berserker Weiss flew out from the cover along with a terrific impact sound. However, it flew out not its own action, with a black whirling sphere settled on a hand palm, that palm was thrust forward in a palm attack stance by Kousuke――no, Lord Abyssgate, which blown away the berserker.



「I received the information from my real body. It looks like you have acted really inhumanly. ――Don't think that you can die easily.」



The lord that was walking out calmly had his eyes filled with rage, his hands unsheathing two short swords. One sword was clad in azure flame, and the other sword was clad in glimmers that looked like diamond dust. Melting and severing sword of super heat "Enryuuga", and the ice sword of absolute zero that formed its counterpart, "Touryuuga". (TN: Enryuuga = Flame Dragon Fang, Touryuuga = Frozen Dragon Fang)



Berserker Weiss made a war cry while standing up, then it threw pipes and machine parts toward the lord.



The lord stepped in. Right after that, he jumped and rotated midair while stepping lightly on the pipe. And then, without stopping he stepped on the machine parts and splinters flying at him one after another and charged toward Berserker Weiss in a straight line.



Berserker might felt a threat because it then tried to dodge to the side. But,



「Where are you going?」



Such sentence reached the berserker. From right beside at the position where it was going to dodge to. At the same time, the figure of the lord approaching from in front of it flickered and vanished. The lord had already switched with an illusion in the middle of jumping by using skill "Leaf Dance".



Berserker Weiss wasted no time to swing its fist. The arm that was thick like a log charged like a cannon to flatten the enemy. And then, something flew in the air. An arm severed from the elbow was rotating midair.



Berserker Weiss that didn't feel pain launched a deadly attack with its other arm without delay, but the figure of the target had already gone. And then, the berserker fell on its knee with a jerk. Because one of its legs was cut flying encased in ice.



The lord slipped to the blind spot behind the Berserker Weiss at the same time after he cut the arm. And then he swung "Touryuuga" while passing through. The blade of ice that was formed to an extreme thinness had a slimness of a single molecule already. And then the chill coating the blade froze the target instantly.



「AAAAAAAAA-」



「Who said that you can howl?」



Berserker Weiss launched a backhand blow even while on its knee, but its body was slowly tilting in contrast with its will. What was flying midair was the arm that was launching the backhand blow. What was rolling on the ground was its other leg.



Berserker Weiss that lost its four limbs was starting to regenerate its hands and feet by activating its super regeneration. But, the two short swords were swung again right after the limbs were starting to grow and sent them flying.



After that it was a routine work. The regenerating part was chopped off before it could be restored to normal and the berserker couldn't escape its state of limbs shortage. It tried to take some distance by prancing up its upper body, even so it was pressured down by a whirling black sphere and it couldn't hope to move because of the suppression of the super gravity.



「You can regenerate however much you want? Fine then. I'll keep you company until you die in that case. Regenerate as much as you like, squirm as much as you like. Until that time when the end arrive.」



The lord's arms went hazy. Each time the limbs of Berserker Weiss danced midair. In the first place, the amount of【Berserk】that was crammed into the cigarette didn't amount that much.



Berserker Weiss writhed, the state of its instinct was different from other berserkers, and before long something other than madness was starting to enter its eyes, welcoming that time. The speed of its regeneration dropped down drastically and the vigor of the rising white smoke was decreasing.



The limit of the regeneration had come.



Its flesh body was gradually shrinking. Due to that, the withered Weiss who was on the verge of death recovered back his awareness.



「Son of a bitch-. Damn it, if you ain't gonna, accompanying me then just diee」



Weiss didn't stop his cursing and frivolous talk even at this kind of time. In his eyes there was a disgusting color, that he wouldn't grant them the reaction they wanted from him no matter how much he got tortured.



After all he would die in less than a few seconds. In that case he would rather spit out words of curse even if just by one more. Weiss opened his mouth with that kind of intention, but the lord firmly grasped his head. And then, he took out a five yen coin crystal that was tied with string.



「Just an instant is enough to grant you regret and despair.」



「What are, you planning――hih, ah, aAAAAAAAAAAAH」



A shriek that was unbearable to listen at was reverberating. That was undoubtedly a voice of regret and despair. Weiss was screaming while his body was completely withering and rotted away.



「Sca, scaryy. Aby, just what did you do?」



「Hahah. I don't want to know though……」



Bernard accompanied with his subordinates arrived while lending Allen his shoulder and he asked. His expression along with his subordinates were all twitching extremely. Allen was going 'no no' in refusal to hear, but he couldn't move properly and on top of that both of his arms were broken, so he couldn't even block his ears.



The lord spoke with an expression that seemed sickened toward Bernard and others.



「I just showed him a nightmare. A nightmare where he is eaten alive by the dead. For now, I set it so his mind experienced it for a hundred times in a moment.」



「「……」」



It would be better if he didn't ask. Bernard and others were wordlessly holding the same thought inside their heart.



Then, the lord suddenly raised his head. Bernard and others asked the lord what happened with their gaze, to which the lord spoke.



「It seems it's necessary for me to head for my real body's reinforcement. Bernard. I'll leave the rest to you.」



「Roger. I don't know what is going on, but leave this place to me. I won't let even a single one of the remaining staff here to get away.」



The lord nodded at Bernard's words before his figure became smoke *bofun-* and vanished.



Right after that, an intense shaking attacked the facility. It was clear that the vibration came from a distant place.



「He is really going at it flashily huh, that Abys. The vibration just now was intense.」



「I think Bernard-san who is calling him with pet name is also amazing you know?」



Bernard was staring in puzzlement at Allen's words before he pulled himself together and began giving order to his subordinates.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



This time I was late too.



Coupled with the work for publication too, Shirakome's sleeping time is……heheh



Next week for sure, next week I'll write the story until the very end in one go for sure!



Please, follow the lord's adventure for just a little bit more.



The next update is planned to be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 219




AN: ↑



For those who doesn't understand the meaning of the title, please watch the movie Matrix Reloaded without fail.



Smiths-san's「Me, me, me――and then, me」is strangely pleasing for Shirakome.



The meat lump squirming before the eyes――Berserk Chimera didn't try to chase after Allen who chased after Weiss or Emily and Vanessa who chased after Down.



The Katon flame wall blocking the tentacles' path had already vanished. If it was berserker that was faithful to their instinct, it would at least try to stretch its tentacles to chase, but this berserker didn't even do that and stopped trying. Surely, most likely, that was because it was cautious against the human in black clothes standing in its way.



「Now then, I don't know just how deep you have carried the case of the children, so I won't give any mercy no matter what were you formerly.」



Kousuke unsheathed two short swords. *shaan* A clear voice echoed and the unsheathed swords were held in reverse grip, at the same time Kousuke's body sunk really low to the floor. So to speak it was a stance of a crouching start.



In an instant, the berserk chimera launched countless tentacles. Those tentacles that were fired with speed that resembled even bullet became like a wall that attacked Kousuke.



And then, a hard sound that was really unthinkable to be created by lump of flesh resounded, stabbing on the metal floor.



Yes, they stabbed at a floor where there wasn't anyone.



「Chih. As I thought, even the weakness's position is haphazard.」



A sound of someone clicking their tongue and a curse resounded. That voice came from behind the berserk chimera. There was the figure of unmoving Kousuke there in with his arms crossed. Looking carefully, the top of the berserk chimera's head was entirely cut off, a beat later, that meat lump fell on a distant spot along with a graphic sound *docha-*.



At that instant, Kousuke rushed with a momentum as though he liberated the power he saved up, slipped through the barrage of tentacles, and then he split the upper head of the berserk chimera.



Although, it didn't look like the berserk chimera received any pain, it was spouting out white smoke while the top of its head regenerated in what should be called an instant. At the same time, it created new tentacles and launched them to Kousuke.



(I cannot see the position of its weakness the brain. In the first place there is no guarantee that it only has one brain. It's not like I don't have a method to blow it up altogether, but then the children inside will die with that. And then, that super regeneration is a hindrance for me to scrap off its body……this is difficult.)



Kousuke cut apart the swarm of tentacles, dodged with acrobatic movement, or handled the attack by using the tentacles as stepping stone. He grumbled inside his heart while analyzing the enemy while a wry smile suddenly emerged on his lips.



To say in addition, it was also forbidden for him to get touched by the liquid that was scattered when the tentacle was grazed. No matter even if it was Kousuke, he wouldn't be able to suppress the transformation of his body if he got splashed by【Berserk】.



Then, at that time the senses of Kousuke who was pondering detected an assault from behind him. When Kousuke immediately twisted his body midair, just as he thought, there were countless tentacles the size of a human arm flying toward him from behind.



「Oi oi, so it can also grow from the part that I cut off. Just what kind of organism this thing has taken that it can do something like that.」



What attacked Kousuke from behind was the meat lump that Kousuke cut flying before this. It was squirming separated from the main body and grew out slender tentacles.



There were tentacles and fleshes he had cut apart lying all over the place. As expected, Kousuke's expression couldn't stop from twitching.



The moment Kousuke muttered「This is bad」, a barrage of tentacles approached from all directions, in addition there was also the meat lump clinging on the ceiling unnoticed attacking like a shower, leaving no place to escape. Their number already surpassed three digits.



Normally it would be a hopeless scene. If the one who was here was the troops of the special squad, they would undoubtedly sigh and even made a bitter smile at the same time with their resignation.



But, of course, for the right-hand man of the demon king, something at this level, no, no matter what kind of situation it was, it was an impossible story for him to carry an emotion of resignation.



「――"Juton - Todokienu Kuroki Sei'iki"」(TN: Gravity Escape - Unreachable Black Sanctuary)



Immediately after, four whirling black spheres as big as a pinball expanded around Kousuke. At the same time, all the approaching tentacles crashed to the ground as though they were struck down.



「Abyss-style Assassination Martial Arts - Sword Form――"Senretsu Kokujou Yaiba"」(TN: Flash Rend Black Fortress Blade)



Furthermore, Kousuke lifted both his arms and he rotated his two short swords like a pinwheel using the motion of his fingertips and his wrists reversal. The tentacles attacking from overhead were shaved off and blown away as though they were hit by an excavator.



Even the tentacles that circled around the shield of slashes and attacked, they were repelled back by the kunais that unnoticed were flying around Kousuke like satellites, furthermore those kunais were rotating in high speed. Not a single tentacle reached Kousuke.



「Burning all these……will put the children in danger I guess. Then, let's smash them apart after freezing them――Rage, silver wind. The breath of eternal world of ice and snow. Hinder the path of the traveler and seize at the cold arm. Thy art the prisoner of the white ice coffin――"Tougoku no Hana"」(TN: Flower of Frozen Prison)



Kousuke lightly made a sound *ton* with his step. Immediately after that, a sound *bikibiki* echoed and the floor was dyed white. Mist was generated. With Kousuke as the center, the white wave was spreading as though it was eroding the world. The tentacles and liquid scattered everywhere were frozen altogether.



And then, it didn't end with that, the meat lump that was dyed pure white and hardened was then enveloped by a prison of ice right after that, like a blooming flower.



A cluster of ice flower was blooming proudly everywhere.



The white erosion also reached the berserk chimera through the floor. Perhaps sensing the danger, the berserk chimera stabbed its tentacles to the ceiling and made its body leaped midair. It already had any composure to launch a random barrage of tentacles to Kousuke.



Even the tentacles needed for attacking were all touched by the chill that froze them. The berserk chimera obeyed its instinct and severed all of its tentacles by itself. The countless tentacles that bloomed into ice flower instantly were falling to the floor.



「There is no way I'll let you get away don't you think?」



Kousuke used the falling ice flowers as stepping stones and jumped toward the berserk chimera. He used the tentacles he cut down and the tentacles approaching wildly as further stepping stones while he somersaulted, then using that momentum he threw his short sword.



The short sword cut straight through the air like a single streak of flash. It stabbed the berserk chimera that had no leeway to evade.



GI, GI, GIIIIIII



A bizarre voice reverberated. Kousuke guessed that it was the scream of the berserk chimera that let alone mouth, it was doubtful that it even had vocal cords. Inside the space where the scream that sounded like the scratching of metal was echoing, the area that was centered around the stabbing short sword was playing dissonant sound *bikibiki* of the berserk chimera getting frozen.



「I don't freeze you until the inside. I'll shave and smash you from your outer layer.」



If its separated part could still move after getting cut off, if it could regenerate no matter how much it got slashed, then he would restrain it using ice coffin, and then froze all of the parts he scraped off and then pulverized them. It was a method that paid attention to the safety of the captured children as much as possible while rescuing them with certainty.



Before long, the tentacles that stabbed into the ceiling and supported its mass were frozen, and they became unable to endure their own weight and snapped. The berserk chimera fell to the floor and its body's outer part was smashed apart from the impact of crashing down.



Squirming meat lump could be seen from inside the smashed meat lump. It was trying to regenerate. But, the stabbing short sword didn't allow that. The mist was coming down faster than the regeneration could start and froze them.



When Kousuke snapped his fingers, the frozen outer layer broke apart once more, and frozen meat lumps were scattered in pieces of small block shape.



「If I continue to smash it like this until those children become visible――」



'I should be able to save them.'



Yes, Kousuke was about to say that, but right after that, his cheeks cramped from the squirming presence at his surrounding. When he quickly looked around, *piki-, paki-* he could see cracks entering the ice flowers.



「O, oi oi. This is a joke right?」



Kousuke unconsciously let out those words. That was understandable. After all, the countless meat lumps locked inside the ice flower were squirming and bloating from inside.



*baki-* Hearing such sound, Kousuke returned his gaze back at the berserk chimera, and there the same sight of it bloating from inside entered his eyes.



Kousuke opened his eyes wide. No matter how he looked, the meat lumps at his surrounding and also the berserk chimera were increasing in volume. When a human was transformed into berserker, their super regeneration was caused by the repetition of breaking down and regeneration, it could be said to be similar with the phenomenon of muscle swelling up.



But, even that had limit. It wasn't like a berserker would transform into giant endlessly. It was impossible for them to multiply new flesh from a small fragment of flesh. It wasn't an ability that a human was equipped with.



「No, wait. In the first place, this thing is stretching out tentacles……」



Kousuke suddenly noticed. This thing was stretching out tentacles endlessly――that was an impossible trait for all creatures that he knew about. Even though there were creatures that had tentacles, there shouldn't be any creature that was able to grow several hundreds of it or more.



But, in reality the berserk chimera before his eyes was propagating itself with a force that could even destroy the ice coffin from inside using pressure――



「Propagation……haha, come to think of it, there is this organism called planarian huh. Even if they are cut, they will regenerate the same specimen isn't it?」



That was correct. Certainly the berserk chimera had taken in a lot of organisms. Not to mention animal and insect, it had also taken in plant and so on. Of course, it had also taken in a few human adult and child. And then a lot of planarian was added into that flesh.



Super regeneration wouldn't occur if there wasn't the flesh that became the base. Then, if that flesh was able to multiply automatically, wouldn't infinite regeneration become possible with that? This was the result of such experiment that was carried out with an idea that had gone past madness into exasperation.



The berserk chimera had not even a fragment of the souls of the animals and humans that became its base. What it had was a more primitive instinct. ――Only the instinct to eat and survive, that was all.



Kousuke shuddered while returning from his own thought back into reality, and right after that all the ice flowers were smashed.



「These guys here created something like this, just how are they planning to stop this thing when the time comes?」



What was truly frightening was the deed of man. The spirit of inquiry and tenacity, madness that pushed on ahead until the end of the road without considering the future or other people. Just like the magicians of the former world of another world's mad god――Ehitorujue that invited the destruction of themselves.



It would endanger the children if he burned this thing to ash. It was useless to freeze and smash it. If he slashed it then it would regenerate and multiply endlessly just as much as he slashed. Exterminating it using great firepower would endanger the children. If he was touched then it was game over.



However,



「Good grief. Just when I thought that I finally went home from a fantasy world, this side is also fantastical like this. It seems that I, no, we are deeply loved by the extraordinary huh.」



The expression of Kousuke who was shrugging with an air of "dear me" contained no despair. He also didn't despair to the possibility that he might not be able to save the children.



Why?



It was obvious.



「So you returned, me.」



「Yeah, I have returned, me.」



「I too, me.」



「Bernard……it was seriously just barely for him. That guy is really loved by the death god that it's a wonder he is able to survive until now y'know. But it looks like he is also loved as much by the god of fortune though.」



The berserk chimera had swelled up until twice, no, triple its former size while making a bizarre scream. And then the innumerable number of meat lumps that had already transformed into tiny berserk chimeras. Clones appeared at both sides and behind Kousuke while all those were surrounding them.



These were the clones that accompanied Bernard's group and the other squads.



The clone that reinforced Bernard had a faraway look. Its information was also shared with Kousuke's real body, so he also got a faraway look from the scene「you are already fantasy」where Bernard was continuously collecting death flags per second, though he was also continuously escaping from the hand of the god of death due to strong fortunes that came at him per second too.



GIIIIIIIIIIIIIH!!



A wave of flesh attacked at the same time with the shriek. Yes, it was a wave. The small chimeras were also adding on it, turning the attack into a greatly spreading wave that looked like a thick membrane. It spread out everywhere toward Kousuke and clones.



「Now then, the clones had also come back except of the one guarding Grant family, so let's settle this quickly. ……Haa, I actually don't want to use this thoughh. I rea~lly don't want to use this thoughh. But there is no time, and it's for the sake of the children. It can't be helped, huh.」



Kousuke that leaped on the roof of a large truck looked at his three clones that were at the three corners of the room. They were showing a wry smile, or possible a melancholic expression. He then took out something from his breast pocket.



That was a crimson jewel.



The shining jewel the size of a pinky had a metallic vine coiling around it, and it was linked with a thin chain. Kousuke wore that on his neck and then he gripped the crimson jewel tightly.



Perhaps the berserk chimera had its survival instinct stimulated by Kousuke's freezing magic, because ahead of his gaze there was its figure already swelling up until near the ceiling without stopping its regeneration and propagation. The case holding the children seemed tough, but surely it would reach its endurance limit soon. There could be no more postponement, they needed to be rescued even for a second faster.



Then, there was no way he could hesitate.



No matter how much Kousuke himself shirked from it. No matter how much compensation he would need to pay for it.



He liberated it.



That taboo power! It once caused even the demon king to raise an anguished voice, the true and tremendous power!



「Endure this, my willpower! Here we go! ――"Limit Break-"!!!」



Right after that, a crimson magic power burst out from Kousuke. The intense magic power spiraled and blew up violently as though it pierced the ceiling. Magic power and storm howled thunderously. Kousuke's figure was enveloped by the radiance of the demon king and became indistinct.



The berserker chimera pulled back the tentacles that it was going to stretch out. It was as though it was getting frightened of the existence before its eyes.



*Ki, GiiIIIH* The berserk chimera cried. A voice resounded toward it from inside the crimson tornado.



「O pitiful existence. Your time of liberation has come.」



That voice sounded as though it reverberated from the whole space. The crimson torrent was starting to converge, then a shadow of human appeared from inside the dazzling radiance.



The black silhouette took a step forward from the large truck. Naturally, it didn't fall down or anything. A ripple appeared midair and the shadow advanced on it.



「This abyss lord, will save thee.」



The raging magic power torrent dispersed in a flash. In exchange the crimson radiance was increasing in might and enveloped the shadow. The shadow swung one hand widely and turned his body magnificently. The shadow lowered one leg slightly, and his other hand moved toward his chest. His sunglasses glittered with a flash despite the impossible angle.



Shadow.



Yes,



「My name is Kousuke E Abyssgate-! The noble of the abyss, and the right hand of the demon king! The next patriarch of the head reaper rabbit (planned)-! I am the one that bring salvation and the end for thee! Now, welcome it with the shriek of heavy thunder!」



It was the abyss lord who was highly spirited more than usual!



The berserk chimera went, 'anyway, tentacles first!', it attacked following its instinct.



「EE―XCELLEENT-! No matter what is going on, it's a good thing to not hesitate.」(TN: The 'excellent' is said in broken English, 'eeekusereentoo')



The lord who finally used Western language called a clone to appear in front of him. The clone destructed the tentacles using "Enryuuga". Behind the clone that became a shield slashing down the tentacles, the lord pushed up his sunglasses sharply while continuing his words.



「Although, whether it will work or not is a different matter. Fix your eyes. At the true form of the endless abyss!」



Right after that, multiple presences were born. Further four clones were created fromthe clone that became the lord's shield.



Not only that. Beside the original three clones that were evacuating to the room's corners, four clones materialized at each of their sides.



Those four clones leaped toward the chimeras, at the same time, each clones created four clones midair. Those four clones created four more clones further. And from those four additional clones came further four clones. Four clones, to four clones, to four clones, to four clones-!



――Abyss Lord's Exclusive Limit Break Artifact "Last Zell(just don't use it at me okay?) Ver.2.1"



The last derivative skill of "Assassin" vocation, "Abyss Lord", originally it raised the foundation ability of the user, breaking the limit along with the passage of time. The crimson jewel that was bestowed from the demon king blew away this passage of time and forcefully multiplied the user's ability by five times.



And then, regarding this Abyss Lord's activation state――Kousuke divided it into five stages that he called as "Depth I" until "Depth V"――he would be able to create one more clone when he entered the state of Depth III, and when he entered the last Depth, the clones that originally could only be created by the main body of the abyss lord could then be created by the clones themselves too.



It would take a considerable time for Kousuke to reach this final Depth V, but Last Zell cleared away that limitation.



However, naturally there was compensation for it,



「「「「「「「「「「「The abyss is without end――」」」」」」」」」」」



The lord was multiplied to sixty four people almost within an instant. They charged from four directions, while saying something.



The tentacles stretched out from the small chimeras that were scattered everywhere inside the large underground parking area, and the tentacles that were launched from the main body, their number was already enough to form a cage of piercing spears that left no place to escape. Even if some of them got mowed down by the short sword shining with azure flame, it was a herculean task to handle all of them.



Half of the sixty-four lords were cut down within an instant. However,



「「「「「「「「「「「There is no end to the darkness of the hell」」」」」」」」」」」



At the next moment, more than 160 lords manifested. Using their skill and body, they became the shield for the clones behind them and cut open a path of survival.



「「「「「「「「「「「There is no hope to capture the abyss――」」」」」」」」」」」



The small chimeras widened the membrane of flesh in the attempt to swallow the lords. The attack with vast surface was already an area attack. The lords used other clones as stepping stones, or they threw the other to escape from the range of the membrane. The rest enveloped their body with Katon and launched kamikaze attack at the small chimeras.



「「「「「「「「「「「There is no meaning in touching the abyss――」」」」」」」」」」」



No matter how many of them were pierced, no matter how many of them were splashed with liquid, in the first place the clones weren't made of flesh despite having a solid body. There was no way the clones could be altered, the small chimeras were helpless against the overly extravagant suicide bombing skill.



「「「「「「「「「「「It's a pipe dream to destroy the abyss――」」」」」」」」」」」



The number of the lords that disappeared from suicide bombing already surpassed a hundred easily, however, by the time a beat or two beat passed, three hundred lords began attacking in waves.



「「「「「「「「「「「Despair to the resentful――」」」」」」」」」」」



They were pierced and vanished. Twice the number came back in their place.



They were pulverized and vanished. Twice the number came back in their place.



They were smashed and vanished. Twice the number came back in their place!



「「「「「「「「「「「Hope for those who searched――」」」」」」」」」」」



The small chimeras were reduced to ash in succession one by one with certainty by unceasing attacks that had no hesitation of making sacrifice. The berserk chimera was surrounded by more than three hundred lords and got its body thoroughly scraped off from the outside.



「「「「「「「「「「「O you that stand in our way, engrave into that body」」」」」」」」」」」



*GIIIIIII-*, the berserk chimera shrieked as though to drive away the terror it felt. It shrank its body for a moment, and right after that, it launched tentacles to every direction. What was different about it, was that all its tentacles that previously were as thick as a child's arm, were now reduced to the size of a finger.



It might sense the danger of being obliterated. It might be doing this to fulfill its survival instinct. It seemed to optimize its attack method toward the enemy.



The thin and sharp thrusts were appropriate to be called as an intense rain. They were assaulting straight ahead, from the ceiling, or circled from the floor. The flesh thrusts that might reach several thousand were a symbol of despair.



More than a hundred lords were terminated by that.



「「「「「「「「「「「Moan from the endless nightmare」」」」」」」」」」」



And so, it was opposed by a thousand lords.



They wielded a short sword of azure flame. Be that as it may, the weapon they utilized was their own body. Like a nightmare without end, each vanishing was filled with manifestation, and each time the number was increasing in an infinite hell. Even with Last Zell put into operation, it didn't change that he was in "Abyss Lord activated state", his spec that was continuously increasing finally outdone the propagation and regeneration speed of berserk chimera.



「「「「「「「「「「「We art, the incarnation of the abyss. The dream of darkness, the black ephemeral, everything―」」」」」」」」」」」



This was exactly, the right hand of the demon king.



This was exactly, the true form of the one that was said by his comrades as "actually the one who was nonchalantly in the level of humanity's strongest".



This was exactly, what accomplished that grand feat of inflicting a scratch at that demon king.



More than a thousand abyss lords launching unceasingly multiplying chuuni speech and gestu――not that, waves of attack without end!



「Lukewarm-. Do you think you can bring me down with something of that level! If you wish to drive away the abyss, then you need to bring at least a gatling railgun!」



The name of him who spoke of such absurdity, let's say it, one more time.



「Now-, this is the closing of the curtain! You can boast to king Yama in that world-. You can say, that the one who granted me my end is that person! Yes, it's by this me, Abisuuge―to-!」



The lord yelled his own name a bit like a native speaker (?), or rather his pronunciation sounded like his tongue got rolled up. The lord then crossed his arms with the short sword still in a reverse grip, his body bent forward with tension.



The small chimeras were already annihilated. The regeneration and propagation of the berserk chimera also couldn't catch up anymore, its body had been reduced until the size of a big truck.



Like that, one of the clones scraped off the flesh even while its body was pierced by tentacles. At that scraped place, a solid glitter could be seen faintly. Without any doubt, that was the case where the children were locked into.



「Gather-, my compatriots-. This is the time for salvation!」



The lord's order thundered. Several dozen clones lined up instantly in front of the lord and took the same stance.



The lords grinned broadly with fearlessness, and his eyes opened widely in a snap (Warning: It was done behind the sunglasses, so other people couldn't see it).



「Mine abyss, can you see through it? ――Abyss-style Martial Art - Attack Form Secret Finishing Move【Kokusou - Arashi Kage Ryuuha(Surging fang, shadow claw, know the nightmare of the dark abyss)】–!!」(TN: Black Phantom - Storm Shadow Flow Rending)



The abyss lords sprinted. They became a single vertical row and charged the berserk chimera.



The berserk chimera tried to launch its tentacles, it tried to leap to become a cannonball with its meat lump, but the clones at the front row handled it, and even if they couldn't handle it and vanished, the next lords would eliminate it.



And then, the clones that arrived at the berserk chimera in the blink of eye used their body to whittle the flesh wall and got annihilated. The following clones each recklessly hurled themselves to the berserk chimera and opened up a hole with certainty in one point of the flesh body!



It was a storm-like assault without any pause by the black shadows. That waves of attack that could be mistaken as a single great lance, it looked like, yes……



Jet Strea○ Attack!



At the next moment, a sound *boba-* came into hearing, and the flesh at the other side of the berserk chimera was blown away. At the same time, a lord flew out from there. A beat later, a case that was wrapped around with steel string flew out.



The lord rotated midair and swung his short sword at the case that was flying following him. The case was instantly split apart into pieces, and three screaming children flew out from there.



It seemed that they didn't faint even now after getting swallowed by the berserk chimera. Normally anyone would lose consciousness from excessive fear but……. What could be done now was only praying so they wouldn't get traumatized with this.



The lord along with his clones caught the children that were thrown out midair and landed lightly.



「Boy, it's safe already.」



「E, eh?」



The boy that was let down was looking around with greatly restless eyes due to his great confusion. And then, the boy witnessed the unrealistic scene of countless humans with the same appearance surrounding the berserk chimera and he exposed his shock with「EeEEEEH!?」.



The boy and girl that were let down by the clones beside him were also similarly flustered while in the verge of tears.



「Hmm. I guess this is a bit too intense for children. But, I ask you to be relieved. This nightmare is over already. I'm ending it!」



The lords spread out. At the center was the berserk chimera.



While the eyes of the boys and girl turned into dot, the lords simultaneously touched one hand on their sunglasses (of course, the stylish pushing up motion couldn't be forgotten), they averted half their body slightly behind, and then their other hand pointed quietly toward the berserk chimera.



「「「「「「「「「「「The sky of hell, the world of fabrication, the revolving black sun――」」」」」」」」」」」



That was a chanting. The only magic that the lord learned, the magic of destruction that once tear down the logic of the world.



「「「「「「「「「「「The night sky collapse, the star of calamity shine darkly. What is released is a fragment of abyss――」」」」」」」」」」」



A finishing move among finishing move that couldn't even be invoked by the lord if he wasn't in a state of Depth V.



「「「「「「「「「「「Converge, disintegrate, swallow without pause, smash without stopping――」」」」」」」」」」」



Sparks surged. It was a phenomenon of electrical discharge that looked like black lightning. It was generated with the berserk chimera as the center.



The berserk chimera launched its tentacles looking somewhat desperate, but the clones blocked them in front of the chanting lords and cut them down altogether.



「「「「「「「「「「「That is a world of interstice without light. The embrace of demise. The birth of new providence――」」」」」」」」」」」



And so, that thing propagating into the world, it destroyed even the Holy Precincts――the attack of the protector that brought about the dawn.



The main body of the lord made a beautiful turn that was without any meaning, and then along with a really magnificent pose, he spun the last sentence, and let it resound to the world.



「Be swallowed by the infinitude darkness and perish――Gravity magic ultimate secret art【Kokutenkyuu(black whirling darkness of abyss)】」(TN: Black Heaven Suffering)



At the center of the surging black sparks, a small black sphere manifested.



The sphere was whirling in disorder, right after that, it swelled up to a size with diameter of a meter and began to suck anything and everything at the surrounding with a fierce might. No, perhaps it should be said that rather than sucking, it was already twisting off the space altogether while compressing it to the center part.



――Gravity magic "Black Heaven Suffering"



It was the gravity magic's secret art that the liberator Miledy Raisen once used in order to save the world.



Compared to what she used, this magic here was a shoddy one where its immatureness was standing out. But, even so, here in this place it possessed enough strength to destroy this monster that could possibly regenerate and propagate if there was even just a fragment of its cell remaining――it was truly a legendary magic.



GIIH, GIIIIIIIIH!!



Perhaps that should be called as its shriek of death agony. The berserk chimera was pulled in as though the meat lump was crumbling from the edge, expulsed toward a world of super compression and destruction.



A beat.



The large truck that was entangled by stretched out tentacles so the berserk chimera wouldn't get pulled in, it was sucked in without any resistance and crushed by the pressure. In the end the berserk chimera became completely terminated.



The black celestial sphere shrunk before vanishing as though it melted into space. At the same time, the many clones also dispersed, as though to say that they had finished their role.



The end was very silent.



「……Onii-chan, who, are you?」



The boys and girl forgot their trembling, their crying, and also their huddling at each other. Their heart was stolen by a piece of legend before their eyes. One of them asked with a small voice toward the lord while still feeling astonished.



The lord looked back over his shoulder. The gaze of the little children turned toward him.



The lord went「fuh」toward them, and then he answered while sharply pushing up his sunglasses.



「Oneself? I am…………just a hero, that you can find anywhere.」



Thinking that it would be inappropriate to say things like "demon king" or "abyss" toward the cornered children, the lord answered after showing a thinking gesture for a while. Hearing that, for a moment the children looked puzzled and they looked at each other's face.



But, the next moment, they showed a smile that was like a blooming flower. It was the greatest sparkling bright smile, one that children would show toward a hero just like in a movie. It was a smile that was overflowing with conviction, that hero certainly existed, with admiration, and with hope filling their heart――it was the greatest reward there was for a hero.



The lord that received that――crumbled down right after.



「O, Onii-chan!?」



「Hero-san!」



「Ninja-lookalike something-san!」



The children rushed in panic toward the lord that abruptly fell on all four with his head hanging down. And then, their face approached looking worried and they heard that whisper.



「Hahah fuhihih, I messed up saying "oneself". Even I don't understand what I'm saying……it hurts, my heart hurts~」



The children lifted their face and exchanged gaze once more. Even though they had no words, but what they wanted to say was conveyed to each other clearly.



That was,



――Just what is hero?



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



When I wrote in high spirits, the number of letters become like this……



I will post one more chapter today or tomorrow.



=>Was what I thought, but I forgot my Sunday work……



I'm sorry, looks like the update will be like usual.



I also wrote this in my activity report, but Overlap-sama's homepage is uploaded with the newest chapter of the comic version.



Kick rabbit is really bad news.



If you are interested, please go take a look without fail.



Also, it's also uploaded at the homepage, but volume 4 seem to be for sale.



Please treat it well.



It seems the next update will be at 6 P.M. Saturday too.





Chapter 220-221




*go-go-go* That sound that sounded like earth rumbling, and impact sound *DON-* that resounded until the bottom of stomach could be heard.



And then the one who screamed cutely「Hyaah」to that while hopping *pyon* was Emily who was chasing after Professor Down.



Vanessa who was running beside Emily wasn't perturbed at all. Perhaps also because it was just the two of them right now, Vanessa was currently in the cool beauty Vanessa-san mode like when they met for the first time. Seeing Vanessa like that, Emily looked down feeling a little embarrassed.



「An expression of shyness――priceless.」



「Aa, yep. Even when you are in work mode, but the inside is still Danessa.」



While the sound of *gan-gan-* from the shoes hitting the metal floor was resounding, Emily made a dry smile at Vanessa who was saying that kind of thing with a crisp expression.



「At any rate, Kousuke-san is really going at it flashily.」



「You're right. That must be just how absurd that berserker is.」



「A lump of meat――just what in the world, that……」



Emily spoke her deduction to Vanessa's whisper. That was the same with the answer that Kousuke reached personally. It was a deduction that showed the depth of human's sin.



The berserker chimera that possessed the ability of regeneration and propagation that human in general couldn't possibly stand a chance against, when Vanessa heard the true identity of it, her expression moved slightly. That wasn't because she was worried for Kousuke, but it was something that was directed to Emily who could talk about her deduction so calmly.



「I understand now that it has absurd abilities but……Doctor Grant, you don't look like you are particularly worried.」



Emily felt the glance of Vanessa toward her, however, Emily replied without averting her gaze from straight ahead.



「I'm worried. No matter how strong Kousuke is, there are many ways things can possibly go wrong. He might get injured, and it was the first time I saw Kousuke that angry, so I'm also feeling uneasy that he might do something reckless.」



「Is, that so?」



Even so Emily looked relatively calm. Vanessa tilted her head at that. Seeing Vanessa like that, Emily smiled wryly while continuing to speak「But」.



「Even so, that person……is my hero after all.」



That was why, she believed. That no matter what kind of difficulty he encountered, no matter what kind of irrationality he was exposed to, no matter what kind of pinch he fell into, at the end he would surely overcome it all and fulfilled his promise. He would save the children, liberate that pitiful existence from the wedge of this world, sent flying that mercenary who was rotten to the core, and then rushed to her side. Yes, she believed.



「That's why, I, I have to do what I ought to do. I have come here by acting selfishly. I cannot afford to be flustered or anything. Looking back will be an insult to Kousuke who believed in me and sent me ahead.」



「……」



Vanessa kept sending sidelong glances at Emily. And then, she nodded「yep yep」as though she understood something.



「Doctor Grant.」



「What?」



Emily stared straight ahead and advanced without hesitation. A smile emerged on Vanessa's lips while she spoke.



「You are a good woman. Surely Kousuke-san too will accept you. Leave the hotel reservation to me.」



「Bufuh!? Wha, what are you meowtering out!? Really, what are you meowtering, Danessa!」



Emily slid down due to the flow of the talk that suddenly went toward a vulgar direction. She almost kissed the floor lightly. She stood up in a hurry and started running once more, then with a reddening face she glared piercingly at Danessa. She prepared the firing of her cat punch.



Although, the Vanessa in question was making a puzzled expression instead. That irritated Emily excessively.



「Doctor Grant. In movie or film, at the last scene the main character will kiss or bed the heroine. In the case this time too, it will be the best if it's concluded with Kousuke-san and Doctor Grant acting a passionate bed scene. Leave about the scene recording to this me, Vanessa.」



「Be be be be be, bed scene!? Idiot-. Danessa you idiot-! There is no way we will do something like that! No, I'm not saying that we will never do it but……that, I only thought a little about it, like 'I too someday will~', but if I'm asked by Kousuke it's not like I'll refuse……wait that's wro――ng-! That's not it! Or rather, what's with you! What do you mean recording huh! Just what kind of position!」



「Any kind of event need to have memento about it left behind. So please feel relieved. I'll also participate at the middle. A sticky and wet, passionate threeso――」



「Don't say anymore than that-!」



Emily howled. Her straight-man skill was already reached the maximum number. At the same time a cat punch was let flew. That punch which was unleashed under the straight-man skill splendidly bored on Danessa's cheek.



「? Why, was I punched?」



「This person is hopeless already. I have to ask Kousuke, to turn you into a splendid villager.」



Surely Vanessa was gifted with the skill Serious Breaker. Emily who was feeling disheartened resolved herself to use the final option.



Like that they advanced forward, passed through several doors, and before long the two of them came out into a passage with a waterway in it. It seemed they had passed underground from the research facility and came out to the water purification facility.



They passed a place that had several things that seemed to be pipe and tank lined up, then the two of them put their hand on the door in front of them. Vanessa made Emily to back away while she entered inside the room.



That room seemed to be a room where under the floor was wholly dedicated to be a water tank. Half of the room was used to placed machineries, while at the other side of the fence became a watering place.



Perhaps this was a place to temporarily store the water that was flowing from the waterway. It seemed that it was being opened right now, so under the floor was fierce water current that was flowing toward somewhere.



It was a vertically long room, so they could see a stair that continued to upper floor, a passage, and then a door. The door of the second floor was located at the southern end of the room, and there was a bridge-style passage that connected both doors.



Emily and Vanessa sent their gaze toward the door of that second floor――



「Ah, teache――」



「Doctor Grant-」



There was a flapping lab coat. It was clear whose coat it was. Emily was trying to call out because Down's figure had vanished to the other side of the door. However, Vanessa pulled Emily closer to her cautiously.



Right after that, *gan-* a loud voice entered their ears. Something fell behind Emily and Vanessa, in front of the door they had just gone through. When they looked back in surprise, there was a large rectangle case the size of a Boston bag there. It was the other thing that Down carried along with a leather bag when he escaped. It seemed that he threw it at the timing when Emily and Vanessa entered the room.



The sound *batan-* of the door at the second floor closing resounded.



At that moment,



「「「「「KIIIIIIIIIIIII-」」」」」



Such cries struck the two's eardrums, at the same time, the case bloated up from inside and it was destroyed. It seemed that it wasn't made from a material that was really tough in the first place, the cracks spread in the blink of eye and the clasp snapped.



Instantly, something leaped out and attacked Emily and Vanessa. Vanessa covered Emily behind her while she fired.



However, that creature's speed wasn't normal, also its movement was strangely irregular, and so the bullet Vanessa fired missed.



That creature kicked on the floor and leaped toward the face right away, however Vanessa only narrowed her eyes quietly without even any agitation. Her long leg kicked up vertically to deal with it.



*go-* The thing was kicked up together with the vivid sound of bone breaking, it then twirled midair while it then crashed on the floor some distance away.



「That is……a monkey.」



「Seems like it. It looks like an adult, but seeing that case's size, it seems that before this it was an infant monkey.」



A bullet struck the infant monkey in a flash when it slowly stood up. The moment it raised its face, a splendid headshot finished the berserker animal――Berserker Monkey, and like that it crumbled down and white smoke rose from its corpse.



However, they couldn't let their guard down. The reason was the existences that spread out to surround the two of them――the Berserker Monkeys still numbered four in total.



「Strange.」



「……Indeed. Doctor Grant. Please back down slowly until the wall. Toward that gap between the machine and the pillar.」



Vanessa guessed the meaning of Emily's mutter and she increased her cautiousness to maximum while slowly backing away as though to make herself to be a shield.



Yes, they had the leeway to back away. The berserkers that should rush ahead following their instinct were taking a fixed distance from Vanessa and Emily, as though they were observing the situation, or they were being careful.



Actually these Berserker Monkeys had wariness toward danger instilled inside them using a method like the Pavlov dog experiment. It was an experiment to make berserkers that would only rush forward foolhardily would cope to a certain degree toward firearms. Seeing gun muzzle and hearing gunshot, those conditions along with the awareness that "something painful would come flying" at the same time were planted into them.



It could be seen whether the experiment failed or not from this. The four berserker monkeys were surrounding Vanessa and Emily, their wariness was plain to see, however they also didn't retreat due to their instinctual belligerence or their desire to eat.



Vanessa made Emily to withdraw to the gap between a machine and a pillar before she pulled the trigger as though to say that she didn't give a damn to that wariness.



However, the berserker monkeys who tried all they could to not stand in front of the gun muzzle were already out of the firing line by the time the trigger was pulled.



「So this mean that even without antidote, the progress of converting the drug into weapon is advancing steadily isn't it.」



Even an expert marksman like Vanessa couldn't hit the target easily in front of the berserker monkeys that were taking evasive action with all their strength by using their beastly agility.



*gachin-* Such sound rang out and the gun's chamber was fixed in place still in a slid-out position. It ran out of bullet.



As though aiming for that moment, the berserker monkeys went out in attack simultaneously.



Vanessa was in danger――was how it seemed but,



「An agent of the security bureau isn't so soft that they can be taken off guard by the likes of monkey.」



That muttered words were the truth. Vanessa's hand thrust out smoothly toward one of the assaulting monkeys, and the moment that hand made contact, the monkey was blown away to another direction.



And then Vanessa stepped forward without pause and threw the empty gun magazine he had taken out. A berserker monkey rapidly approaching from the left was checked with that before Vanessa crouched down swiftly and launched a fierce upper roundhouse kick.



By crouching down, the berserker monkey that approached from the right lost sight of its target and it sailed over above Vanessa's head, the monkey that leaped from the front received a fierce roundhouse kick that sprang from a blind spot and got blown away.



The left berserker monkey that got checked by the empty magazine came flying with time difference. Vanessa had recovered her posture by that time and she thrust out her arm once more.



The berserker monkey opened its mouth with a shriek *kiiii-*, however, at the next moment, the moment felt a faint touch on its arm but at the same time its field of vision reversed up-down and it fell into panic. When it noticed, it received a severe impact on its back and it was staring at the ceiling.



And then, a gun muzzle cut into its field of vision. The sense of danger instilled into it ordered to evaded but――too slow. *pan-* A light sound rang, and with it a wind hole opened in the berserker monkey's forehead.



The berserker monkey that was the first to be blown away to another direction was going along the ceiling and assaulted from overhead.



But, as expected it couldn't reach. A hand that thrust out with a flowing motion softly touched the berserker monkey's head as though in a caress, and the next moment it was forced into a backflip with fierce momentum. Even the physical ability of monkey was in vain and the berserker monkey got crashed on the ground. It then met the same fate with the previous monkey.



Without even any time to wake up, a shot to the head splattered its brain.



The last monkey moved as though it crawled on the ground to bite at Vanessa's leg. In a moment, a knee fell down. Perhaps because of its instinct, the berserker monkey leaped to the side right away but its wrist was grasped.



Its wrist was twisted and its joint was instantly locked. For a berserker that didn't feel pain, it was possible for it to shake off the hold without balking at getting a broken bone, but even so for a few moments it couldn't avoid to move following the limit of its body mobility. And then, the berserk monkey's vector of inertia and center of gravity were directed at that instant and it quickly got pressed down with its face pressing on the floor.



A knee fell on its back to stop it from moving. Because the right point was pressed, it had no room to use its physical strength. And then, it wasn't given the chance to even struggle. *gorit-* The gun muzzle pressed on the back of its head fired its bullet with no hesitation.



「With this it's all of them.」



Vanessa's sharp gaze ran through the surrounding.



What she used was technique of jujitsu and aikido. Vanessa's body was that of a female. No matter how much she tried to deny, it was a fact that her pure physical strength was inferior to male. That was why she polished numerous techniques based on 'soft and fair goes far'.



What about powerful offensive ability? A single bullet would serve for that purpose. No matter how muscular the opponent was, even if it was against a monster, she could knock them down unquestionably if only one of her hand could touch them, and then for the rest she just needed to pull the trigger.



This was the strength of Vanessa who was said to be at the top level in close-quarter combat among the agents that belonged under the security bureau. Even though recently she was called as Danessa a lot, but her strength was the real thing.



――That was exactly the reason, he created this moment because he didn't underestimate the people of the security bureau by any means. The moment when Vanessa was away from the protection target.



「Agent, protect her if you can.」



「-, Doctor Grant!」



Unnoticed, Down's face peeked out from the door at the second floor with a gun muzzle aiming. ――Toward none other than Emily.



Vanessa leaped in front of Emily as though she was flying. It was at the same time when Down fired.



A dry bursting sound rang consecutively. Vanessa's body jerked. Fresh blood scattered in a splat and dirtied Emily's cheek.



「Kahah, gaa, a」



「Vanessa-」



Vanessa crashed on the ground and rolled several times. She then tried to stand up right away, yet the impact clogging her lungs made her unable to breath well, and she could only crouch from the intense pain cruising through her whole body where she was unable to move.



Emily whose facial expression changed rushed to her. She made Vanessa to face up and embraced her inside her arms. Blood could be seen flowing from her shoulder, arm, and thigh, but Emily couldn't see any blood from the torso that got shot the first. Even while panicking, Emily took off the suit's jacket and took a look. There she saw four bullets squashed inside a bulletproof vest that blocked those bullets.



It seemed that the bulletproof jacket barely saved her life. Although, putting aside the gunshot wound in her arm and shoulder, the bleeding at her thigh was at the level that couldn't be left alone. Most likely an important artery was grazed there.



「As I thought, I'm no good in something like this. Just what do I need to do to get a headshot I wonder?」



Footsteps rang while Down advanced on the upper passage of the second floor. He stopped at the middle and aimed his gun while staring at the defeated berserker monkeys. There wasn't any particular strong feeling that could be felt from his words and voice, whether from shooting a person or aiming a gun at Emily. Emily bit her lip strongly from that.



But, right now wasn't the time to complain. Emily took out a container that looked like an experiment vial from her breast pocket. She opened the lid and made Vanessa drank half while she poured the remaining bit by bit at the wounds.



Immediately the blood that was flowing out like river was clearly lessening. Vanessa's pained breathing was also recovering its regularity slightly.



「……My god. Emily. Emily, by any chance, you have improved Berserk in this short time? Or else, is that a product of an idea that you don't tell to anyone even to me? As expected, you are really outrageous.」



Down's eyes were shining ominously at the unknown medicine that was displaying recovery ability that was impossible for the existing medicine.



Although, his deduction was completely off the mark.



What Emily used was a healing medicine of another world that Kousuke handed to her in preparation of the worst case. As expected, its effect couldn't give a complete recovery until the bullets remaining inside the body were taken out, but it was able to at least stop the bleeding completely, softened the pain, and healed to a certain degree.



Vanessa didn't look like she could move properly, even so she conveyed that she was okay with her gaze. Emily sighed in relieve.



And then, her gaze struck at Down who was looking down at them from the second floor. It was a calm gaze, however a rage that couldn't be hidden was dwelling there.



「Teacher. You shot at me there. Without any hesitation.」



「……That's right. However, I want you to not misunderstand. I wasn't trying to kill you there. For a researcher like me to stop that security bureau's agent, I have no other what than that.」



Down who thought that he wouldn't be able to shake off the pursuit from the beginning implemented a strategy that used berserker monkeys to separate Emily from the troublesome bodyguard, and then he shot at Emily so Vanessa would cover her without any leeway to dodge or counterattack.



In other words, because he had no confidence that he would be able to snipe Vanessa, he did it in a way so Vanessa herself would be the one that entered his line of fire.



Although, that didn't change that Emily was in his line of fire. If Vanessa didn't make it in time then there was no proof that Emily would be safe.



「But, it's fine in its own wy even if I got shot. Isn't that right?」



「……I didn't want you to die is a fact.」



It seemed that it would be fine if she was just alive. But even that was suspicious if it was true or not in this situation.



「Teacher, please tell me your motive. I came here in order to listen to that. Surely, it will be meaningless, and nothing that I have lost will come back, but……even so, I want to listen to your true feeling. Teacher-, this five years that you spend with me, with all of us, is there any meaning in it? Do we mean anything to you? The thing that you want to obtain even by betraying all of us, just what in the world is it?」



That question was said calmly, but it sounded as though she was going to vomit blood.



Weren't they a family? Wasn't he saved her when she was cornered? Didn't he love her? The five years they had spent together since that day, when she was welcomed as family, were all that a lie? Was it something so light, that he could easily betray and abandon them?



Down looked down. Her gaze toward Emily was calm, but there was darkness somewhere in it. He kept aiming his gun without letting his guard down. And then, he answered.



「What I want to obtain, is it? Indeed, it's a meaningless question. But, if you want to know that then I'll tell you. You see, Emily, I merely want to leave behind my name in history.」



「Leave behind name, in history?」



「That's right. Some people has their name entered into the textbook to be read by the future generation, I want to become that kind of human. I want to stay behind in the memory of the people forevermore as a historically great character. Do you understand?」



「For, for something like that……」



「As I thought, you don't understand.」



Perhaps, there was some kind of reason that left him with no choice but to do something like that. Perhaps there was no other way for him to abandon them for the sake of something important that he couldn't let go no matter what. Those kinds of fleeting thought were now splattered with mud and thrown away by Emily.



Emily trembled, perhaps from anger, or perhaps from frustration. Down made a troubled smile.



「Surely you don't understand. The fear of being a human that doesn't matter whether they exist or not, or the emptiness of being forgotten, or the hopelessness to vanish without leaving behind any proof of leaving.」



「Such thing-, that kind of thing-. There is no way that teacher is, a person who doesn't matter whether you exist or not! Just who in the world can forget you!? Me!? My seniors!? Lizzi-nee!? Everyone of Down classroom, they are going to forget you!? There is no way such thing will happen! Aren't we who have received your teaching-, the proof of your life!?」



A scream that sounded like a pleading reverberated. But, even those words only made Down gave a troubled smile, he then shook his head slowly.



「It's not something like that Emily. It's not that kind of a small story. I said it right? I want to leave my name in history. It's no good with only the personal memory of you all. Something like that, cannot erase this terror, this despair, this emptiness inside me.」



「You are……」



Her words, her feeling, they didn't go through. Emily understood that from seeing Down's eyes.



Just what in the world was driving him until like this? Emily couldn't understand that.



The person called Reginald Down was born in an average family, he graduated the university with excellent result, he entered the path of researcher, encountered his wife, became a lecturer, his wife died from a sickness, he welcomed distressed students, and sent out a lot of excellent disciples to the outside world. Emily heard such story from Down.



Was there any factor somewhere in that life that drove him to madness?



「You cannot understand? I guess that's how it is for you. Even if other people can understand, but Emily, you surely cannot understand it.」



「Why, do you say that?」



「Because, you are a genius.」



「Eh?」



Emily Grant was a genius. That was why it was impossible for her to understand Reginald Down for eternity.



Emily was dumbfounded hearing that statement of Down. She felt as though her whole self was denied. Emily who was lonely because she was a genius, the one who taught her that such thing was irrelevant was none other than Down. But now he discarded Emily because she was a genius.



「You won't understand the feeling of a mediocre person who saw off the back of a genius. That what someone can achieve, it's decided by the ability that person is provided with from the start.」



「But, but teacher, you are an excellent educator even throughout the university, even the other professors respected teacher――」



「That's because I'm a mediocre person. Because I'm mediocre, I understand just what it is that someone doesn't understand. I understand what need to be done so they can understand. I have been kept searching, that's why I understand what other people search. I understand what makes anyone happy, and what I need to do to push the back of other. That's because all of those were also paths that I myself had gone through. That's all.」



Down sighed deeply and he looked at somewhere far away with empty eyes while continuing his words that sounded like he was talking to himself.



「No matter how many efforts I piled up, the geniuses are clearing over all those efforts easily. When I thought of one idea, they will already create a hundred ideas and produced result. Just how much emptiness I felt each time that happened, is surely something that they don't understand.」



Surely what was reflected inside his eyes, were the figure of his students who were already graduated and got recognized in society.



Emily didn't understand. Every time teacher saw the seniors that came out in television or magazine, he would make a proud expression. He would be happy as though it was about himself. Were all of those just acting?



Was he actually boiling with emotion of hatred and jealousy, that he should be the one that got praised, that he should be the one that was granted with glory?



「Even so, they would speak that I am their teacher, and that somehow consoled my heart. Having all of them, including you Emily and everyone in Down classroom, adoring me as "the educator Reginald Down", it supported me. It gave me acceptance and a small satisfaction, that it's enough with this.」



His affection was the real thing. His feeling of wanting to become other's strength was true. Even if he couldn't stand at the front stage, but Down was able to maintain his self by doing that. The trust and gratitude of his students somehow diverted Down from his dirty vanity that should be called as a deep-rooted delusion.



「Then, why?」



「Isn't that obvious? That was because Berserk was created.」



A hitch leaked out from Emily's mouth.



「Berserk, was?」



「Yes, Berserk. Emily, you are without a doubt a genius. That is a miraculous drug. It change human, into something that is not human, aa, that's right. It's a miracle! Just how much application can be found from it if it's continued to be researched! The result is clear! It will be a revolution of the world!」



「Te, teacher……」



Down put one hand on his temple in excitement and laughed loudly. That figure was truly abnormal. The figure of the kind and gentle Down inside Emily's memory was vanishing.



「There is no doubt! This is a great exploit that will leave the name in history! All those results left behind by all my students until now are just like trash in front of Berserk! You will become a historical character! And I am the father of that! I will leave my name as the father of revolution! Do you understand!? ――No, surely you don't understand. That's why, in front of this miracle you were able to say a bullshit like『This is dangerous so let's destroy it』-」



「-」



*pan-* With a dry sound, the floor nearby Emily burst open. The excited Down unconsciously shot. Down went 'hah' at the bursting sound he made and he readjusted his breathing and then he made a gentle smile with a disgusting easiness.



「I got flustered at that time. No matter how much I explained to you about the "possibility" of Berserk, you won't change your decision to destroy it. If I tried too hard at persuading you, I'll lose your trust and my standing as "father". There also wasn't any leeway timewise. After all I didn't know when you will erase the data.」



「That was why, you took it out?」



「That's right. There is my disciple at the leadership of Gamma Pharmaceutical, and I relied on him. But never in my wildest dream I thought that it would be an underworld organization that has this kind of facility though. I thought it was the will of heaven. Finally, the time to be rewarded has come even to this me who continued to only perform service for other people.」



But, it couldn't go that easily. No matter how much he researched the stolen data and drug, he was unable to create the antidote. The research about Berserk's use as weapon was producing data and application method to some degree, but the plan of Kaysis and others to scatter Berserk themselves before selling the antidote was quickly coming to an impasse.



They also could only do extremely simple thing with the application too, he was unable at all to create something that would shake the world as a "miraculous drug".



No matter what he was lacking the decisive something to create those.



Yes, he lacked the existence of Emily Grant who was the creator.



「The first incident, those police officers, and then agent Warren too, they were all people under Kaysis. Isn't that right? Everything was all to corner me and direct me so I could only rely on teacher. In order to make me research and develop Berserk by my own will.」



「Exactly. It was going well until the middle but……. Really, they were all doing needless things. Whether it's the security bureau, and also Rod and Dennis too.」



*pakit-* There was the sound of something snapped. It came from inside Emily's chest. It was the sound of something important, something really important snapping and then broke.



Scenes were resurrected in her mind. The nightmare that she absolutely couldn't forget.



――Milo-oniichan died. He was ran over by a berserker, as though he got hit by a truck.



――Sam-oniichan died. He was reduced into a berserker in the end.



――Jessica-oneechan died. Her neck was snapped by the gentle Sam-oniichan.



――Dennis-oniichan died. In order to avoid getting transformed into berserker, he shot his own head.



――Rod-oniichan died. While he was apologizing 'sorry".



And then,



――Hendricks-oniichan died. In order to protect Emily and everyone else.



She thought of him as her real older brother. He was slow in some area, but he was sincere, and gentle, a person that was like a pleasant breeze. There wasn't anyone that could ease the heart by being at their side like him.



――Lizzie-nee died. In order to hide Emily. She made herself as a bait.



She was someone Emily idolized. Sometimes she wasn't honest, but there wasn't any other woman that was gentle and lovely like her. She saw a dream. The scene of Hendricks and Lizzie who she liked very much getting wedded with each other, smiling with happiness.



She believed.



That everyone in Down classroom would someday be able to witness such lovely sight.



All of those――



「So it was I, that pulled the trigger.」



「Hm?」



Emily averted her gaze from Down who tilted his head and she slowly stood up. Vanessa called at Emily with a small voice that was still pained, but Emily only smiled fleetingly and averted her eyes from her.



「Do, Doctor, Grant-. You, cannot. That's-」



「I'm sorry, Vanessa.」



Vanessa couldn't hope for a complete recovery with bullets still remaining inside her body. Her internal organs that received four shots, although the bleeding could be stopped, but her broken bones still weren't healed. Therefore, it was the best she could do to reach out her hand that was trembling from enduring the intense pain. Yet she failed to grasp, at Emily's hand.



「Can you not move, Emily?」



Down aimed the gun muzzle at the standing up Emily once more.



「If possible, I don't want to kill you. Even what happened at Hendricks and others was just an unfortunate accident, it wasn't something that I wished for. That's why, you obediently――」



「I, pulled your trigger.」



Emily mutters cut off Down's words. Her figure with her head hanging down looked really sorrowful. Her worn-out lab coat seemed to be the representation of her heart.



Down seemed like he didn't understand the meaning of Emily's words and he tilted his head once more. Emily continued her heavy and dark words toward him.



「You, weren't simply a virtuous person. Inside your heart, there was madness nesting there all this time. A conceit that is far, far stronger than other people, a heart that is wishing for praise, were gnawing inside you.」



「……」



「Everyone suppressed those down. The many seniors, everyone of Down classroom, your family. Despite so, I broke that. The trigger that you wanted to pull but you managed to hold back from, I pulled it――I awakened, the erserk that was inside you right from the beginning.」



「So, there was Berserk in me right from the start. Now you really said it, Emily.」



It was unclear, just how the expression of Emily who raised her face slowly should be described as. She looked troubled, she looked as though she would cry anytime now, or she looked like she was resolved of something――it was a strangely transparent expression.



「I was the one that pulled the trigger that awakened the monster, that's why――that's why, I will be the one that pull the trigger too for ending it.」



「……You will, shoot me?」



There was a small handgun in the hand that Emily lifted. It was Vanessa's spare gun. It seemed that Emily pulled it out when she was standing up. From behind her, Vanessa yelled「You must not, Doctor Grant!」with a hoarse voice.



「Emily. You will shoot, me who you saw as father? This me who rescued you?」



「Yes. I'll shoot. I, will end you.」



「For revenge?」



「No. It's for your own sake. And then, for my sake. Surely.」



「……I see.」



The two who once called each other as father and daughter, were now aiming gun at each other.



There wasn't any undulation of great emotion that could be seen from their crossing gazes. But, surely they were holding emotions that couldn't be expressed with words like an explosive that was in the verge of exploding. Perhaps it wasn't just Emily who was like that, but Down too.



「Then it can't be helped. Sayonara, Emily.」



「Yes, sayonara. Teacher.」



The triggers, were pulled. Dry bursting sound thundered.



At the same time, a shadow sprang out to the air. *kin-* A metallic sound resounded.



The bullet was bisected into two. The split up bullet greatly diverted from the target and pierced the wall behind.



「Ko, Kousuke?」



A shadow landed down lightly. That was without a doubt, the catching up Kousuke.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



It will finish with just about two more chapters.



It will make me happy if you readers can enjoy it until the end.



AN: This is the second posting for today.



With a short sword in hand, Kousuke stood between Emily and Down.



Kousuke was staring at Emily right from the front.



Yes, Kousuke split apart the fired bullet in midair, was to protect Down behind him. What he cut was Emily's bullet.



「Ko, Kousuke……why-」



Emily questioned with the gun still raised in her trembling hand.



Kousuke slowly walked forward without any words, he didn't even glance at Down behind him. And then, when he arrived until in front of Emily who was shaking her head left and right, he put his hand softly on the gun barrel and gently lowered it down.



「Stop it, Emily. This is not your role.」



A calm voice and a composed gaze enveloped Emily.



But, Kousuke felt a slight resistance at his hand that was put on the gun barrel. Emily was rejecting it. He could see a tragic resolve inside the eyes of Emily who was shaking her head left and right.



Kousuke didn't know. About the words exchanged between Emily and Down.



Even so he was able to guess. Just with what kind of feeling Emily pulled the trigger. Just with what kind of feeling, she directed a killing intent at the man who she thought as a teacher and also a substitute of father.



Surely she felt hatred. Surely she also felt resentment. But, her act didn't come only from being captured by those kinds of negative emotions and ended in madness.



Inside her eyes there was a sense of purpose. Or possibly a sense of duty. And then a sense of responsibility.



Kousuke smiled wryly in his heart, thinking that it was like Emily. Even so his hand didn't let go from Emily's gun that refused to be lowered.



「Kousuke-, this is something that I started, that's why-. That's why-」



「Is that really so? I don't think so though. Well, even so if that's what Emily yourself think, then I won't really deny it. However, the end of this path is no good. It's not a destination where Emily should go.」



He wouldn't let her go through the path of murder. Kousuke responded with a feeling that was equally strong with the feeling Emily held.



Even so, Emily was about to object further, but Kousuke added his words.



「Because, that's something that run counter to the wish of Emily's big brothers and sisters right?」



「-」



Yes, no one was demanding this kind of conclusion from Emily. Even though Kousuke had never met them, even though he had never exchanged words with them, but just from hearing Emily's story, it was something obvious to Kousuke.



There was no way they who risked their life to protect their important little sister would wish for this.



「Emily's dream, is to save those who are suffering sickness right?」



She wished to heal her grandmother. Emily's step that was starting from such wish, surely it was them who were rooting for it more than anyone.



「They should believe, more than anyone. Emily's hand, it isn't something to hurt others. It's something to heal, to save others.」



That was why, not a single one of them blamed Emily for creating the drug of madness. They didn't escape by saying that it was unrelated with them. They understood that it was an outrageous situation, yet they didn't leave Emily's side by any means.



That was why,



「My bad, but I'm not going to allow this yeah? I absolutely won't allow only this. No matter how strong Emily's will is, I'll stop you with my all. Endo Kousuke, the right-hand man of the demon king and also your protector, this me will stop you with my whole body and soul. Emily Grant has reached this far by doing her best to save others. Something like the closing of curtain by such a girl murdering someone who was family, I won't let that happen.」



「Kou, suke……」



Strength left Emily's hand. *gatan* A sound rang. The handgun that slipped unhindered from Emily's hand, it fell on the floor.



Surely there wasn't any way to express the overflowing emotion inside her. All the words that existed in this world were too inadequate for that. She wondered, just how many times this body, this heart had been protected. When she needed it, a help would be given to her then without fail, by Emily Grant's hero.



Softly, Emily's head leaned on Kousuke's chest. *drop, drop* The falling tears on the floor were surely the result of her emotion that couldn't be worded appearing in a definite shape.



Kousuke gently put his hand on the head of Emily who was burying her face on his chest while trembling. He exchanged gaze with Vanessa who was relieved while still lying down on the floor and they nodded at each other.



「……So even that berserker cannot stop you. I'm keenly feeling the irrationality of your existence thoroughly.」



Down said that with an astonished expression. He wasn't running away or shooting while Kousuke and Emily were talking. Kousuke turned a suspicious gaze at Down who was like that.



「You aren't running away?」



「Will you let me run away?」



Down replied so while smiling bitterly. There wasn't any hostility, or fluster and desperation that were particular for a cornered person that could be seen from him. Kousuke's gaze narrowed in wonder of what this person was thinking. And what bothered him above all, was the reason why Down didn't shoot.



At that time, Kousuke only cut Emily's bullet. He used gravity magic to suck in the bullet toward his blade and slashed the bullet that shifted slightly. Naturally, he planned to use his kunai to repel the bullet that he thought would approach from behind him but……



In the first place, Down didn't pull his trigger at that time. Down had no intention of killing Emily.



「Just what in the world you are planning?」



「Of course, I'm thinking about myself. I have been thinking only about myself since I stole Berserk.」



Kousuke thought that perhaps, by any chance Down actually hesitated to shoot because of his affection toward Emily, but it seemed that wasn't it. Down's calm and composed gaze and voice seemed even more eerie.



「……I don't know what you are thinking, but for now, surrender.」



「Oho, you won't kill me?」



「I just don't want Emily to lose more person close to her. ……Even if that person is only "formerly" close to her, or even if that person is an unforgivable traitor.」



If Kousuke had to say more, he also had the calculation of wanting to hand over the case's ringleader to Chief Magdanese. Kousuke thought that it would be also necessary for Emily's life from here on that there was the result of "the culprit was captured" regarding the【Berserk Case】that shaken the world.



Kousuke's words caused Emily to raise her face from his chest and she looked at Down. Her gaze was certainly wishing not for Down's death, but for him to be judged by the administration of justice.



Down listened at Kousuke's words, and then he saw Emily's gaze before he sighed deeply.



「Haa, really, nothing has gone well at all. Perhaps this is also because I'm mediocre.」



Saying that, Down took one, two steps back. Kousuke leaped out without any question. He would hold him down and then robbed him of his consciousness. With the danger of Berserk, it was a great concern even to just speak at him.



When Kousuke stepped at the second floor's passage, it was at the same time when Down fell into the water reservoir from his back. Emily reflexively yelled「Teacher-」.



Kousuke jumped in to overtake Down and caught him midair. But, when he tried to hover midair, his body lurched forward with a jerk. Kousuke launched a steel string from his sleeve in panic to seize the handrail of the passage and he dangled down.



Kousuke's movement was lacking in luster. Originally he should be able to make Down unconscious before he could jump down, but he was unable to do that was because of the effect of the previous battle.



The rapid Limit Break by using Last Zell. Naturally, he was unable to escape from the side effect. Currently Kousuke was in the middle of a remarkable weakening. He was unable to create clone, and his physical ability decreased by sixty percent. He was being assaulted by fatigue that made him wanted to just fall asleep right now. Honestly, he already felt his consciousness getting farther when he used gravity magic to suck in the bullet.



「You plan to suicide huh!」



「That's right. Though actually I wanted Emily to kill me. After all, I understand that I won't be able to escape. If that's not the case, do you think I will talk that long even understanding that a monster like you is here?」



Down spoke about his own end really easily while dangling in midair seized by Kousuke.



「Although, as expected I didn't think that berserker will be defeated this quickly though.」



「Teacher-, what are you doing!? Didn't you want to leave your name in history!?」



Emily's words caused Down to answer with a mysterious expression that was a mixture of resignation and madness.



「That's right. I'll leave my name in history. If I cannot escape anymore, then I'll leave my name as the tragic father who tried to stop the girl that scattered disaster in this world!」



With those words, Kousuke finally guessed the thinking of what Down was trying to do. And then, he said「This stupid bastard-」while trying to throw Down on the floor.



But, before he could,



「If even that cannot come true then! Aa, fine then. I will become that very disaster itself! I'll leave my name in history not with a great achievement, but with a great sin!」



Saying that, he exploded the moment Kousuke threw him.



*doon-* The moment that muffled sound rang, Down's stomach exploded. Naturally, his blood and flesh scattered. Emily became unable to move due to the abnormal situation that was too gruesome.



Kousuke desperately maintained his creaking body and his distant consciousness. He activated gravity magic while leaping toward Emily right away.



Even gravity magic that was unable to completely display its effect was able to at least knock off the approaching blood and flesh.



But, for the current Kousuke that was his limit. Down that changed his route using the impact fell into the water reservoir along with his scattered blood and flesh.



A grand spray of water rose, creating a fierce ripple at the water reservoir. At the same time, the clear and transparent water was dyed red as though ink was spilled into it.



「……」



「Damn it-, he got us-」



Emily was dumbfounded without any words while staring at the water reservoir that was dyed red while Kousuke laid bare his irritation.



「Kousuke-san-, this is!」



The lying down Vanessa threw a radio at Kousuke. Kousuke guessed what she meant and received the radio before speaking into it.



『Bernard! Can you hear me!?』



『Mu, Aby. What's the matter?』



『Berserk spilled into the waterway! The water gate is opened and it's flowing to somewhere! Anywhere is fine, just stop the flow before it can go through the water supply facility!』



『-. Wait a second! ――Control room-. Seal all the waterways!』



Bernard who received the contact gave instruction to his subordinates that suppressed the control room.



Just as Kousuke said, Down didn't just blow himself up. "Scattering disaster"――just as those words meant, he wasn't trying to transform himself into a berserker, but he exploded himself to scatter the Berserk that was stored inside his stomach and spilled it into the waterway.



Most likely this aberrant plan was hatched because of the irregularity that was Kousuke. This was Down's final attack from thinking of the possibility that anything he did would be prevented.



No matter what place it was, no matter what reason it was for, a person who staked their life on the line was terrifying. Kousuke who got outwitted painfully realized that once more while he gritted his teeth.



Then, it was at that time a voice that sounded like a shriek rang from the radio.



『Captain-, the control doesn't work! Both the clean water facility or the water supply facility, all of them won't move from the opened gate state! The control is completely on the fritz!』



『What did you say-. What's the meaning of this!?』



『Those guys, perhaps they are inserting virus to the computer-. If I have time then I think it's possible to recover the control though.』



『How long that will take?』



『……Ten minutes. No, if I have just eight minutes, I'll somehow……』



『Tsk, get on it right away.』



『Yes Sir-』



Silence ruled over the place for a while. At this rate, the irrigation that was polluted by Berserk would flow into a city. Even before that, it would pass through several towns. If that happened, the wave of berserker would be spreading as though eroding the country from the edge.



Most likely it wouldn't take five minutes until the polluted water passed through the water supply facility. The time limit until the overwhelming tragedy, was just five minutes.



「Kousuke……」



「Kousuke-san……」



Emily who was staring at the water reservoir in a daze and Vanessa who had a grim expression were calling at Kousuke.



Kousuke thought of something with a grim expression, then he suddenly smiled bitterly and strength left his shoulders. And then, he ran his gaze toward Emily and Vanessa while taking the radio into his hand.



『Bernard. I'll do something about it. Well, it will become flashy, so don't let anyone get near the water supply facility.』



『! Aby. Got it. I'll leave it to you-. Please, save this country!』



Bernard's trust and slight entreaty reached Kousuke through his voice from the radio.



The same thing was also dwelling inside the gaze of Vanessa and Emily.



Kousuke kept smiling bitterly while opening his mouth to those two.



「Actually, I didn't want to rely on him. At the very end it become a pathetic story like this but……I'll ask a bit, for help from his majesty the demon king.」



Kousuke and others came out to the rooftop of the clean water facility while lending a shoulder to Vanessa.



There was a water supply facility downstream, and even further downstream they could see a town.



「Kousuke, what are you going to do?」



Kousuke said「I'll do this」to Emily's question and he took out his smartphone. And then, he called. After a few times of the call tone, there was the sullen voice of the speaker at the other side coming out from the phone.



『……What is it, Endo――』



「Nagumo! My bad but there is no time! Don't ask anything and blow up the water supply that is near my position!」



『……』



The call partner was his majesty the demon king who was currently spending an enjoyable time of making dinner with his beloved daughter. His majesty the demon king who was wearing the frilly pink apron that was created by Myuu for him, spending an enjoyable, enjoyable time while Yue and others were holding down their laughter!



Normally, if someone was suddenly phoned, and then requested to destroy a public facility without even getting told the reason, that person would either doubt the sanity of the other party, or they would cut off the phone without delay thinking that it was a joke before returning back to the happy family time.



But, the other party here wasn't normal. Rather, this person was the synonym of abnormal irrationality.



Therefore,



『'Kay. Don't move from where you are.』



「-. I'm in your debt, Nagumo!」



A presence of wry smile was transmitted from the other side of the phone.



At the same time,



「E, err, Kousuke? Who are you talking to? Or rather, what are you doing? Or rather, there are various things I want to ask but, anyway, can I ask? ――What is, that?」



「Kousuke-san……I cannot believe it but……」



Emily was looking up to the sky with a completely cramping expression while asking Kousuke, while Vanessa was also similarly staring at a spot in the sky with a flustered expression that was rarely seen from her.



Kousuke shrugged his shoulders at them who were like that and said.



「There won't be airborne infection from Berserk. Even if it is in liquid state, but it will become invalid if it is vaporized. Then, I'll blow it up altogether with an overwhelming heat. ――Well, that kind of thing can only be done by the demon king though.」



It was right after he said that.



Far high in the sky, a dot of light was starting to shine brilliantly as though a second sun was born. It could be seen clearly even through the cloud. It then looked like as though it swelled up instantly before at the next moment, a pillar of light descended from the sky.



The cloudy sky was blown away, an enormous hole was created at the sea of clouds in the sky, the atmosphere was burned down. That pillar which pierced the water supply facility along with a thunderous roar instantly destroyed the facility with a brilliant light, melted the ground, and created an outrageous crater at the blink of eye.



The light flooded the world.



The world that was gloomy from the cloudy sky was being dyed pure white. The heat wave and shockwave was spreading like a ripple and turned the surrounding of the facility into a circle-shaped empty land.



――Sunlight convergence laser Burst Hyperion



The demon king detected the location of the water supply facility using "Compass of Crossing Guidance" with Kousuke as the reference point, and then he teleported the Burst Hyperion at the satellite orbit above the facility using a space substitution artifact.



Next the demon king pushed the button *kaclick*, like that. Just with that the laser cannon that converged sunlight annihilated anything and everything.



It was truly the heaven's judgment. The manifestation of myth.



Though the person who pulled the trigger, was currently wearing a frilly pink apron at home.



「……」



「……」



The face of Emily and Vanessa turned into something that really couldn't be shown to other people. Their eyes opened wide with their mouth gaping open unmoving. Drool was trickling from the corner of their mouth and not a single word leaked out.



While they were in the middle of being like that, the water supply facility was eradicated entirely. Next the light pillar that changed even the topography was getting thinner bit by bit, and before long it vanished as though melting into the air.



Color returned to the world and the sound of waterfall flowing into the deep crater resounded.



『How is it, Endo? Is it okay like that?』



「Yeah, thanks, Nagumo. Sorry that I suddenly made an outrageous request.」



『I understand that you are trying to not rely on me. And now someone like you came to rely on me without even saying the reason. You must a reason that is that important right? Well, I'll trust you on that. That's why, I ain't need your apology.』



「Hahah. As I thought, the demon king is just too doting on his relatives yeah. That's why I cannot rely on you too much.」



Kousuke scratched his cheek awkwardly while making a wry smile. And then, he reported that he meant to return to Japan in a few days and he would speak about the circumstance when he went back and he cut off the phone.



Kousuke let out a long exhale.



Putting aside if it was related to a request from Hajime, Kousuke had promised to himself that he wouldn't rely on Hajime for anything in a matter that he poked his nose into by his own collision. But now he relied on him in the end. His shoulders dropped in dejection while he patted down his chest in relieve that they had avoided a great disaster (excluding the crater).



And then, his gaze slowly turned toward Emily and Vanessa who was still petrified wordlessly.



「Aa, Emily, Vanessa――」



「Hyuuwa!?」



「Afuh」



The moment he called at them, Emily jumped in surprise while raising her voice as though she was liberated from a binding curse before she became unable to stand up from shock and fell down. At the same time, Vanessa who was borrowing Emily's shoulder also fell down and her butt impacted the ground.



Kousuke thought that their reaction was understandable while he was about to lend a hand at the fallen two――and he stiffened.



*choro choro choro~*



Slipping through the sound of the waterfall, there was sound of water from right nearby.



The source was of course, the Emily-chan who kept lying down on her butt while shivering all over. It seemed that her bladder loosened up completely from witnessing the situation that surpassed human knowledge. 'Come to think of it, she gulped down a lot of coffee before riding the helicopter because she was nervous huuh', Kousuke recalled.



「……Kousuke-san. It feels like I'm going to leak out too. Is it fine?」



「There is no way it's fine.」



Vanessa who noticed Emily's disgraceful behavior made a wry smile while talking at Kousuke. There Emily finally seemed to recover her sanity. Naturally, she also noticed her current situation――



「HiiIIIIIH. SToOOOOOP-. Or rather, DON'T LoOOOOOK-, DON'T LOOK AT THIS KIND OF ME, KOUSUKEEEE-」



Emily was on the verge of tears while tightening her bladder. She was desperately hiding with her lab coat while her hands held her head down and she turned small.



While Emily's shriek was echoing,



『Oi, Aby! What was that just now!? Something came out there you know!? From the sky! Something came out!』



This time Bernard's voice was transmitted from the radio. It seemed that Bernard and others also witnessed the light of Burst Hyperion.



「DON'T LOOOOOK-! PLEASE, STOPPPPPP!」



『Oi, Aby! Respond! Explanation please!』



「Kousuke-san, instead of "pi―", the bleeding is not stopping. My wound seemed to open because of falling just now. Please help.」



Emily who screamed while turning small. Bernard who yelled together with his subordinates from the radio asking for explanation. Vanessa who was at the verge of death.



Kousuke sighed again in a different kind this time while,



「Now then, what to do about the clean-up I wonder……」



He looked up to the sky in this scene that was chaotic even when everything was over.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Really, thank you very much for following this extra compilation for so long.



The next chapter, the epilogue will be the end for this extra compilation.



Those people are also planned to come out you know~



I will talk about the detail of my plan from here on or the epilogue's afterword at my activity report.



The next update, surely perhaps, can be finished at 6 P.M. Saturday I think.





Chapter 222




AN: Even though this is the epilogue, there are the first and second parts……



I'm sorry. I couldn't finish it.



But I'll upload the second part within this day!



A sound of deep sigh leaked out in a room that boasted of its excellent soundproofing. The wooden desk and leather chair that were overflowing with high class aura were originally to add at the dignity of the owner, but right now the owner of the sigh was enveloped in a tired atmosphere that made such thing to be meaningless.



「Aa~, chief? Are you okay?」



The room owner――the state security bureau's chief Sharon Magdanese was addressed by Allen while he was smiling wryly.



Chief Magdanese was putting both her elbows on the desk with both her hands joined and supported the forehead of her hanging down head. She lifted her face slightly and replied with a slightly exasperated expression.



「Isn't that my line instead? Allen, are you really okay?」



「Ahaha, I'm really fine. I more or less received "healing", so my health is not as bad as my appearance.」



「……A "healing" that cure both arms that had the bones pulverized in less than a day until they become usable, is it. Haa~~~」



She once more sighed not just deeply, but dee~ply. Allen's wry smile deepened in proportion of that.



Chief Magdanese felt the gaze of Allen that seemed to say that he understood her feeling, while her face turned toward the large display hanging on the wall with an expression that didn't even try to hide her sullenness.



What that display projected was the manifestation of mystic. An unimaginably abnormal spectacle.



She wondered just how wonderful it would be if the image was just a scene that was cut from a movie.



「The devilish hand of the demon king that is fired from the sky……I wonder, since when this world is eroded by the fantasy?」



「Oh maaan, chief. That's a really poetic expression there. It's just like Aby-san――buberah!?」



Chief Magdanese's paper weight bullet burst out. Allen pleaded「I'm, an injured person! An injured person! Be gentler to me please!」with teary eyes.



Chief Magdanese easily ignored that and her eyes fell toward the display on her hand. She read up the analysis result that was written there with a powerless voice.



「A satellite that is able to fire a laser of converged sunlight……the point it, that it was just a simple thing that merely focused heat. It more or less theoretically possible to be constructed using the present-day science, it said.」



「However, it's impossible to make it in the size of the silhouette that we captured for an instant. If we try to make it then the result will be in a really big scale. What's more this one was able to not only blast away a whole facility, its power was even able to change the topography. Considering it, such thing is――」



「It's impossible for such thing to not be noticed by our nation……no, by all the nations on earth when it was in the satellite orbit. In addition, for it to fly to the position for a pinpoint sniping at that timing, that is even more impossible.」



*gii* The high class chair raised an unpleasant sound. That must be because it was pressed with weight from an unnatural stance added with the body's stirring. Chief Magdanese noticed how she had tensed unconsciously and took a breath.



It wasn't unreasonable. The image of the light of sky that was captured by the aircraft monitoring the operation area. It was launched suddenly from the satellite orbit by an orbital weapon that appeared without any advance notice, and as soon as it blew up the surface, it then abruptly vanished without any trace.



If that was the joker of the unfathomable power that was possessed by Abyssgate, then Chief Magdanese would instead feel her stomachache softened because she could believe that she had confirmed the bottom of his strength.



But, that was a weapon. Certainly it was overflowing with mystical aspect like how it was ignoring technological problem or how elusive it was. But, even so, that thing was without a doubt a weapon that was created by human hand.



It wasn't something unfathomable and unique that could be recognized to be owned just by a person, but a weapon that could be used by anyone if they wanted to.



That fact, even while it possessed fantasy aspect in it, but the cold reality that was contained within that fact was causing Chief Magdanese's blood to run cold. She felt a blunt terror that was far closer to herself more than when she witnessed the mystery of Lord Abyssgate.



「……His majesty the demon king, is it. I knew that around him there must be people with the same power assembling but……」



「To think that Aby-san is really just someone in underling position. Hahah, there is nothing to do but laughing here. Even though I cannot see the future where we will be able to stand a chance against even just him alone, there is still a demon king-sama waiting behind him who can go *kaboom* just with a phone call, what the hell.」



「If we believe his talk as it is, it's the best he can do to scratch the demon king even fighting with his whole body and soul. Furthermore, he also said that it's unclear whether he can even match the wives or not.」



「Chief. The instant I saw that light in the sky, I understood just why the person who exterminate a demon king in a tale is called as a hero. Indeed, that person must be a hero. For that person to be able to challenge something like that」



'Certainly that's so', Chief Magdanese nodded deeply. At the very least, she who shouldered a part of the national defense really couldn't fan up any thinking of trying to stand against that.



Chief Magdanese sighed out deeply for who knew how many times already while she suddenly took out a USB memory from her breast pocket. She toyed with that using her fingers while leaning on her elbow.



「What's the matter, chief?」



「……No, nothing really. It's just, I'm thinking, that perhaps this thing is a Pandora box.」



「Aah. Certainly, that's a perfectly fitting phrase. By the way, is Aby faction the calamity? Or else the hope?」



Chief Magdanese floated a vague smile as her answer to Allen's question. Even Allen didn't understand what she really meant.



However, the one thing that was definite, was that the inside of that USB memory――the research data of Berserk, if they tried to use that for evil, then a calamity would descend without a doubt. That didn't merely refer to the fact that berserkers would be created once again, but in the meaning that they would enrage the bearer of mystery by doing that and turned them into enemy.



「Oh man~. Even so, if it's known by Aby-san that the security bureau is hiding Berserk, it will absolutely be a bad news won't it? All the data and drug from every facility were completely destroyed, and in some places they were destroyed along with the facility……that is a bomb in a sense you know? I think it's better to destroy it right away though……」



Allen didn't even hide his disgusted expression and said such thing at Chief Magdanese who was still toying the USB memory with her fingertips.



After that infiltration into the clean water facility, Kousuke who was greatly exhausted took a rest at a facility the security bureau prepared but, ……after a rest for half-day, he temporarily disappeared accompanied by Emily and Vanessa. They borrowed without permission the pilot and the helicopter that were with them at the mission.



The security bureau fell into uproar from that, but because they guessed the reason that Kousuke vanished, they waited until they were contacted.



As the result, it became an uproar how all the Berserk that was recovered from the facilities that were stormed by other special forces (including the army's special forces) were wholly destroyed by someone unknown. Like that, it became clear what Kousuke and co were doing.



The feat of complete destruction of the data and drug by easily breaking through the strict security of the army caused the members of the security bureau to make a dry laugh altogether.



After that, after they were taking independent action for a while, there was a contact that came through Vanessa in order to confirm whether the Berserk that was recovered by the army had really been destroyed with nothing left. Chief Magdanese offered her full cooperation and she exchanged various information with Vanessa.



If it was known that Chief Magdanese was in fact shrewdly collecting the research data of Berserk that remained from the university's research building……



Allen couldn't stop his trembling.



Chief Magdanese made an exasperated expression at such Allen.



「Please don't say anything thoughtless. I'm not hiding this or anything.」



「Eh? But, the fact is chief is carrying that right now though.」



「Look here, after Paradis and Doctor Grant escaped from the research building, just who do you think cleaned up there?」



「That's of course, us the security bureau……there was also the matter about Hughes-san and others there.」



「Yes, that's right. And then, Doctor Grant and Vanessa who barely escaped from the research building with their life didn't have the time to bring the research data with them. They and also Abyssgate understand that.」



In other words, it was clear as day that the security bureau who went there for cleaning up would recover the extremely dangerous drug and data.



Although, even Allen understood that much. In short, Allen was thinking that exactly because everyone understood that, Kousuke and co should be thinking that the Berserk possessed by the security bureau was destroyed already, but contrary to that they were still possessing the data. Wouldn't that be bad for them, he wondered.



Chief Magdanese who guessed Allen's unexpressed fear shook her head and answered.



「There is no way that person will swallow what I say as it is. I destroyed the data, ok thanks, you think it will be like that?」



「That, well……. Then, chief will destroy it. But, then why are you still carrying it like that?」



「For caution's sake, I want to destroy it in front of his eyes, so that he won't be able to just vanish then if I destroy it at a distant place from him.」



From Chief Magdanese's viewpoint, she was thinking that Kousuke might just return home to his country without even showing his figure anymore in front of them. If it was with his profoundly mysterious power, then doing something like sneaking into the security bureau without anyone noticing and destroyed the data before disappearing should be a piece of cake.



But, Chief Magdanese wanted to talk with Kousuke eye-to-eye no matter what. It would be unbearable if she let Kousuke went home when their relationship with Kousuke who was able to do that much and the demon king faction behind him was still vague like now. Chief Magdanese who had self-awareness that she was already really old didn't want to have her stomachache got worse than this.



And so, even if with roundabout mean, a conversation was indispensable. She hadn't destroyed the USB memory yet and walked around carrying it was also a move for that, she wanted to destroy it in front of Kousuke's eyes to help in building a relationship of trust between them.



Surely, perhaps, there wouldn't be that much effect that could be expected from doing that, but it was Chief Magdanese's principle to not make light of even the small move.



Allen nodded with a look of 'I see'. Chief Magdanese sent a sidelong glance at Allen with her fingertips holding the USB memory before she suddenly threw her gaze at empty air and opened her mouth.



「That's how it is, so if you want to destroy it then do as you please, Abyssgate.」



「Eh? Chief?」



*pachin-* The chief put the USB memory on the desk with a sound like a shogi player putting the piece on the board. Allen's eyes turned into dot. For a moment he thought「Is she finally turn senile?」, but he got a gaze of absolute zero turned at him instantly so he straightened his posture in panic.



Right after that,



「……How surprising. To think that you are able to feel my presence.」



「Oou!? Aby-san!?」



Allen jumped to his feet reflexively from hearing the voice that resounded from the room's corner.



When Allen turned his gaze in fluster, there he saw the figure of Kousuke leaning on the wall with his arms folded. His expression was displaying a clear emotion of admiration.



「A, Aby-san, since when you are there? Or rather, how did you enter……」



「I have been shadowing right behind you all that time you know? I entered this room together with you.」



「I, I didn't notice at all……」



Kousuke turned his gaze at Chief Magdanese while putting aside Allen who was plainly shocked. His gaze was filled with admiration and question of since when she noticed him, and also a little bit of happiness mixed there.



Chief Magdanese displayed a wry smile at Kousuke's gaze while she shook her head.



「I didn't notice you or anything. However, thinking of the number of the operating forces, their affiliation, the base's location, the information sharing with Paradis, and so on, I thought that you will be coming soon. I'm glad you are really here. If not, then I would be a pitiful person who is talking to empty air there.」



「……As expected from the chief. You've got me completely there.」



Kousuke smiled wryly while his back moved from the wall. Surely his face looked very slightly regretful was because his hope of「By any chance, the number of people noticing me increased!?」had crumbled away.



Kousuke walked until in front of the desk and he took the USB memory. And then, he crushed it inside his fist without confirming its content.



「Is this all the data?」



「Yes, that's right. With this, it means that the data of Berserk only remain inside Doctor Grant's head.」



「You are sure?」



「You can just make sure can't you? I believe you have the method to know with certainty whether the data and drug of Berserk still remain or not in this world if you feel like it. I don't plan to be an idiot that make a bluff to that kind of opponent.」



Indeed, if Kousuke hypnotized the authorized people and asked them the information, he would be able to ascertain the truth. Also, Chief Magdanese didn't know, but if he relied on that person to have him use the "Compass of Crossing Guidance", then the truth would be ascertained in an instant.



Chief Magdanese seemed to be resolved even if she got hypnotized, so she stared straight at Kousuke. Kousuke who received that gaze shrugged and shook his head.



「I'll believe your words chief. Besides, I don't want to do something really cruel to the side that will protect my friend and her family from here on.」



It felt like a threat was mixed into it just for a bit. Chief Magdanese scowled while asking back.



「……You are telling us to protect Grant family?」



「Even if the chief advocate that Berserk is unnecessary to the VIPs, there surely will be those who question the uproar this time. If Grant family is aimed and Emily meet misfortune then……yeah? This too is for the sake of the national defense isn't it?」



「Because if that happen then what we will face won't be the people of that side, or even the very Berserk itself, but the "abyss lord" huh. Indeed, this is the most important matter that concern the national defense.」



'If something happen to Grant family then it not gonna end well'――Chief Magdanese made a slightly tired expression at that veiled warning, even so she promised that she would protect Grant family from the stupid bunches.



Surely within a few days there would be pairs of lovers or spouses with a lot of friends moving to the neighborhood of Grant family. Those people would watch over the Grant family with handgun hidden in their pocket while rousing up themselves with「Whether the lord will rampage or not is hanging on our shoulder!」.



「Well, I'll agree to the matter of the protection. However, I have one condition――no, a request.」



「……I don't think that this is a situation where there will be a condition attached normally. Just as I thought, as expected from the chief.」



「It's an honor to receive the praise. It's not like I plan to ask for anything excessive. Just, if you are going to do something in this country, or if by chance someone related to this country is going to do something, I wish you will contact us beforehand.」



This was the promise that Chief Magdanese wanted to extract from Kousuke by talking to him. It was too dangerous to leave him without supervision. But, it was impossible to attach a collar or anything to him. Then at the very least she wished to know what he would do and where. She wasn't telling him to ask for permission, but at least she wanted him to keep them informed.



「Depending on the situation, surely there will be time where it will be better for me to be one that take care of it. I believe that you are able to take care of most things, but surely it won't be troubling to have a connection to the authority.」



「Hm~m. Well, as long as that authority doesn't reach out their hand to us. There would be nothing more depressing then having someone move to try to get our information even if just non~chalantly.」



「The consideration of that area would be something we wish for you to trust us with.」



Seeing Kousuke hesitated with 'h~m', Chief Magdanese muttered a few words.



「……The cleaning up was really difficult this time.」



「……」



「We got severely criticized by the intelligence bureau, and then the water supply for that aream and also the information control……. After this we have to falsify the written report about Berserk Case in various things, and surely I will be severely criticized again when I advocate that Berserk is unnecessary at the meeting……」



「……」



「I don't want to say this, but I'm really past my prime now. Recently, it become hard to endure my stomachache. Do you know that medicine is not effective anymore? Perhaps this is already time for me to think of retiring. Well, I don't know whether my successor whoever he is will be able to build connection nicely or not though……」



「……」



「Come to think of it, my arm that got shot really hurt. Even though Allen got healed, I need to normally depend on modern medical care here. As I thought perhaps I should just retire. The motivation necessary to win the argument against the intelligence bureau at the meeting is just……」



「Got it! I got it already! I'll contact you properly if I've business of something in this country okay! That's why, stop suddenly looking at far away with an expression like an old man that has sensed his time of death like that! Feels like your image is crumbling down!」



「Wonderful. Then, leave the protection of the Grant family and the clean-up of the Berserk case to us of the security bureau. I will hand over a private line to Abyssgate that connect to the staff under me, so if there is something please exchange information through it. ――I wish that from here on the security bureau can continue a good relationship with the demon king faction.」



Even though just now she had been pretending like an old man that was going to be led away by the death god, Magdanese instantly returned into the face of the chief of the state security bureau clad in a dominating aura and concluded the talk. Inside his heart, Kousuke's cheeks were twitching while thinking「As I thought, I'm no good with this person huh」.



After that they talked for two, three more minutes. And then hearing Chief Magdanese added a terrifying request like 'if there is a chance, please let me talk with his majesty the demon king no matter what', Kousuke once more felt admiration that this woman was really a big shot before he put his hand on the door knob.



And then, just before he exited the room, Kousuke suddenly recalled something and turned around.



「Come to think on it, thanks chief-san. I planned to confirm it myself before this, but it helps that you told me.」



「? ……Aa, about her you mean.」



Chief Magdanese tilted her head for a moment thinking just what was Kousuke talking about, but she immediately realized and she then surprisingly smiled. Allen was taken aback.



「Thanks is unnecessary. Although it's the fact that we had no breathing room due to the situation, but if only we could confirm it quicker, it would be a relieve for that girl's anxiety.」



「I wonder. There is no use talking about 'what if'. If she can think of it that as the prize of working hard, the world can be a little kinder to her, that won't be bad won't it?」



Perhaps feeling a little embarrassed of his own speech, Kousuke scratched his cheek awkwardly after saying that. Chief Magdanese looked even happier at that while she nodded.



「I don't have the qualification to answer that ……but if that's really the case, than certainly it won't be bad. I think it's great that there is a salvation for her even if just one.」



Those words from the great woman of iron and blood that shouldered the country's protection sounded like her true opinion which she showed at the end. Kousuke also nodded back to her with a calm smile and he exited the room.



It was at a café located in a place that could confirm the high-rise building of the state security bureau by sight. There was a girl with her blonde hair put in side-tail――Emily looking absentminded inside.



Her hand kept holding the cup of steamy coffee latte in front of her, however, she showed no sign of drinking it. She was only staring blankly at the rising steam.



Other than emotion of sadness and pain, her side profile also contained various other things. There were people who were mysteriously charmed with that. In the first place Emily was a beautiful girl, yet right now she felt like a "woman" rather than a girl of her age. Surely that was because the experience she had gone through these few days was an unusual experience.



The young men and male employees inside the café kept sending glances at the beautiful girl that was sitting alone in melancholy. That was the proof of the charm Emily was emitting.



Her long and slender legs wrapped in black stocking were crossed. Finally a young man whose gaze was attracted to that resolved himself and stood up. It appeared that he would call out to Emily.



But, right after the young man took a step forward, his foot stopped still.



That was because Emily suddenly lifted her face. It seemed that was because she noticed the young man's secret intention. Her reaction looked as though she was called by someone. Yet, he couldn't hear anything that called the girl's name other than the sound of cars' engine.



The young man tilted his head in wonder of what happened, even so he was about to step forward again――



「Ah, Kousuke! Over here!」



He saw a flower blooming proudly. The melancholy until just now disappeared like a lie, and its place was a dazzling flower that was blooming in full. Emily made a full smile and waved her hand, which caused the young man to stop walking once more. However, this time he was purely fascinated.



「……Emily, looks like you have become able to notice me normally huh.」



The one who appeared while saying that was of course Kousuke. The young man too finally noticed after he heard that voice, that there was a male that had approached this spot until nearby without anyone noticing. The male was a Japanese without any particular characteristic that stood out.



For a moment, the young man compared himself with Kousuke and he self-assessed himself that he won, but he instantly withered when he saw the trust and affection that emerged on Emily's expression. His shoulders dropped in dejection while he returned to his seat with heavy steps. The other customers and male employees were looking at the young man with a complicated expression.



「I guess. Somehow, when Kousuke come near, the area around my forehead goes tingling.」(TN: Imagine in Gundam when the newtype sense danger or formidable enemy)



「You are awakened to a strange ability huh. Well, I'm happy though so it's fine.」



Kousuke saying that he was happy made Emily to smile even happier instead.



「So, you are finished? Did it go all right?」



「Yeah, everything went well. With this, Berserk doesn't exist anymore in this world. Looks like the security bureau has also work hard.」



「I see……thank you, Kousuke. Really, saying this is not enough at all but, thank you.」



Emily leaned her forehead to Kousuke's shoulder naturally. Seeing that, several males including the young man just now clicked their tongue. Surely they wanted to say 'damn show off'.



Kousuke reflexively smiled wryly while hearing those clicking tongues. He then gently tapped on Emily's back while urging her to exit the café.



Kousuke started walking on the street. Emily asked him where they were going.



「H~m, there is a place I want to go for a bit. Can you come with me?」



「Yep, it's fine. But Kousuke's plane schedule is……it's fine because it's at the evening isn't it?」



Today Endo was going back to Japan. He had finished reserving ticket for an evening flight. Naturally Emily was feeling a lot lonely, but there was no way she could neglect her parents who were piling up mental worry due to the attack against their daughter, so she was planning to spend her time in her home for a while and couldn't go with Kousuke.



Although, there would be a clone body staying with her for a while to guard her, and Kousuke also firmly promised to her that this separation wouldn't be forever, so she wasn't that sad.



「Which reminds me, what about Vanessa? Midway she said that she has a business so she went somewhere but, is it about security bureau's business?」



「No, it's another matter. Vanessa is also going to the place we are heading to right now. There is something I want her to check a bit just in case.」



「Hm~m. You are speaking ambiguously. ……It's just me that is out of the loop here.」



Emily's lips pouted a bit sullenly. Kousuke reflexively almost said「How cute」, but the body blow of his heart made him shut his mouth decisively.



「That's not it though……. Rather, this is about Emily. Well, you will understand when we go there. Depending on the situation, perhaps it will be necessary for me to go on ahead for various measures but……you know, there were things I wanted to take care first at the security bureau. Just in case.」



「I don't really get it but……fine then. If that's what Kousuke and Vanessa think as the best then okay.」



Emily smiled gently. The height of her trust to the two could be peeked at there.



It would take about thirty minutes of walking with the distance, so the two didn't use taxi or anything and walked to there while strolling at the same time.



There was no word, however, the atmosphere wasn't awkward by any means. Both of them were walking with a relaxed pace. After a while, Emily leaked out her words in a mutter.



「You see, I'm thinking of teacher even now.」



「Hm?」



Kousuke tilted his head. Emily continued while slightly looking up to the sky.



「He betrayed us, did inhuman things like that, and in the end he tried to take along a lot of people with him in death……even so, I cannot hate him. Even now, somewhere inside me, I'm thinking of that person as "our teacher". ……Do you think it's strange?」



「I wonder. After all I don't know, what has been accumulated between Emily and Down.」



Emily smiled a bit happily that Kousuke didn't make any denial.



「Yep, there are a lot, things that we had accumulated. I cannot forget them. Whether when he reached out to me, or how he saved me, or the warm place and important teaching that I received, I cannot forget them.」



「Because, those weren't a lie, right?」



「……Yes. Those weren't a lie.」



At that time, the young Emily who was cornered by the environment was saved, it was a fact. The fact that she was given the warmth of family, and also everything else, the important things residing in Emily's heart, weren't a lie.



A shadow of melancholy fell on Emily's expression once more.



「That's exactly why, I feel it's scary.」



「……」



Emily kept looking down without showing any sign whether she noticed or not the gaze of Kousuke who was looking at her from the side. She continued talking in mutters.



「Surely, Berserk is inside everyone. Just a little impetus, something that is trifling for other people will become the trigger, awakening it. Surely it's easy to occur at particular field. That's what I think.」



Everyone had the seed of madness at the bottom of their heart. Kousuke couldn't deny that. The face of the classmates that didn't manage to go home together with them passed through in Kousuke's mind. The binding of their heart slipped off under a unique situation.



Just as Emily said, even in a situation that wasn't that unique, it was still something that could possibly occur. And then, her remark that meant that the binding of the heart was easier to come off for those who tried to walk through a path to the extreme was likely to be an accurate statement.



「Even now, I'm thinking it. If teacher didn't meet me, perhaps teacher will be able to live normally as an excellent educator.」



It was a meaningless what-if. Emily also understood that. But, she couldn't help but thinking it. She thought and thought, even so, she continued to wander the labyrinth of her pondering, of what she actually should do.



It was terrifying. Thinking that perhaps ahead of her path, she would once more pull the trigger of someone's Berserk. She didn't have any intention of giving up her dream, even so, no matter what, when she thought of the future ahead at her path of research, her hands and feet stiffened, and something cold and heavy was sinking at the bottom of her guts.



Kousuke averted his gaze from Emily and looked up to the sky. It was likely that Emily wasn't asking for anything from Kousuke by talking about this. The proof of that, was how the light of determination could be seen inside her eyes that were tinged with melancholy, that even if that was the case she wouldn't draw back, she couldn't draw back. Therefore, she was making Kousuke heard her heavily agonizing thought even just for a little was merely her depending on Kousuke.



Kousuke scratched his head awkwardly at Emily who was showing such awkwardness in depending on others. And then, he started a strange talk.



「In the past, at a certain place long time ago, no wait, it wasn't that long ago, it was something relatively recently, anyway, at a certain place there was a single hero.」



「Heh? Err, Kousuke?」



'What's up so suddenly?' Emily tilted her head. Ignoring that, Kousuke continued to talk.



「The hero was super handsome, he excelled in both brain and physical aspects. He was fair and kind, overflowing with sense of justice, and a super popular male. He made others feel 'just explode', but anyway he was a really good guy.」



「Yo, you wanted him to explode even though he was a good guy?」



「Nn, well, just ignore that. Anyway, one day the perfect superhuman hero was summoned to another world together with his comrades. He was kidnapped along with the people around him by a damned shitty god somewhere just out of curiosity.」



Seeing Kousuke who was talking in annoyance caused Emily to go 'hah' in realization. The fairytale that Kousuke was suddenly talking now was surely not a fairytale. It was a part of the tale of the beginning when this profoundly mysterious hero was born.



Emily closed her mouth and concentrated to her ears. The person she loved was trying to tell her something by going as far as disclosing his secret. She focused so that she wouldn't overhear even one word.



「Putting aside the intention of the shitty god, the people of that world said to the hero and his group. Save us they said. Defeat the enemy they said. The hero responded, that if there are people in trouble then of course they should help. The hero and his comrades who had crossed through world had managed to obtain great power, so surely it will go well he thought. But――」



It didn't go like that.



「Bit by bit, bit by bit, something black was starting to pile up inside the hero.」



「Something, black……」



Emily could guess. That must be the seed of Berserk. Something everyone possessed, a negative emotion.



「The justice of hero that he believed, it didn't work at anything. He lost his fairness and he became as though he was possessed by the deep-rooted delusion that he should be the correct one. His comrades and childhood friends also remonstrated him but, the hero who was instigated by the enemy――betrayed everything.」



「-」



Emily had her breath taken away. Emily didn't know what happened with the hero. But, she could somehow see her teacher overlapping with the hero. Just what did the hero feel at that time? Just with what kind of feeling the hero betrayed his comrades? And then――how did the hero end up in the end?



Matching Emily who came to a stop, Kousuke also stopped walking and he continued while staring at Emily.



「The hero, pointed that tremendous power of his toward us. He pointed it toward his childhood friends who should be important for him. He pointed it, toward the people that he said should be protected. At the time of the decisive battle when that guy was needed the most, that guy was at the enemy side. Everything, was in order to proof that he was exactly the correct one. In order to take back the time when everything went well for him.」



「……What happened then, to the hero?」



Emily asked with by squeezing out her voice. In respond to that Kousuke,



「Yeah, he got beaten up black and blue by a girl, his childhood friend until he apologized tearfully. He came back with his face still swelling up so much it made us felt 'seeerves you right you handsome'.」



「Eh?」



This was the aftermath of a grand betrayal. Emily thought, that surely this would be a tragic story but with a bit of salvation in it even then. But seeing Kousuke laughed casually while talking「Oh mann~, at that time that guy came back with pathetic face! He apologize while looking like he was going to cry, but his front teeth were all broken up that everyone almost broke laughing! That was seriously s serious breaker y'know!」, Emily's face went blank in a daze.



Kousuke who noticed Emily who couldn't follow at all then cleared his through *cough* once.



「Well, what I want to say, that……sorry. I couldn't save your teacher.」



「Eh? E, ah, no, that's not-. I, don't mean something like――」



Emily tried to make excuse in panic, but Kousuke stopped her with his hand and smiled wryly. However, he then directed a strong gaze at Emily that made her heart jumped.



「I know. But, even so, I swear here, Emily. If, ahead in this path Emily is walking through someone got their madness awakened, that time I won't let you lose them. Even if I have to sock them in the face, I will drag them back to you without fail.」



「u, a」



She was at loss for words. While Emily's mouth was opening and closing wordlessly, Kousuke gifted her with words that illuminated her path.



「That's why, don't make that kind of pained face and just advance ahead through your path.」



Emily leaped. Where to? That was obvious. Toward the chest of her beloved hero. Emily leaked out sobbing 'hics hics' from something hot filling inside her chest while Kousuke gently caressed her hair.



It was unknown how long they were like that. Before long Emily lifted her face. Kousuke pulled her hand and began walking once more toward the destination.



Silence was descending once more, but this time it was with a really awkward atmosphere. Emily kept glancing at the side of Kousuke's face with moist eyes, while Kousuke being Kousuke was writhing inside from his own speech.



Trying to change the atmosphere a little, Kousuke spoke a proposal that he actually had been thinking about since some time ago.



「Hey, Emily」



「Whaaat, Kousuke」



Her voice was sweet. It was dripping sweet. The sugar content in the air was increasing. Kousuke went「I, I might have really done it now……」while sweating coldly.



「About your research from here on」



「Uh huh. Continuing it in the university……will be hard I think. But, somewhere else――」



「About that, if you want, how about trying to go to another world?」



「Another world……」



Inside Emily, it already had become a fact that Kousuke was summoned to another world together with his comrades. She didn't think that his story was a fiction. Rather, she comprehended that Kousuke's mysterious power had its root from there.



And now, she might be able to go to the world where Kousuke obtained his power of hero. That was enough to fill Emily with happiness.



「Is it okay?」



「Yeah, you more or less need the permission from the demon king to go to the world over there but, well, surely there won't be a problem. You see, at the other side there are a lot of mysterious plants and minerals that doesn't exist here. There is also something like pharmacy study there more or less, and if Emily learn that and put it into use for your research, won't that become a shortcut for breakthrough?」



「Pharmacy study of another world……certainly, that is really interesting. That healing medicine is also made from there isn't it?」



「H~m, I guess. Though it roughly not pure chemicals but a magic medicine though……」



Emily's eyes were sparkling bright with the idea of going to Kousuke's world, and also that it might be useful for her lifework. Her gaze looked even far better than her enraptured gaze before this. For Kousuke it was a poison in various meaning. Though it was him reaping what he sowed.



「Also you see, because there is magic at the world there, the technology there is not that developed. Currently I'm studying medical science here, but I'm doing that with the objective of wanting to heighten the medical technology there without magic.」



「……Kousuke, by any chance, you are planning to go to that other world in the future?」



Emily looked up anxiously at Kousuke. He nodded in respond without hesitation. A shadow fell on Emily's expression.



「Well, currently the demon king is taking measures so that it will be easier to come and go from here to there, so I'm not going to be at that side forever without coming back though……」



Hearing that, Emily began pondering something. Kousuke went「Hm?」seeing that and he tilted his head. And then Emily suddenly snapped up his head and declared to Kousuke.



「Then, at that time I will accompany Kousuke too! At that time, I'll show you that I can develop the other world's pharmaceutics more!」



Seeing Emily declaring 'I absolutely will be useful to Kousuke!', Kousuke was thinking from the start that he wished for Emily's cooperation in improving the medical treatment without using Tortus's magic, so he accepted immediately. However, he somewhat felt a strange weight from the word「accompany」that Emily said was……



No, let's stop lying to himself. Kousuke was convinced. That word absolutely meant「accompany」in that meaning. Kousuke was sweating coldly. Emily's cheeks were dyed red and her eyes were sparkling fierily perhaps from thinking of the future. There was no doubt that in her brain she was surely imagining the development where the two of them were examining patients at the clinic in another world.



Even though she would be at another world, but if there was a method to return to earth, then it would be safer to do her research at another world rather than at earth where there was a possibility she would be targeted. She would also be able to defeat Alzheimer with the result of that research.



For Emily, immigration to another world was completely a good thing.



「He, hey, Emily. There is also something that I have to tell you……」



Kousuke was opening his mouth to speak about the matter that he missed the chance to say until now because of one thing and another. Right now he was going to say it loud and clear. But it seemed that the goddess of fate was quite detestable.



A familiar ringtone interrupted Kousuke's words. It seemed that Vanessa was the caller. Kousuke cursed「Vanessaaa」inside his heart, but thinking of the thing that he asked her to confirm, he couldn't ignore this.



Like that, what entered the ear of Kousuke who took the call was a good news that came in with a truly miraculous timing.



AN: Continue to the second part





Chapter 223




This is the second part of the two parts epilogue.



There is the first part before this, please pay attention.



「Hey, Kousuke. Is this the place you want to take me to?」



「Yeah, this place.」



The gaze of Emily who couldn't hide her perplexity was wandering around without any calm. That was reasonable. The place Kousuke brought her to with fast pace after the call from Vanessa――was a hospital.



The question of「Why?」was whirling inside Emily's head.



「You see, this hospital is under the influence of the security bureau. They make use of it for the criminal or the victim of a case, or people with circumstance.」



「Security bureau's…..eh, wait, then」



「Yeah, the people related with Berserk case are also hospitalized here.」



Emily gulped. The people who got Berserk stored inside their stomach yet didn't have it exploded and the people who were confined for experiment but luckily could be rescued just in time, and the research facility personnel who got injured at the suppression operation and so on, they were all here.



Emily looked around with a sorrowful expression, but she suddenly noticed. Even with all those people here, it wasn't a reason to bring her here. If someone was turned into berserker then it was too late for them, and in the case that they hadn't turn into berserker then it would completely be the domain of a doctor. There wasn't any turn for Emily who was a researcher here.



Yes, if there was a reason for her to be brought here, then it would be the same reason with the families of patients who were gathering in the patient room or corridor even now――



With a shudder, an indescribable emotion that was different from a chill was welling up inside Emily.



「Wa, wait, wait Kousuke! By, by any chance, in, in here……but, I, definitely remember that everyone was-」



「It kept bothering me all this time. In Emily's story, it was only your parting with her that was different. I didn't say anything because I thought that it was a slim chance, but I believed that the possibility wasn't zero.」



"Her"――Emily understood who that word referred to.



That's right. Indeed it was right. It was only her who Emily didn't see directly. When they parted from each other at the end, she lured away the immediately approaching Berserker and vanished. But Emily didn't confirm her last moment at all.



The repeated death, the overwhelming presence of death of Berserk, the heavy tremor that was chasing after her, all of those pushed Emily into despair. That was why, she thought that must be the last moment for that person, yet……



「I was thinking to confirm it by myself, but before I could, chief-san found her and then contacted me. It looked like she hadn't recovered her consciousness, so just in case, in order to confirm it directly and find out the detail of her condition, I asked Vanessa to go ahead……」



There was already no more word. The hope rising up inside was making Emily's heart quivered.



「The call from Vanessa just now. ――She said that she was awake. She was heavily wounded and need complete bed rest but, there is nothing threatening to her life.」



「a, a……」



Emily covered her mouth with the hand that wasn't pulled by Kousuke and then her blurry gaze caught the figure of Vanessa talking with a person who seemed to be a doctor.



Vanessa who noticed Kousuke and Emily then lowered her head to the doctor before turning her gaze to the two of them. Her expression was a gentle and relaxed one that they had never seen until now. Just from that expression, Emily discerned that there wasn't anything bad at all. She grasped that her hope wasn't a lie.



「She is all right, Doctor Grant. She is also really lucid, and the doctor also said that there will be no problem if she is going through treatment. Now, she is waiting. Please meet her.」



「Vanessa……yes, yes-」



Kousuke let go of the hand he held and gently pushed Emily's back. Vanessa sent her off with a gentle smile. Emily couldn't endure it and tears were trickling down her face while she opened the door into the patient room, and she entered inside.



*pi-pi-pi-* Other than the resounding sound of a medical equipment, the patient room was enveloped in silence. The sunlight poured in from the window that had its curtain opened, illuminating the patient room brightly.



With staggering steps, Emily approached the bed slowly. There, she saw the woman whose both legs were fixed in place, her head bandaged, and her hand receiving intravenous drip.



Perhaps that woman noticed Emily's presence, because she slowly opened her closed eyes.



And then,



「……Emily. Aa, I'm glad. You are safe.」



While sleeping on the bed with wounds all over her body, the words that came out the very first from her mouth were words that rejoiced of the safety of her little sister――



「Lizzie-nee-!!」



With her mind still pure white, Emily only surrendered her body to her great joy and leaped to the chest of her big sister――Lizzie Ashton. Lizzie who received the embrace of her beloved little sister naturally,



「Ouch ouch ouch ouch-. Wait-, it hurts, it hurts I told you Emily! Your big sis is dying! I'm dying for sure this time!」



「Fueah!? So, sorry-, Lizzy-neee!」



She fainted in agony. A person who was in a total bed rest mustn't jumped at. This was important. Emily went flustered and all shook up while Lizzie smiled wryly「What a hopeless girl」with teary eyes that endured the pain.



「It's fine if you do it slowly. Look, come here, Emily.」



「Lizzie-neee」



Softly, as though she was touching a delicate artwork, Emily timidly embraced Lizzie, and then she began to leak out sobbing 'hics hics'. Lizzie partly closed her eyes at her little sister that was like that while caressing Emily's head with a gentle hand manner.



「Fufu, you really have become a crybaby while I fainted just for a bit aren't you? Just where has the usual obstinate person has gone to I wonder.」



「Fho, fho cares……hics, sniff-」



Emily grumbled while hugging tightly without any sign of letting go. Lizzie's smile was getting increasingly broader.



「I heard about the matter this time, just for a bit from that cool female agent. Looks like you have gone through a great adventure.」



「I'm, not. It wasn't, adventure……. I just, needed to do, something somehow……but, I couldn't, do anything……I only, kept getting, helped……」



「Yeah. That Paradis-san also said, that she wanted to protect Emily because you were working very hard. Also, there is one more hero-san? I heard that he too lent his strength, because Emily worked really hard.」



Emily stirred restlessly and lifted her face from Lizzie's chest, and then her face that turned terrible because of the tears and mucus distorted.



Lizzie wiped up the face of Emily that was like that while she proudly gifted Emily her words along with a gentle smile that Emily idolized.



「You have worked hard aren't you, Emily. As expected from the little sister of us all. Surely those guys, and Rick, and also teacher, they must be proud of you.」



「Lizzie-neee-」



「Ah, ah, geez. Even though you are a beauty but it is wasted like this……come one, blow your nose, blow」



Emily blew her nose just as she was told. And then, she restlessly buried her face into Lizzie's chest once more. Right now, she only wanted to earnestly feel her beloved big sister.



And then, Lizzie also embraced tightly such Emily. She was only showering her love to her little sister who survived, and gritting her teeth against the loneliness toward the person she loved and their comrades who had protected them.



Part 2



The airport's lobby was really bustling with people waiting for their departure and people waiting for the arrival of flight passengers. At a waiting place where there were several rows of bench seat in place, Emily whose eyes were still red was staring at Kousuke apologetically.



「Sorry, Kousuke. Because of me there is barely any time left. In the end, you cannot go buy souvenir or do anything else.」



「No, it's fine. That was a special reunion for you. I'm not that boorish that I would be a nuisance with that.」



In the end, after that Emily who had transformed into a sticky burr on Lizzie was finally pried off after the nurse noticed that Lizzie was almost fainting with the white of her eyes half exposed. (TN: A burr is prickly seeds or seedheads that stuck to fur and clothes)



However even with that, it seemed that Emily hated to exit the room, and when she was scolded by the nurse and got dragged outside, Emily spontaneously yelled「ONEE-CHAAAN!」and reached out her hand. Lizzie whose eyes snapped open in a flash hearing her little sister's shout then reached out her hand「EMILY――」, which got the intravenous drip torn off from her hand which turned it into even more commotion. The two of them were really sisters that were similar with each other.



The nurse who was treated like a mafia who was trying to tear apart loving sisters from each other because of unpaid debt was then got a throbbing vein on her forehead. Even then the nurse kept treating the situation. It went without saying that Kousuke and Vanessa then earnestly apologized to the nurse.



Because of this and that, in the end they arrived at the airport with barely any time left until the departure, which caused Emily to be apologetic.



「Well, at any rate, it's great that Lizzie-san is alive.」



「Yes-」



It was a blunt topic change, but Emily responded with a broad smile. The lost things wouldn't come back, and the wound from that wouldn't vanish for the whole life. But, even so, there was a salvation even if just one. It was really as though the world rewarded a little, to someone that had done their best.



And, at that time Vanessa who left them for a bit because she received a call returned to them.



「Kousuke-san. Bernard is coming to see you off.」



「Yoo, Aby. I came as the troops' representative.」



It seemed Vanessa had gone to the entrance to welcome Bernard who came to the airport to see off Kousuke.



「Coming expressly here like this, is your work okay?」



「No, it's not okay. That's why I need to go back right away, but it will be no good if we don't give even a single parting salute when you return home to your country like this. Besides you see, here is souvenir from the guys in the troops.」



「Eh, my bad, troubling you like this. But, if that's the case then I'll accept gratefully――」



Saying that, Kousuke got a bit shy while he peeked inside the bag before his cheeks convulsed. Inside there were various combat knifes and bullets that were carved with strange letters. There were also hand grenades that were written with obscene jokes, Zippo lighter, and high-class cigar crammed inside.



「Are you idiot!? There is no way I can bring this back!」



Kousuke turned into a straight-man reflexively, but Bernard replied with a puzzled expression.



「Eh, but, you. You are normally carrying something like this right? Remember, that small katana, or the knives.」



「Ah……yeah, I guess. Sorry. Also thanks.」



He had no word to retort to that. Like that Kousuke put the souvenir into his rucksack. He planned to throw them into the Treasure Warehouse later.



Bernard who finished handing over the souvenir then nodded in satisfaction before he swiftly turned around. It seemed that it was true that was busy.



「See ya, Aby. When next you come here, show your face no matter what. I'll introduce you to a delicious restaurant.」



「Aa, thanks. Bernard too, don't be too reckless.」



Kousuke smiled wryly while saying his thanks to Bernard who he could only think as someone that was loved by the death god and the goddess of luck simultaneously. And then,



「What are you saying? I have a wife and a cute daughter waiting at home for my return. No matter what happened, I will go back home for sure.」



「That's why-, don't say that kind of line so easily like that!」



「Just you wait Annie (the six years old daughter). Father will get home soon……」



「Wai-, Bernard! You, seriously be careful! There is absolutely a death god right behind you there!」



Bernard so easily built a dangerous flag as naturally as breathing like always. And then his figure vanished into the crowd.



「What should I say, in a sense, it feels like he is the one nearest to Kousuke-san. I cannot help but feeling amazed that he doesn't die with that.」



「I can agree with that.」



Vanessa for some reason was staring at Bernard vanishing into the crowd with a gaze that seemed like she was looking at a rival while saying such thing.



「Kousuke, it will be time soon.」



「Oh, is that so. Then, perhaps I should go soon.」



Saying that, Kousuke stood up and shouldered his rucksack. And then, he was about to walk toward the boarding gate. But then his sleeve got pulled.



「Hm? Emily, what's wrong?」



「……」



While staring on the floor, Emily pinched at Kousuke's sleeve tightly without showing any sign of releasing it. Kousuke reflexively looked at Vanessa looking for help, but Vanessa only shrugged and didn't say anything.



「Eeer, Emily. I'm leaving behind my clone, and I also told you my contact number right? We will be able to meet again soon, don't look that reluctant, it's embarrassing somehow.」



「……」



Kousuke said that kind of thing with an exaggerated gesture a bit jokingly, but Emily's state didn't change. No, her ears that could be seen from between her blond hair were in progress of changing. They were getting redder gradually. Looking closer, her neck and cheeks were also dyed red.



Kousuke then grasped the situation「Come to think of it, in the end I failed to say anything of it! No good!」and he opened his mouth to say something. But, before he could,



「Yo, you see-. You see-, Kousuke!I, I actually-, that, about Kousuke I――」



The face of Emily that snapped up in a flash was truly that of a bright red apple. Her eyes were moist where inside them there was immeasurable heat. In a glance it was obvious that she was about to liberate into words the flame that was already blazing up thunderously inside her chest currently.



The voice of Emily that unexpectedly reverberated loudly stopped the activity of the surrounding people and the walking people from walking along. Their attention gathered at the two of them. The onlookers guessed the atmosphere between the two「Oh my? Could this possibly be……」and their eyes sparkled with deep interest.



And then, Emily-chan who was already at her wits' end was about to carry out her first confession in her life, and her mouth formed the shape of saying「lo」, it was at that instant



「Ah, there you are! Kou-ku~~~n-♡」



A dignified and clear voice rang in the lobby. That voice was so refreshing and also vaguely contained a sweet sensuality that everyone spontaneously searched for the owner of the voice.



Naturally, Kousuke who was familiar with that voice thought「Don't tell me-」while he reflexively averted his gaze from Emily and turned his face toward the direction of the voice.



It was in the middle of her once in a lifetime confession, yet Kousuke turned his gaze toward other. That caused Emily's expression to turn 'funya' into a pitiable look. But, it was no good for her to be like that. Emily had to take her battle stance right away before it became a sorrow for her.



After all, right there the person who would become the fated enemy of Emily was approaching near.



「Kou-kun!」



「Rana!?」



Emily and Vanessa also turned their gaze when Kousuke called a name. There, they could see a super beautiful onee-san running toward them from the other side of the crowd.



Two hills were jiggling up and down with each step of the run. Beautiful dark blue hair. Tight waist and beautiful legs that looked unreal. A beautiful well-proportioned body of body 8 times longer than head which was realized in real life. And a looks that harmonized both cuteness and beauty perfectly.



That beautiful onee-san was rushing toward them with attractive movement like a rabbit hopping forward *pyon pyon*. She decided that the crowd was a hindrance and she shifted her route a bit.



And then, while the people were paying attention to her in various meanings, she leaped and used the nearby pillar as foothold to easily fly over the crowd with beautiful rotation midair. The onlookers unconsciously raised admiring voice「Ooh」seeing that acrobatic performance, but the beautiful onee-san Rana Hauria ignored them and leaped toward Kousuke with *pyon*.



「Kou-kun, long time no see. I wanted to meet you.」



「Eh, ah, yeah. I also wanted to meet you but, no, before that, why are you here!?」



Kousuke asked with his eyes darting about in surprise. Rana chuckled seeing that while answering.



「You see, boss opened the gate for me. He said that it was for experiment. And then, boss said that it seems Kou-kun is in trouble, so he asked me if I want to meet you for a bit, and then he helped sending me here.」



「So, this is Nagumo's doing……」



「Yes, I'm grateful with boss's consideration. But, it's strange you know. For some reason, boss was really impatient just now. 『It's no good if you wait until he come back. Go there right now. Right now! It's better if you ambush him at the airport. Perhaps there will be someone near him, but don't worry of it and just jump at him!』boss said.」



『Tha, tha, that bastaaard-. He knew and still did this!』



Kousuke guessed. The reason why the demon king sent Rana here. It was completely a harassment. Or perhaps he did this from a sentiment of「Comrade♪ Comrade♪」.



In any case, Kousuke was swearing inside his heart while trying to separate himself from the clinging Rana for the time being because of the attention he was showered with――



「Kousuke, that woman, who?」



「Hih」



He could hear a broken language. It was a voice without any emotion in it, a mechanical voice that sounded like machine. Kousuke moved his gaze with a crude motion like a machine that forgot to be oiled. Toward the girl who was about to confess to him.



「Hih」



And then, he shrieked for the second time. Because Emily-chan's eyes, they were completely a single color. She was smiling faintly, but the pupil of her largely opened eyes was opening. It was a face that must not be shown for a beautiful girl.



「Kousuke? Who. That woman?」



「Hm? Ara, nice to meet you young lady.」



The one who reacted first to the repeated question was Rana. It seemed that Rana noticed Emily's existence for the first time when she separated from Kousuke. She then smiled sweetly. And then, she guessed from how Emily called Kousuke name that she must be his acquaintance and so she introduced herself.



With the decorous method Hauria-style.



First of all, sunglasses was necessa~ry!



「Mine name is Ranainferna Hauria! The wind shadow of the head reaper clan, and the lover of the right-hand of the demon king Lord Abyssgate! If you are a friend of the lord, then I welcome you without any reservation. However, please never forget that I'm a woman that belongs to darkness. You won't get away with just mere scald near me.」



There was a rotation. There was a cool pose! From the sunglasses that was slightly lowered, there was a perfect wink *pachin-*.



It was done. The perfect greeting was done toward the friend of her beloved lover. Ranainfe――Rana went「fuh」and her face turned into a triumphant look.



Kousuke crumbled down. The onlookers couldn't catch up at all with the development! Vanessa was nodding「Hohou, so there is a lover already」with an expression that was somewhat admiring.



And then, as for Emily,



「Lo ve r? Lo ve r……Lo ver……Lover!?」



She recovered her sanity. And then, she turned her face toward Kousuke with a motion just like Kousuke before this, it felt like there would be *gigigi* sound ringing out from her neck with how crudely it moved. And then, with an expression that looked half-smiling, or perhaps it was half-crying, with an indescribable expression on her face, Emily asked.



「Kousuke……you have, lover?」



「……err…………yes.」



The onlookers were starting to make noise 'A carnage, it's a carnage'. Kousuke glanced at the commotion with cold sweat while searching for words. Rana was looking alternately at Kousuke and Emily with a puzzled gaze, while Vanessa was staring fixedly at the transition of the situation.



After knowing the fact that Kousuke had a lover, Emily's body was trembling all over while her eyes were looking down.



「He, hey, Emily? I thought many times of telling this――」



「WHYYY! WHY DO YOU HAVE A LOVER! WHYYYYYYYY-!!」



「Whoaa!? Ca, calm down Emily!」



「UWAAAAAAAAAN-, this is just strange-. Just why didn't you tell mee! I would still absolutely fell in love even sooo-, but all the same this is just too muuch-. UWAAAAAAAAAN-」



The loud scream echoed in the airport lobby. Even the staffs of the airport were approaching in wonder of what was going on.



Kousuke who got his collar grasped and shaken back and forth tried to stop Emily, but Emily in her deranged state was unstoppable.



In that chaotic scene, Rana was holding her chin with her hand while thinking of something「Uu~n」, then she clapped her hand *pon-* and walked closer toward the two briskly.



「Yes yes, Emily-chan, can I call you that? How about stopping at that, and talk a bit with me?」



Rana who took off her Hauria mode talked at Emily consolingly.



By the way, Hauria mode referred to the chuuni mode in full power. It was always on 24-hour when she was together with Hauria clan. But, at the time when she was just alone with Kousuke, and at time when there was no Hauria around, Rana had become able to talk normally in normal mode!



Rana was taught that this was the decorum in earth by Shia. It was a secret art that she learned desperately for the sake of greeting Kousuke's parents!



「Uu, what do you want? Is this where you tell me to not approach your man-?」



「No? I just want to confirm to you, Emily-chan.」



「Just whaaat」



「You like Kou-kun? Not as a friend, but as a man?」



「Uuh……that's right-, I like him! I love him! I'm sorry! FUEEeEEEEN-」



Emily confessed that she loved him by throwing all caution to the wind, and then right after that she thought that she had done wrong to Rana and apologized, and then she wailed once more. Seeing that, Rana judged that Emily's feeling was a serious one――



For some reason her eyes were sparkling brightly. And then, she tightly hugged the wailing Emily *mugyu-* and,



「You did it, Kou-kun! The wife is multiplying!」



She blurted out such thing.



「Eer, Rana-san? Just what could you possibly talk about desu?」



Kousuke's speech was turning into a polite language for some reason while he asked with convulsing cheeks. In respond to that,



「Eh? That's why, 'finally the second wife get!' I said.」



Rana responded back with a puzzled expression.



The surrounding fell silent. Kousuke also fell silent. Emily's wailing stopped.



Kousuke's expression looked like he was enduring a headache and he asked while massaging his temple.



「Wh, what's with multiple wives? Isn't the premise strange? I'm planning to marry with Rana though?」



「Eh? It's not strange isn't it? Kou-kun marry with me, then marry Emily-chan, after that you need at the very least five more people!」



「Why!? Why do I need seven wives!? Polygamy is forbidden you know! Or rather, normally wife is just one person!」



Kousuke shouted. Toward that, Rana tilted her head with an expression that was confused as expected,



「That's if at Japan isn't it? Kou-kun will come to my place right? Besides, one day you will become the clan head, so having just one wife――that's no good right?」



「Ka, Karm-san only has one wife right!」



「That's true, but the elder folk usually has multiple wives you know? Don't you know that? Besides――」



「Besides?」



While hearing the sound of his common sense crumbling, Kousuke asked Rana timidly. Rana clinched a broad smile and a thumbs up while she said.



「Even though our boss created a harem, if Kou-kun who is his right-hand man only has one wife then you will get looked down! It's fine! You don't need to be that worried, because I have arranged so I can get along well with the fellow wives!



「That's not the proble――m-」



Kousuke cradled his head in his hands. In Kousuke's mind, he had imagined a future where he and Rana would be a husband and wife like a pair of swan as the head of the clan, yet the Rana in question was actually having expectation 'won't the next wife get found out soon already'. Somehow, Kousuke felt like various things inside him got smashed.



He felt like he could vaguely heard the voice of the demon king「You too, have a taste my feeling, my bosom friend」. He got the mood of wanting to punch him flying very much.



「Wai-, just wait a second. You, you are saying that it's fine even if I'm included?」



Emily somehow managed to pull out from Rana's chest and asked in agitation.



「But of course. Let's support Kou-kun together okay?」



「No no no, that's absolutely no good! Something like that! That's just, im, impure! As I thought a married couple has to be a pair that is being the best partner for each other……」



Emily whose head was messed up already inside was talking about what a married couple was. But, Rana was directing a meaningful expression「Fu~hn」at such Emily. Seeing that Emily bluffed「Wha, what is it」to which Rana smiled complacently and said.



「Then Emily-chan, you just give up on Kou-kun. If you say that it's no good unless there is only one wife, then that position is mine. There is absolutely zero chance for you to replace me.」



「-. Tha, that's……」



'Fufuhn', Rana showed a fearless smile. Emily was plainly flustered from that. Rana wore her sunglasses once more and made a rotation.



「Hmph, it's absurd to believe that you can win against this me. The heart of Abyssgate is the prisoner of my hand of darkness. There is no hope for anyone to liberate it from me. Fufufu-」



Well, in other words, it seemed that Rana was saying 'Kousuke is deeply in love with me, and I also have no intention of letting him go at all~'.



Emily saw Rana sharply pointing her finger at her, and she understood one thing.



「……I got it. So you are the cause.」



「Hm? What are you saying I wonder? Oh cute little kitty?」



「That's why-, I'm saying that you are the cause! That speech and act of Kousuke that was painful to look at, that's because of you right!」



「Gafuh!?」



Kousuke was shot. A girl who said that she loved him, but it seemed that actually she was thinking that he was painful to look at. Cracks entered his heart.



「Actually he is a cool and lovely person! Yet the moment the battle start, he became strange! It's you who make Kousuke to become like that isn't it!」



「Gofuh!?」



「Fuh. Indeed, it's not an exaggeration to say that it was me who awakened Lord Abyssgate. And? If that's the case then what are you going to do? Do you think that a kitty like you can do anything?」



Rana chuckled 'ku-ku-ku-' looking really crooked. She was in high spirits. She was in super high spirits.



Not noticing Rana's mood who was absurdly enjoying this, Emily-chan who was resolved to rescue her beloved proclaimed a war declaration.



「I swear, I swear that I'll turn Kousuke back into a proper human!」



「Gahah!?」



「I wonder if you are able of that?」



「It's not about being able or not. It's about doing it or not! Besides, I also won't let you get away.」



「Me?」



「That's right. Even though you are this beautiful, but you are doing embarrassing act like that! It's unforgivable as a fellow woman! I swear I'll turn you back into a proper human too!」



「Ku-ku-ku-, you can howl really loud, small hero! Then just try it! I won't run or hide anywhere! However, never forget. When you peek into the abyss, the abyss will also peek back toward you!」



「I won't lose! I will not lose! Just watch Kousuke! Because I won't let you be that kind of pitiful human!」



「……」



Rana's loud laughter that couldn't hide her feeling of 'This is super fun!' was reverberating, the war cry of Emily who was threatening like a cat going *fushaa-* was echoing, Kousuke felt his heart died.



The airport was enveloped in chaos.



In the middle, Vanessa appealed「This loyalty, is higher than mountain. This love, is deeper than sea」while announcing her candidacy as the third wife. Hearing that Rana said「You-, are pretty good! I warmly welcome you!」, to which Vanessa said「My greatest thanks」and fell on her knee theatrically. It was at that time that the security of the airport finally arrived.



While everyone was taken to the security office cordially, Kousuke took out his smartphone powerlessly and made a call.



『Ou, Endo. What's――』



「Just you wait, Nagumo.」



『Ha? Ah, you had met Rana already? From that sentence, it looks like it became something interesting huh?』



The voice of Hajime cackling loudly could be heard from the other side of the phone.



Kousuke spoke with a deeply held resentment.



「This time I'll sock you in the face! I'll make you regret handing Last Zell to me!」



『Eh, wai-, you-――』



Kousuke cut off the call.



In front of him, there were Emily and Rana who were still continuing to quarrel with each other even while receiving the exasperated gaze of the security staffs. Sure enough, the new objective that was added into Emily's lifework――the grand objective of stopping the chuuni of Rana, and also Hauria clan in addition, would the day it was accomplished come in the future?



「Kousuke-san. Four more wives left. They should be somewhere in the world. Let's do our best from here on. I'm feeling excited for some reason.」



「Which RPG that is huh. Just stay quiet a bit, Danessa.」



Kousuke averted his gaze from Danessa who was staring at him with an excited gaze just as she said, then he let out a deep sigh.



「Come to think of it, I'm not studying at all throughout this holiday.」



It seemed that Kousuke's dream was still far ahead.



The strongest assassin who nonchalantly saved a country, or possibly even the world, was worrying about the national mock exam that would be carried out at the first day after the holidays, and then he breathed out a deep sigh once more.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Finally it finished……



This is really a long extra compilation. Shirakome never thought that he would write until this much (wry smile)



Really, thank you very much for accompanying me until the very end.



It will make me happy if this can become a good thing for you to kill time with.



The development after this is completely undecided.



I also want to write the characters that weren't written at the Afterstory, like the hero or Shia, I want to try writing the extra of others too.



However, I think I want to rest a little due to my circumstance at the real life and so on. I'm wondering whether to rest for the whole August.



I might nonchalantly update again when I raise my spirit, so at that time it will make me happy if you readers will come reading again.



Then, let's meet again later.



I pray so that lovely chuuni will be with everyone who love Narou.





Chapter 224




AN: The title is different from my advance notice?



*tap tap tap tap-* The sound of typing keyboard resounded. The force of that typing was fierce. It was as though it represented they typing person's fury, or perhaps their desperation. That sound ruined the chic atmosphere of the office that was consolidated with wooden furniture.



「Uu, there is work today too. Tomorrow will be work too. The day after tomorrow too, and the day after that too and the day next after that will be work too-! Even though, I'm not a princess anymoreee!」



The sound of *tap tap tap-* finally became a *da-da-da-da-da-da-* sound that resembled a shooting machine gun. Right now the fingertips striking the keyboard were leaving behind afterimage……such thing didn't happen, but the force of the fingertips was to the degree that gave such illusion.



The one who was skillfully using the modern earth device as a matter of unpleasant necessity with teary eyes for some reason was the beautiful girl who once was the princess of Hairihi Kingdom at another world Tortus――Liliana S. B. Hairihi, that person.



Liliana was fourteen years old when the other world summoning was carried out with a face that still had childishness remaining in it at that time. But now she was about to reach twenty years old. The six years and also the rich experience she went through during that time had polished her beautiful face even further.



Her hair that was like flowing gold threads, her eyes that were overflowing with gentleness and intelligence, her rose-colored cheeks, her gracefully moist lips, and then her elegance and personality that were oozing out even without her particularly doing anything, all those factors were enough to captivate anyone regardless of gender.



In fact, Liliana who accepted the invitation of her beloved and migrated to this earth had been receiving immense fame――no, rather than fame it was more accurate to call it worship from a lot of people.



It showed from this.



*knock knock*, knocking sound resounded a bit loudly, and when Liliana responded, a woman entered the room.



「Excuse me, your holiness. About the additional material for the case that will be discussed at the afternoon……」



「I had finished it-! Yes, I finished it already! After all I was dealing with that since six o'clock in the morning you see!」



The woman who was wearing a business suit looking perfectly like a career woman was handed over the script of document by Liliana in a snap.



The woman who was Liliana's secretary――Sandra Winchester slightly opened wide her intelligent eyes and she accepted the document while replying「As expected from your holiness」with a voice that was crammed with admiration.



Now then, about this designation that Sandra called Liliana with――"your holiness".



Yes, it wasn't "your highness", but "your holiness".



They were at earth, where there was only limited number of people who could introduce themselves as royalty, so naturally Liliana had abandoned her title as princess in this world, but the title "holy woman" then clung to her as though in replacement.



This was exactly the reason, why Liliana was teary-eyed since six in the morning while she exhibited her typing skill that was like a storm while discharging grumbles of complain.



「Your holiness. About the enquiry from several countries that will question regarding the standing of "Hairihi Faith" at the conference today……」



「It's not "Hairihi Faith", it's "Hairihi Volunteer Association"! ……cough-. Anyway, give them the answer as indicated in the document. This is the draft. Please send it to the media correspondence department. I'll entrust them to proofread it to a certain degree, but please caution them earnestly that they are not to use any words that will endear to any faction.」



「Acknowledged. After all this will affect the hundreds of thousands of the believer from here on. I will enforce your holiness's will thoroughly. Also, the madam chief of Britain's state security department has called so about that」



「It's not "believer", but "association member". Please delegate the whole thing with Magdanese-san to Kousuke-san. Also, I think that Vatican will also come with the attempt to make contact, but delegate that to Kousuke-san too. He has a relationship that knows each other with the leaders of both organizations, so delegate it wholly to him even if he comes crying or complaining. If he try to escape, please tell him that I'll tattle to demon king-sama then.」



「Yes. Aa, also, about secretary general that will be our conference partner, it seems that he already arrived.」



「Uguh. He, he arrives really quickly. I guess that shows just how much he is holding expectation and suspicion. If the conference this time recognize our "association" formally as an "international volunteer group"……we will be able to clear the strange misunderstandings, and I too will be able to throw all the work wholesale to someone e――cough, to reach out my helping hand to a lot more people. No matter what, we have to sweep away the perception to our association that see us as a suspicious "newly rising religion"……」



「That's right. By using that kind of official stance to make use of the UN, we will permeate into every religion, and someday the teaching of your holiness's sublimity will spread to the whole wor――」



「It won't spread-. I'm not someone like a certain scheming demon king somewhere!Our association is purely a volunteer organization until the end, it's not a religious organization I told you-. Or rather, recently I tended to ignore it, but don't call me "your holiness", but "chairman"!」



「Yes, chairman-sama(your holiness).」



「Hey you. Just now, you are attaching brackets there right! It's plain to see you know! Ah, wait, what's with that expression that seems to say『It's fine, I understand everything clearly』! You completely don't understand anything!」



While Liliana's voice that was mixed with straight-man retort was reverberating, Sandra was directing a gaze that was filled plenty with affection and respect toward the holy woman who was also modest today, and then she reverently bowed before taking her leave.



Inside the office that was filled with silence once more, the *tic tac* sound of the watch was echoing excessively loudly.



Liliana dropped her waist powerlessly on the chair and hung her head down while holding it with both hands.



And then, she muttered briefly right from her heart.



「How, did it turn out like this……」



Now then, Liliana was supposed to be a normal girl without any title whatsoever in earth, but in less than two years her believer swelled up to hundreds of thousands and she got worshipped as the founder of a new religion――a "holy woman, the government of every country and other religions were unreasonably cautious toward her, she had overcome brutal events like scheme behind the scene and assassination, and now she was preparing for a conference with the top brass of the United Nations in order to turn her association into a publicly recognized volunteer organization where after that a press conference that would be broadcasted to the whole world would be opened. In the end, just what kind of sequence of events that made her ended up falling into such situation……



Inside the office where there was silence and bright sunlight shining in, there was only the sound of moving pen *scratch scratch* and the sound of the clock that sounded like a chirping bird *chirp-chirp-chirp-chirp-* resounding.



It was a really calm place that was optimum for doing paperwork.



But, the owner of that room was in a state that couldn't be said as calm at all. The hand moving the pen didn't stop, but it was only her gaze that kept glancing briefly at the clock many times over, she then looked at the mountain of paperwork and sighed, then her shoulders dropped after measuring the height of the paperwork……she then started reducing the mountain of paperwork diligently, got fidgety, and got dejected……



「Liliana-sama……I understand your feeling, but no matter how many times you checked the clock, the time won't progress faster you know?」



「-, I, I'm not, worrying about anything you know?」



「No, I'm not fooled at all. Because you are already fidgety like that.」



Liliana moaned「Uh」having that pointed by her exclusive maid.



「Today is the day your beloved husband can cross over here isn't it? Starting from that "Kouki-kun is abducted too many times- Case", demon king-sama seemed to be busy with various things and got dragged into turmoil, so it has been five months since he can properly take time to meet you. That's why, isn't it fine even if Liliana-sama doesn't force yourself to do your duty just for today?」



「I cannot do that. If I shirk off my duty by using that person as excuse, then there will be no meaning to my resolve that decided to be left here in this world.」



The maid suggested so, however, Liliana rejected it while smiling wryly.



A month after the legendary decisive battle. Even though at that time Liliana was worked to death with the revival of her motherland, but she still fiercely appealed at Hajime firmly. Perhaps that also worked in her favor, that after many twists and turns (especially with the first wife), she managed to be accepted by Hajime along with Aiko who was also fiercely appealing similarly like her, and she spent a brief time of happiness, but……



Liliana was a princess.



Furthermore his majesty the king of the country was absent, and her younger brother that would be the next king, Randell was still immature. Although Liliana's mother Luluaria was working hard, as expected there was a limit in the middle of the situation where the kingdom's capital was annihilated. The postwar processing that was done by Liliana who had gathered much sympathy from her great effort as the commander-in-chief at the decisive battle became something indispensable for the kingdom.



Therefore, although Liliana was conflicted, she made the decision to not abandon her position. It was unknown whether Hajme and others who would return to their home would be able to open the gate to Tortus once more. And so, there was even the possibility that it would become a parting for their whole life.



Even so, Liliana couldn't abandon her motherland.



Liliana told Hajime that she would stay behind with the resolve for everything. She declared that resolve of hers, however, Hajime smiled happily instead. Liliana remembered that smile clearly. Of course, that smile wasn't because Hajime was happy that he could part with Liliana. If that was actually the reason, then Liliana might threw herself off the tower regardless of her resolve or anything……



Anyway, that determination become one of the great reason, and there was no doubt that she had accomplished joining the wives group. The night before the return to earth, it went without saying how the resolved Liliana was blazing more than usual.



「……Princess. Please come back to reality. And then, please wipe up your drool. Your face has turn into something that must not be shown toward other people.」



「Hah!?」



Liliana had gone completely into a trip from recalling the passionate night she spent with Hajime. The exasperated voice of her exclusive maid caused her mind to return to reality with 'hah'. And then, she took out her handkerchief and thoroughly wiped the saliva trickling from the corner of her lips.



「Princess and Hajime-sama's relation is really harmonious isn't it? The voices of envy among the maids also still hasn't stop. Similarly I also feel really envious.」



「It, it's not that great……」



The words of her exclusive maid caused Liliana's cheeks to go red and she began to deal with the paperwork in high-speed to hide her embarrassment. For her to hide her embarrassment with high-speed paperwork processing, perhaps it was just as expected from the talented princess of the kingdom.



「……Princess. At the "gate opening" this time, what will you do?」



「What do you mean?」



The exclusive maid who was gazing smilingly at the embarrassed Liliana then went through a complete change and she asked with a serious expression.



「With the help of the artifacts that Hajime-sama exclusively left behind for the craftsmen, the royal capital is reconstructed in astounding speed. Seventy percent of the whole has been finished in this one year and half. The plan for the new royal capital's formal ceremony of the revival proclamation has also began.」



「……That's right. Certainly, with the help of everyone from the empire and the beastmen, the truly new royal capital is in the process of being built by also taking in the style of many nations. The functional beauty of the empire capital, the nature beauty of Fea Belgen, and then the traditional beauty of Hairihi Kingdom……it's a wonderful city that harmonize all of those.」



「Yes.」



「It will become a symbolic city that is worthy for the new era that has freed itself from the rule of the mad god. The ceremony has to be a grand celebration that include the fresh start toward the new era.」



Liliana's gaze was directed from the window to the outside. Ahead of her gaze there was a beautiful townscape taking shape. If she sharpened her ear, she would be able to faintly hear the hustle and bustle of the reconstruction and the work activity.



Liliana's cheeks loosened and her eyes squinted fondly at that. She felt like it was worth it for her to work so hard there was barely any time to sleep for her.



「Yes. This matter should be almost fixed already with the agreement of the empire and the beastman clan too. And above all else, as long as Liliana-sama's spouse is that "Goddess's Sword"……no, the "Godslaying Demon King", there won't be any problem that can occur that easily.」



「……What is it that you want to say?」



Liliana returned her gaze from the window toward her exclusive maid. A suspicion dwelled inside her eyes. The exclusive maid told her master that she respected with a voice that was filled with gentleness and sympathy.



「Isn't it enough already?」



「Enough……」



「Yes. His highness Randell-sama has grown remarkably, he also has excellent retainers with him. The reconstruction of the capital and the relationship with other countries, they have reached a point where we can take a breather. It's my humble opinion that even without Liliana-sama leading in the front, the kingdom is already able to keep advancing forward even then. Then, Liliana-sama, don't you think that it's better for Liliana-sama to start chasing after your own happiness?」



「……」



'Is that really the case?' Liliana questioned herself while staring once more at the new capital outside the window.



Even so, certainly it was the fact that recently the work where it absolutely needed Liliana to be handled had decreased remarkably. And then, at times where she could relax, her thought would run toward her beloved every time. She would think of him especially vividly at night when she was all alone by herself, constricting Liliana's heart painfully.



「Hajime-san……」



「Fufu, isn't that the answer, Liliana-sama?」



「-」



A voice that wished for her beloved unconsciously leaked out. The exclusive maid that caught that voice laughed merrily with loosened cheeks as though she had seen something delightful or perhaps something charming. Liliana felt somewhat awkward getting seen through like that, she averted her face with her cheeks reddening.



The exclusive maid chuckled even more from seeing Liliana like that. Surely, if in this place there were other servants who were serving under Liliana, every one of them would surely made similar smile from seeing their master's cuteness.



Everyone was holding really deep thought of respect and gratitude to Liliaan.



Liliana was already loved by the servants and also the people due to her personality. And yet she didn't stop just there, when the capital was once attacked, she slipped out of the palace by herself and went to call for help. Such event was well-known due to a certain merchant with a name that was similar with an energy drink.



In addition, it was also known how she tried to offer her body to the empire in order to save the kingdom that was weakened by the attack.



And then, in that legendary decisive battle.



While the people of the capital were sent to evacuate toward the empire, they asked what she would do with unease in their heart. To that, Liliana said with a smile.



――Even though the royal capital will become a battlefield, if I the princess don't fight, then who will fight



She became the commander-in-chief and took the command of hundreds of thousands of warriors in the battle that staked the existence of mankind. That gallant figure was spread far and wide by the surviving soldiers, mercenary, and adventurers.



Her fame had risen up with a momentum that pierced the sky already. Regardless of man or woman, young or old, in spite of race or occupation.



That was why, the exclusive maid could say the words「it's enough already」with conviction. That it was the general consensus of all the people.



Liliana threw her gaze to outside the window once more, at the reconstructed city. She felt the warm gaze of the exclusive maid while wearing an ambiguous expression, unable to be convinced whether it was really fine for her to be liberated from the responsibility as royalty and chased after her own happiness crossing over the world.



But, at that time, *ri―n* a sound that was like a wind chime rang. That was a signal from the room in a corner of the palace that was used for "gate opening". The sign that the door to another world was opened.



「-. Hajime-san!」



Her gloominess until just now vanished somewhere. Liliana's expression bloomed brightly in a flash like a child. She said to her exclusive maid「I'm going to welcome him!」before going out of the room with energetic footsteps without even waiting for reply.



The exclusive maid was silently bowing toward the door that was opened vigorously.



Hajime who appeared from the gate was jumped by Liliana with obvious happiness. And then without stopping she pulled Hajime's hand like a kid and guided him to her own room.



Midway, they passed by the servants of the palace and several nobles, each time they faced Hajime with unconcealed respect while their expression greatly softened seeing Liliana who kept tugging on Hajime's hand in her grasp as though to say「Hurry-, hurryyy」.



Every time Liliana passed by someone she would greet them politely, but it seemed she didn't notice their warm expression. Surely after some time passed and she calmed down, she would become like a ripe apple then.



Hajime was wearing a troubled smile seeing such Liliana while he was getting dragged cutely. At Liliana's room, he received black tea that was personally brewed by her.



「Nevertheless, today Hajime-san comes alone then. I thought that Yue-san and others would surely come too though.」



Liliana was placing a tea snack that looked like cookie on the table while asking Hajime with her head tilted. Hajime made a smile that vaguely looked mischievous and asked back.



「What? You don't like being alone with me?」



「Suc, such thing……couldn't possibly be true.」



Liliana cheeks faintly reddened and she dropped her waist on the chair with a thump. Hajime's gaze that was oozing a bit of S aura caused her gaze to wander and her body to fidget around without any composure. And then, Liliana became unable to endure Hajime's atmosphere that seemed to enjoy her state and she changed the topic.



「And, what about Hajime-san? It seemed that you were really busy from "Kouki-kun is abducted too many times- Case" though……」



「……That naming, it really caught on?」



「Yes, well. After all, after that other world summoning, Kouki-san was further summoned again and dragged Hajime-san then right? I heard the story that at the third summoning Kouki-san got dragged in with teary eyes while also dragging in Hajime-san. That story is already spread around here. Ryuutaro-san and others were telling that story looking really amused.」



Hajime half-smiled at Liliana's words.



Just as Liliana said, Kouki who went into an atonement journey in this Tortus, but in the middle of his journey when he stopped by in the palace, he got summoned into another world somewhere.



There, Kouki faced his own way of living and through many twists and turns he saved the world but……



At that time, when Hajime who was begged by Kouki's childhood friends and his wife rushed to where Kouki was for assistance, just when the series of event were resolved and they were going 'no, let's go home', another summoning assaulted Kouki as though to say「Next one, please take care of ii~t」.



Kouki was on the verge of tears while yelling「I don't want anymoreeeeee~~~」and he wasted no time to cling tightly at Hajime who was nearby him. Demon king-sama got flustered「Wai-, you-」but it was already too late.



While the childhood friends and wives were staring in a daze, both of them intimately went through another world summoning for the third time.



To tell the truth, after various things were happening at that world, they got summoned for the fourth time. Kouki was a softhearted person, but as expected it seemed that he snapped toward the goddess that requested「I want you to save the world」, and in front of the watching Hajime he,



「You stupid idiot-. Why are you giving up like this! Do your best-, do your best! You are a goddess right! If it's you then you can do it-. You can do it by yourself! You surely can! Believe in me who believe in you! If you give up, then it's the end for the world y'know!」



Like that, entrusting himself to the momentum Kouki insisted「Please manage it somehow by yourself」. In a sense he had done something astounding. It was a heartfelt insistence to the degree it made Hajime to be unconsciously in admiration.



As the result, currently there were her majesty the queen of the third world and the materialized goddess of the fourth world at both sides of Kouki, staring at each other with sparks scattering between them.



Back to the story



Hajime recounted the experience with a bit of faraway look. He then noticed Liliana who was staring at him in wonder and he coughed before returning to the topic.



「Well, it has calmed down somehow. Right now I'm going to college while trying to expand my business. Well, even though I said that, in earth there are also dangerous bunches and guys with dozens of loose screw in their head as it is, so I'm busy there in its own way.」



「Is that so. Come to think of it, I heard that Kousuke-san is running around to resolve that kind of case. He introduced several women who will live in this side.」



「……Those Hauria bunches are sprinting to even weirder direction from obtaining earth's knowledge. It's tiring already thinking about those guys.」



The 'hyahha' life of the head-reaping rabbits that exhausted even the demon king. Just where in the world they were going toward? In a sense it was worthy of admiration how a certain girl in lab coat and side-tail hairstyle was still working hard. And then, as for a certain agent who recently became obsessed with wearing rabbit ear hairband and in a mistake forgot to take it off and casually went into her workplace, surely she was completely beyond hope.



Hajime was about to get a faraway look once more. In order to make him return to reality, Liliana opened her mouth with slight panic.



「Even so a college student is it……how should I say it, I have some doubt if there will be anything that Hajime-san and others can learn at college after this far.」



「Well, I cannot deny that. But, you know, the college students all over the world are relatively noncommittal don't you think? We too, it's not like we took the examination with serious thinking of wanting to learn something. It will be a long life after all. We just thought that it won't be that bad to have experience of being a college student.」



「I, is that how it is? I heard that what is called college at the world over there is the highest institute of education, so I thought that it would be a gathering of those who are serious with their study.」



「Of course, there are also the serious bunches there, and that's also the correct way of going through college. It will be a different story if I'm using my parent's money, but I'm paying everything, the tuition and also the living expenses by my money that I earned myself. Whether anyone will do it seriously or loosely, it depends on each person. What I'm saying is, just what is bad about going there in order to enjoy the student life.」



Hajime said that with a shrug. His feeling of wanting to experience university was true, and it was also a fact that he was learning the major of archeology and folkloristics because he was interested with them.



Although, his biggest reason was something that couldn't be helped that was "wanting to see the female college student Yue". The experience hearing lecture while sitting side by side with Yue in appearance of around twenty years old really satisfied Hajime. Of course, he wouldn't say it out loud.



By the way, just like always, his harem situation and the wives' beauty caused a university somewhere to be still in the middle of chaos and mayhem.



「Enjoying school life…..is it.」



Liliana let out a small mutter. It wasn't like there was particularly great emotion filling that mutter, but the small hope that was implicitly included in that mutter couldn't be hidden.



Because she was a princess, Liliana was unrelated with student social status. Something like a springtime of life in the middle of school life like a normal girl was something that she only knew from book. She had a longing for it, and she also dreamed about it.



It was possible that she could experience high school life with Hajime and others if she acted selfishly in the past. If she abandoned the kingdom and her status as princess and shook off everything behind, then perhaps such dream could become reality.



She thought until that far, however, Liliana thought「How stupid」with a self-depreciating smile and shook her head. Abandoning the people to run toward the dream with a man, that kind of woman wasn't herself.



――I am Liliana S. B. Hairihi The only princess of Hairihi Kingdom.



She had longing toward normal girl. But, if she discarded being a princess for that, then the brilliant soul of Liliana would die out. It would be no other that Liliana herself that couldn't forgive her if she abandoned the people and ran away from her obligation. If she did something like that, surely Liliana would continue to scorn herself for her whole life.



Just when she thought about her own personality as「What a difficult personality」, a small laugh suddenly reached her ears. When she raised her gaze in puzzlement, there was Hajime with a smile on his lips staring fixedly at Liliana while resting his chin on his hand. His gaze was awfully kind in contrast with the smile on his mouth.



「E, err, what is it?」



For some reason she couldn't look at Hajime's eyes and she turned away slightly while asking. Her heart was beating fast hammering in her chest.



「No, nothing. I'm just thinking, that you are proud like usual.」



Liliana tilted her head from not understanding of what Hajime wanted to say. Hajime's smile was turning increasingly kinder seeing that while he spoke the main topic that he came for today.



「Enough about me for now……what about the kingdom? I more or less let out reconnaissance planes right after I arrived, and have a look at the situation. Based from what I see, it seems that the reconstruction is going along well.」



「That's, right. I also talked about it just now with my maid, but even the plan for the celebration ceremony of the new royal capital completion has began, I also hasn't heard of any serious problem with the empire, the beastmen, and the rebirth holy church. I believe that we will be able to proclaim our revival in less than half a year. Of course, the new capital has the concept of "an open city to other country and race", so there is a huge mound of small problems.」



Even while feeling perplexed with the radical topic change, Liliana answered like that with a wry smile. She also said「Come to think of it, I came here after leaving a mountain of paperwork that I have to go through」with her tongue playfully sticking out.



But, Hajime only narrowed his eyes at that joking gesture of Liliana without particularly laughing back, and he then asked quietly.



「About that, is that a problem that cannot be resolved without Lily here――without princess Liliana S. B. Hairihi here?」



「Eh?」



Liliana lost her words hearing Hajime's question. The content of the talk was similar with her conversation just now with her exclusive maid.



「Is this country unable to progress forward without Princess Liliana? Will it mean that you abandon "the responsibility of royalty" by leaving now? Is crossing over the world will hurt your pride?」



「Pl, please wait a second. Just, what is this about……」



Liliana waved around her hands from being unable to understand the surge of questions and asked Hajime to stop.



……Of course, she actually understood, just what Hajime was saying to her. The fast beating in her heart didn't show any sign of stopping. Her face was so heated that she was aware of it herself.



But, honestly she also felt perplexed. She had been a princess since she was born. It wasn't an exaggeration to say that it was her identity. Even though she understood that her happiness lied in another place, it wasn't easy for her to make the decision.



As though seeing through that perplexity of Liliana, Hajime smiled wryly「You are thinking too hard on it」while adding further on his words.



「I'm not asking you to abandon being a princess. This is just a matter of the order of priority. Leave the role of being royalty to other people for a bit, and live for your own sake a bit more――won't you be like that any time now? That's what I mean.」



「I, I am……」



'Is it really fine?' Liliana tilted her head again with such doubt.



Hajime's expression turned half concerned and half exasperated from seeing the princess who was still conflicted with feeling of reluctance and guilt to leave her country for her own sake.



And then, he scratched his head a bit roughly as though he had finally grown impatient.



「Good grief……you really are an obstinate princess.」



「Hajime-san?」



Liliana who understood what was the intention of Hajime giving her that kind of question gazed anxiously at Hajime who was looking like that thinking「By any chance, has he fallen out of love with me?」.



Hajime also returned an exasperated gaze at that gaze of Liliana while replying,



「Stop acting like this already, if you won't act at least a bit selfish……I'm going to kidnap you, you know?」



「Hee!?」



He said such thing.



Liliana raised a hysteric voice while jerking her body that his chair made bumping sound. Hajime then grinned broadly while making additional blow by saying「A demon king kidnapping a princess……that's not strange at all right?」.



Naturally, it caused Liliana's face, no, all of her visible skin to be dyed bright red to the degree that it looked like she might explode.



Liliana kept opening and closing her mouth wordlessly. Hajime shrugged to that, and then, thinking that there wouldn't be any progress like this, he suddenly took out a crystal ball from "Treasure Warehouse II" that looked like the item used in fortune-telling and put it on the table.



「If you are that doubtful whether it's okay for you to live for your own sake, then let's just ask directly instead.」



「Wha, what are you planning to do?」



The demon king took out an artifact――that fact caused Liliana to feel a bad premonition blaring in her mind and her cheeks twitching. The princess laid bare her wariness in a complete change while the demon king activated the artifact with a really nice smile.



And then, he took in a deep breath facing toward the crystal ball that was faintly shining and,



「AT~~~~~TENT~~~~~ION-!!」



He yelled really loudly with that kind of voice. Instantly there was exactly the same voice and word『AT~~~~~TENT~~~~~ION-!!』resounding from outside the window.



Liliana turned her startled face to outside the window, and while her mind was in chaos「E? Eee!?」, the demon king-sama who was also in perfect form today raised his voice uncompromisingly toward the people of the new capital projected inside the crystal ball, where they were also similarly looking around at the surrounding with their mind in chaos.



「This is too abrupt but――I'm the demon king!」



「Certainly it's just too abrupt!」



Liliana acted the straight-man from her heart. From the crystal ball there were also the voices of several people who similarly acted the straight-man, resounding inside the room.



It seemed that this artifact had the function that connected the image and voice. Just now Hajime said that he launched reconnaissance planes to the new capital right after he arrived, so surely this artifact was linked with those countless planes with two-way connection to broadcast the voice.



Hajime smoothly ignored Liliana's retort and sent his voice to the middle of the capital.



「People of the new capital, I'm asking all of you. ――Do you still need Princess Liliana?」



「Ha, Hajime-san!?」



The capital people inside the crystal ball were showing a bewildered expression. The amplified voice that was reverberating everywhere caused the people indoor to come outside too and they all looked at each other's face. Hajime told them that he was using an artifact to talk all over the capital and that if they answered from where they were, their voice would reach his ear.



Liliana who guessed what Hajime was trying to do went 'awa awa' in great panic.



「Right now, I'm in the middle of courting Liliana. I told her, just come with me to my world right away. But, the situation is unfavorable. It seem that this princess-sama is worried about you guys, she is really worrying that she cannot bear it. ――What do I do now? At this rate I'm going to get dumped like this, even though I'm the demon king.」



「REA~~LLY, JUST WHAT ARE YOU TALKING ABOUTTTTTT-」



The demon king-sama was venting his anger「Because of you bastards I'm about to get dumped here, asshole」to the people all over the capital. Liliana was getting teary eyes from shame and everything while screaming to such demon king. She stood up so quickly the chair fell down and then she kept hitting repeatedly *poka poka* at Hajime's head to make him stop.



His head was shaking all over *ka-kun ka-kun*, however, the demon king-sama didn't stop.



「Therefore, I'll ask, one more time. Does all of you, does this world, still need Princess Liliana? Are all of you toddling chicks that are so helpless that she cannot take action from worrying about you guys?」



The people looked at each other after hearing that question thrown at them once more.



And then, with a bewildered expression on his face, a stern-looking uncle that seemed to be the foreman of a construction site,



「No, even if I'm asked that……Liliana-sama, she is still staying in the palace until now?」



He said such thing.



Hearing that voice resounding from the crystal ball, Liliana went「Heh?」with a really strange voice. Even while she was astonished like that, the voices of the people of the new capital who were talking to the people beside them in a mood like gossiping were starting to reach through the crystal ball.



「Oh dear me. I was completely under the impression that her highness has been living happily at the other world since a long time ago already.」



「Eh, how strange. I heard that she already has a child with his majesty the demon king already though……」



When the wife of an ingredient shop said that, the shop's owner the husband cocked his head in puzzlement and replied like this,



「If I'm not mistaken, the demon king-sama has been living at the world over there with his other wives since a long time ago I'm told. By any chance, our princess-sama, she got left out?」



「Eh, Liliana-sama, she is alone?」



「No, wait. The relationship between the wives should be great. Yet, for Liliana-sama to be still here mean……by any chance, she didn't get along with her mother-in-law……」



「Princess, she got bullied?」



In front of the new main gate, when the soldiers of the kingdom were talking to each other, the male and female adventurers nearby were looking to the sky with sympathizing expression.



Liliana's cheeks were starting to twitch uncontrollably. She had never imagined even in her dream, that during the time she was desperately taking care of works day by day, the people that she worked for actually thought that she had eloped since long time ago. Furthermore, her still being in the palace was starting to make strange misunderstandings spreading!



「Wai-, wait everyone~~! I'm not being left out and also not being aloneee! I even get along well with my mother-in-law Sumire-sama! A, also, something like chi, children……I don't have them yet. I am just doing my work pro~~perly here!」



Liliana reflexively gave explanation with a loud voice, but that voice was picked perfectly by the artifact that was pointlessly high-spec and it was sent until every corner of the capital.



The pathetic sounding explanation of their beloved princess caused the people to look at each other for the third time, and then they laughed with each other as though they had arranged it beforehand.



There wasn't even a shred of emotion that was making fun in their laughter. Those laughter were overflowing with warmth.



The foreman of construction site whose voice got picked up the very first tensed his dirty face while sending his words.



「In that case, there is only one answer to that question of his majesty the demon king.」



The foreman then glared at his surrounding, there his several dozen subordinates made similar expression. And then, with their voice matched together,



「「「「「「We don't need the princess anymore!」」」」」」



The wife and husband of the ingredient shop just now, and the surrounding people were,



「「「「「We are fine already!」」」」」



The soldiers, adventurers, mercenaries,



「「「「「Please don't treat us like a helpless chick!!」」」」」



Liliana's eyes were nailed toward the crystal that kept changing the projected image with the voices of those people getting through.



The people of the capital right now were facing at the palace and they raised their voice.



The people who were in the middle of working stopped moving their hand, the people indoor got outside, regardless of adult or child, they all were saying things like「Just how long princess is going to keep working」or「Her highness worry too much」or「If princess do nothing but work, then his highness demon king will fall out of love you know」that pierced relatively deep into Liliana without batting an eyelid.



But, their expression was uniformly warm, that was why the heart of the people was conveyed toward their beloved princess Liliana with nothing to spare.



Namely,



――Enough with the tedious talk. It's fine already, so just chase your happiness right away



That.



The warm lovely thing overflowing out from Liliana's heart turned into tears that trickled through her cheek. She leaked out a sobbing voice and she formed her words desperately even while her voice stuttered many times.



「E, everyone! Thank, youuu!!」



The formed reply became a ripple that spread through the new capital. Whether those words of gratitude were conveyed or not, the expression of the people that seemed to say「That's our line」gave the answer more eloquently than anything.



Hajime hugged the small shoulder of Liliana who was letting out large drops of grateful tear. That small shoulder had been continuously burdened with the country until now. Hajime circulated his words of conclusion through the artifact.



「You guys, that really helped. Even the obstinate princess finally folded. This is sudden, but I'll take Liliana right away.」



「Eh? Eeh? Hajime-san!?」



Liliana turned bewildered feeling her body floated lightly, and then when she noticed that she was being held in princess carry, her face turned red instantly.



Liliana turned small on Hajime's chest from shyness and happiness. Hajime gave her a glance while taking back the crystal, but his movement suddenly stopped from remembering something.



「Aah, that's right. I'll say this in advance to the people of the new capital. Liliana in the end cannot stop being a princess, she is a woman with kindness, sincerity, and love. Therefore, from here on too she might unexpectedly come home here to take a look at your situation. At that time, if you guys show Liliana predicament that make her sad……know that my 108 harassment will rain down on you all.」



「Wait what are you saying there!」



A demon king was someone unreasonable. And this one here was an extreme one.



Liliana retorted with a convulsing face at the demon king's proclamation of disaster and the faces of the new capital's people were also convulsing all at once. And then, the people swore in each of their heart. 「Let's live seriously with our all」like that.



It was the day people would live with their all, half threatened.



At that day, the princess who had continued to devote herself to the kingdom and the people was kidnapped with a princess carry by the demon king to another world.



……By the way, regarding Liliana's personal effects, thanks to her exclusive maid standing by in front of the room of "gate opening" with complete preparation crammed into a large bag, there was no problem at all.



The bag of Liliana that was presented right away was received by Hajime like it was only natural along with a praise「Good work」, while the exclusive maid acted humbly saying「It's a great honor」like it was only natural. Needless to say, Liliana yelled「You act more like a servant compared than when with me! Or rather, you two absolutely plotted this behind my back already!」when she saw that exchange.



AN: Next chapter will be uploaded at around seven.





Chapter 225




AN: I'll submit one more chapter for the commemoration of the resumption.



Part Time Leader Lily Second Part will be at around 8 or 9 o'clock.



「Hafuu~」



That kind of sigh which was free of tension resounded inside the room that gave a sense of cleanliness with its white tone.



Her own sigh that unexpectedly echoed loudly caused Liliana to be taken aback and she frowned with a speechless expression, perhaps because she was letting out that sigh unconsciously.



For some reason or another, she kept leaning her back deeply on the reclining chair she was sitting on, then she kicked on the floor with her bare tips of the toes and tried turning around. The good quality chair lightly rotated and the state of the room was reflected in Liliana's sight in order.



It was a room that was half the size compared to her room that she used until just some time ago in the palace.



Liliana herself thought that this size was just right, but if the nobles and servants in Tortus knew about this, then they might yelled「How can the princess made to live in this kind of small dog house!」with a look like Edvard Munch's The Scream.



A few months had passed since that day, when "Princess Liliana" went inactive and she arrived on earth. The more she passed the passing months and days, the more her made in earth accessory was increasing bit by bit.



The puppet "Dancing Davis-kun" that she received from Myuu at the moving celebration was emitting its presence excessively. Surely the expression "quivering" suited the puppet more than "dancing". It was vibrating *jiggle jiggle* like a dangerous person who was going through withdrawal symptoms.



Just from where in the world Myuu obtained this Davis-kun……



Honestly speaking it was eerie, but when she recalled Myuu's smiling face when he thought of throwing it away, she was unable to throw it away.



「Fuu~~n」



Liliana was letting out a strange exhalation that lacked in tension while she rotated her chair one more time. She then stepped a bit and rotated in reverse. Whirl whirl. Whirl whirl.



「Nothing, to do.」



It seemed she had spare time.



「How amazing. Liliana is now experiencing by myself that "spare time" I heard from rumor.」



It seemed she really had a spare time. To the degree that she narrated the present condition of herself by herself.



For Liliana who was born as a royalty, what was called "spare time" was the same like a fairytale.



After all she was the sole direct descendant of the royalty until her little brother was born. She began going through education for the gifted since she was old enough to be aware of her surrounding, and even when Randell was born and her possibility to ascend to the throne decreased, but the necessity for her to receive many training in her role as a spare or in order to function as a tie toward the empire didn't decrease at all.



And then, when she was in her youth at fourteen years old, she went through a year of chain of event that was like surging waves, to which the word dense wasn't enough at all to express that experience. And after that she was swamped with work for the sake of the reconstruction.



From the time since she was born until before this, she was in a position that was understandable for her to never experience this thing called "free time" or the like.



That was how Liliana was before, but then she was taken away by Hajime, had her official papers made in forgery, deceived the administrative official, obtained social status peacefully by slapping public safety in the face, and currently she was going to the same college with Hajime and others.



Before this she had been taken to visit earth several times, so she understood that earth was a world that was like a jack-in-the-box. Even so, the "school life" and "learning experience of another world's college" that Liliana yearned tickled her curious mind and gave her fresh enjoyment. It was, but……



Whirl whirl. Whirly whirl. The princess of another world was rotating in twirls using the chair of another world. And then, she came to a stop,



「……Davis-kun. It's nice to be you huh. You look busily quivering.」



Finally the princess started talking to a doll. Davis-kun quivered back and forth looking troubled.



But, at that time, the sound of the entrance opening could be heard faintly.



If Liliana had animal ears growing in her head, then right now it would surely snapped up in attention *pikon*. She wore her indoor slipper and exited her room with rhythmical steps *te-te-te―* in order to welcome the person returning home.



She went down to the first floor and encountered Sumire who was holding large quantity of bags for some reason.



「Welcome home, Sumire-okaasama.」(TN: The kanji for okaa-sama(honored mother) here is written with the kanji of mother-in-law)



「My, you are home early today, Lily-chan. I'm home!」



Sumire fixed her hold on the large amount of bags with a rough huff before Liliana went to help her in a hurry. She took several of the baggage and when she glanced inside them, it seemed their content was a large amount of side dish.



「Say, Sumire-okaasama, this is?」



「You see, this is today's dinner.」



「Dinner?」



「Yes. The dishes that were served in the event had leftovers, and I pilfered them all! They were really delicious. I heard that they called a really famous cook to make the dishes. I thought that I should let my uncute son and his cute wives to try them.」



「Is, is that so. Thank you very much, Sumire-okaasama.」



「Your welcome!」



Liliana's expression crumbled softly seeing her mother-in-law who was all smile.



Frankly speaking, this is Sumire they were talking about so she surely must have forcefully swiped the dishes for "takeout" without even minding the eyes of the surrounding drawing away from her. If not, normally someone would stop anyone from bringing home this much.



It seemed that today there was an event for the live-action film of the manga that was authored by Sumire, so the people there too must be only looking at Sumire who was packing up the food happily while thinking「No way we can anger sensei in this event huuh~」.



Nagumo Family was in prosperity.



Sumire herself was a big name shoujo manga artist, and her husband Shuu had made his company bigger in these few years. And above all, the businesses that Hajime reached out his hand toward here and there were making absurd killing.



From the standpoint of a royalty, it wasn't like Liliana wasn't thinking that they had the allowance, so they could just directly employ that chef to cook directly for them.



But, no matter how much they were earning, no matter how prosperous they were, displaying a dynamism that was not forgetting this kind of "fun" was the shared trait of Nagumo family. It was a tacit precepts of the family.



Liliana became really ticklish seeing Sumire who showed off the dishes「I came with the delicious cooking that I snatched off――!」for the sake of herself who was a daughter-in-law.



They carried the large amount of dishes to the kitchen before Sumire tilted her head「Come to think of it」while speaking out her question.



「You aren't together with Hajime and others?」



「Yes. Hajime-san and others still have lecture, so they are still in the college. The lecture that I was scheduled to have became cancelled……」



「My, that's nice. Doesn't a sudden lecture cancellation make you happy for no reason?」



「Eh? Eer……」



It seemed that Sumire's common feeling wasn't transmitted to the serious and diligent princess. After all this princess was someone that would start talking to a quivering doll when she had too much free time.



「Or rather, even if you don't come home, you can just go to the lecture that Hajime is going to. Even just chattering aimlessly will be fun right?」



「No, Sumire-okaasama. As expected, thinking that it's fine to chatter while receiving lecture is just……」



「Eeh~. It's fun exactly because you are doing it secretly behind the teacher's back.」



「Sumire-okaasama……」



Liliana's shoulders dropped in dejection. Her blood-related mother Luluaria was fundamentally a sincere character that was strict and diligent to herself. And so, Liliana couldn't say anything anymore to the irresponsible statement of her mother-in-law whose sense of value was completely different with her real mother.



But mysteriously, the relationship between Sumire and Luluaria was good even with this, that was why it was something mysterious.



They put the dishes for the this evening with a thud at the kitchen. Sumire was moving the many dishes that were her war booty while she threw her gaze to Liliana who was helping her serving the food with similar nimbleness.



「And, how are you recently? Have you get used to this world? At the time when you only just came, you spent all your times studying various things, but recently you aren't like that anymore.」



「Yes. I have grasped the earth's affair in general. The economic and politic, the religion and history, the situation of every nation, culture, fashion……every book in this world is compiled systematically, and even if there is something I don't understand I can investigate it immediately using internet. It's really convenient.」



「Aa~, yeah, I see.」



「Yes. Especially the more I learned economics and statistics study, the more I feel how deep they are. The density and the fruits of labor that has been accumulated by the predecessor of this world are something that I cannot find in Tortus. Every day I feel like I am shown just how falling behind the study of the world there compared to here.」



「I, I see. How amazing~」



「Yes. Right now over there is still in the middle of reconstruction, even if an advanced system is suddenly introduced, I can see that it will only end up in failure, so it won't be able to happen right away, but someday I believe that the kingdom has to adopt this. Regarding the field of economy, the coordination with Fhuren――」



「St, stop! Sto~~~~~p! That's enough there, Lily-chan!」



「Heh?」



Sumire hurriedly raised her voice to stop Liliana who was spouting a torrent of speech.



Liliana was lifting her face in puzzlement, but even now her hands were moving continuously without pause and served up the packed dishes as though they were palace cooking. Her speed was twice of Sumire's. While her courteousness was triple.



「Geez, Lily-chan, even though you should have leave the position of princess and come into the family, but when you are talking about your mind you are only talking about the kingdom.」



「a……」



Liliana finally noticed herself what she was talking about after getting stared by Sumire's half-admiring half-exasperated face. Her cheeks reddened.



「When you just arrived here, you felt like 'Everything attract my interest so there is no time for that!', but when you calmed down after grasping the situation to a degree, as expected you become concerned with your homeland aren't you?」



「N, no, such thing……is not true.」



Seeing Liliana who stuttered, Sumire put her index finger on her chin muttering「Uu~n」in a thinking gesture before she spoke something that was shocking for Liliana.



「Is that so? But, recently Lily-chan is making a face that look like a lost child somehow you know?」



「Eh……」



Sumire walked toward Liliana who was staring at her in blank amazement with her eyes turned round, and then she stooped down a bit to put their eyes in the same height. And then, after Sumire confirmed that those blue eyes were reflecting herself properly, she asked calmly with a gentle and kind expression.



「Do you want, to return home?」



It was a gentle voice that was filled with concern and sympathy toward Liliana without any blaming tone in it.



For a moment, the questioned Lily showed an expression that didn't understand what the meaning of the question was. But right after that, she unconsciously raised her voice.



「I'm not thinking anything like that!」



「Wawah, wait Lily-chan, calm down.」



「Sumire-okaasama, it's true! I'm not thinking of going home or anything! I'm not feeling any discomfort or dissatisfaction! I love everyone! I'm happy I can come here! It's true!」



「I get it, I get it already!」



Sumire spontaneously hugged Lily tightly.



It seemed that Liliana jumped to the wrong conclusion thinking that Sumire's question had the implicit meaning of「If you are dissatisfied with the life here, perhaps it's better to go home?」



Of course, Sumire didn't mean anything like that. She was only thinking in concern「Perhaps she is slowly getting homesick?」, thinking that anyone would be driven by their feeling for their homeland. She wouldn't say anything like 'go home' even if she got her mouth ripped open.



Because, Sumire's feeling toward Liliana was,



「A princess! The real thing! From another world! Just who would let you go! Fuhehe, everyone in the world! How can this be, this lovely princess-chan, she is my daughter! Thank you very much! Dyufu, dyufufu」



It was fixated like that.



Liliana who knew nothing about that and was tightly embraced on Sumire's chest, guessed that she was misunderstanding and her cheeks reddened once more.



「I'm sorry, Lily-chan. Looks like I'm off the mark.」



「No, it was me who jumped to the wrong conclusion……thank you very much for worrying about me.」



「I'm your mother. Isn't it natural for me to be worried about my daughter? If there is something, then don't be reserved at all and consult me okay?」



「Yes-」



Liliana smiled softly at the gentle hand of the mother-in-law that was caressing her head. And then, they began moving the dishes on to the plates once more. Liliana didn't even suspect that inside her heart, Sumire was jumping in joy thinking「No good-, the destructive power of a genuine princess's smile is extraordinary yaa~~!!」



After that, Liliana was enjoying tea with the kind mother-in-lawa until Hajime and co returned home.



A lively family.



A quiet time with the beloved people.



Liliana was feeling the happiness she hoped for. There wasn't any falsehood in it.



However, for some reason Sumire's words were remaining inside her head and it didn't vanish like a small bone that got stuck in her throat. It caused her to have a feeling that she couldn't express in words.



That night. Liliana who returned to her room had finished all her preparation to retire to bed, however, she didn't lie on the bed and sat on the swivel chair while being in a daze.



The words「Like a lost child」from the afternoon were replayed many times over inside her head.



When she suddenly dropped her gaze, there was the unmoving Davis-kun there. It was unmoving without even a twitch with an expression that was like it was going to raise an American laugh「HA―――-, HAHAHAHA-」anytime now.



「――O wind」



Liliana spoke a verse of chant. Immediately, a breeze flowed and Davis-kun started to move *shiver shiver, tremble tremble* as though it came to life. It was really comical. As though it was making fun of Liliana who was even now harboring a mist that couldn't clear up.



「……Damn you, Davis-kun.」



She tried hurling abuse with a tone that was out of norm for her. Hurling abuse when it moved even though she was the one moving it herself, it seemed that Liliana was considerably "loosening".



But, at that time a knocking sound suddenly rang. Liliana twitched, and in shock she replied even while her voice slightly turned shrill.



Like that the one who entered was Hajime.



「Yo, can I bother you a bit?」



「Ye, yes. No need to say a bit, please feel free to do as you please. But, there will be a lecture first thing in the morning, so if I can possibly let to sleep at early hours……」



「This isn't night crawling. Or rather, you think I'm a really frivolous guy that will say something like "let me do it a bit" huh.」



Hajime smiled wryly at Liliana who was in a thorough misunderstanding while retorting. And then, he sat down on the bed and directed his gaze at Liliana who was red faced from her misunderstanding.



「Well, it's also not something as big as business or anything though……how are you doing lately?」



「……Fufu. I was also asked that at the afternoon by Sumire-okaasama. Do I really look that unusual I wonder?」



Seeing how the mother and daughter were equally worrying for her caused Liliana to leak out a chuckle from amusement.



Hajime scratched his cheek awkwardly while answering.



「You aren't acting unusual or anything. It's just, it's the fact that you look like you aren't energetic. And from that, it looks like you are gloomy, because it seems that Lily yourself doesn't understand just why you aren't energetic.」



Liliana felt a ticklish feeling 'he really is looking properly at me huuh' while she hugged her knees on the chair. Her figure that turned small on the chair with only her toes peeking out from her largish and loose negligee was really charming.



「Thank you very much for worrying about me.」



「What are you saying. I'm your husband you know? It's obvious for the husband to worry for his wife.」



Once again it was a similar line from the mother and son. This time Liliana became excessively amused that she chuckled a bit louder.



「I'm fine, Hajime-san. Really, it's only that sometimes I felt a bit gloomy. It's nothing big at all.」



Hajime sighed at Liliana who was saying such thing. And then, he suddenly stood up and lifted up Liliana in a princess carry.



Hajime sat down once more on the bed. However, this time he put Liliana on his lap in his arms.



「Err, Hajime-san? As I thought, yo, you will do it?」



「I'm not gonna. The inside of Lily's head is unexpectedly pink colored huh. No, perhaps it's not unexpected. In the first place you have delusion hobby.」



Liliana's cheeks reddened with her hand on her own clothes. Hajime directed a warm gaze at her. Liliana turned sulky.



「Don't sulk like that. Recently, I'm bothered. I'm asking not for Lily but because I want to know. Listen to your husband's request.」



「u. That way of talking is not fair.」



Liliana groaned in small voice.



And then, strength left her body as though she was giving up and she began to talk about her emotion lately that she herself wasn't clear about.



According to her, the time she spent in Nagumo family was really happy.



According to her, the lecture in the college was also really interesting.



According to her, there was nothing more easeful for her heart than this situation where she could play, learning what she like, and having a day where she didn't do anything.



According to her, right now she was living just like in her dream, without any anxiety or pressure, spending happy days being surrounded by her beloved people.



According to her, everyday was really meaningful.



The more she talked, the more it felt like there wasn't any problem. But, the expression of Hajime who was staring fixedly at the talking Liliana was gradually turning amazed, no, to speak more accurately there was a color of exasperation that was starting to dwell in that expression.



If asked why his expression was like that, it was because even though Liliana should be talking about happy things, yet her expression looked vaguely unsatisfied.



Liliana didn't notice the expression of Hajime that was like that and at the end she summed up her own feeling.



「Most likely, I'm lacking in objective inside myself. Surely what I ought to do is to find a great objective and devote myself to it just like Hajime-san and others who are doing their best in order to manage the businesses. Yes, that must be it. It feels like I can see it while I was talking. For the time being, I'll learn economics to the end because it will be useful in the futu――」



「No, that's not it.」



Liliana finally looked up to Hajime after getting interrupted midway. And then she noticed. That Hajime's face for some reason was absurdly exasperated!?



「Ha, Hajime-san? Did I, say something strange?」



「Aa~, yep, what to say. You are strange. Especially in your head.」



「That's cruel-!? That's an unthinkable abuse! Just where is it in me that is strange!?」



As expected Liliana couldn't forgive Hajime's abusive language and she snapped angrily while questioning him. It caused Hajime's expression to turn speechless.



Liliana guessed that somehow Hajime had noticed something that she didn't notice herself. So she waited for an answer even while puffing up her cheeks.



Hajime suddenly stood up and the he casually tossed Liliana on the bed. Liliana bounced *poyon* and she looked up at Hajime in a girl's sitting posture.



「Listen well, I'll say it starting from the conclusion. The true identity of your gloominess, that is "insufficientness".」



「Err……that's why, I said that I'll find an objective and work hard.」



「No, that's not it. Even if you do that you won't be satisfied. It won't be enough at all. Your murky feeling won't get cleared up for even a bit. I can guarantee it.」



「Ee~. Then, what is it that you mean?」



Liliana tilted her head in wonder as though asking 'In the end what is it that you want to say?'. Hajime opened his mouth looking like he got a headache, as though this was something unexpected.



「Work that is forced on you.」



「Yes?」



「Approaching deadline.」



「Err……」



「Cases that caused stomachache. Tremendous pressure.」



「Excuse me~, Hajime-san? What are you……」



「A problem where running away is not permitted. The word responsibility that crossed the mind.」



「A, are you listening, Hajime-san.」



「The mountain of paperwork that is piled up mercilessly despite you on your last legs already from lack of sleep.」



「……」



Liliana finally fell silent before Hajime yelled as though to deal the finishing blow.



「Work, work, work-, so much so that you are literally "swamped with work"!! A work with grave responsibility that you feel like vomiting-!!」



「………………kufuh」



Liliana twitched. She looked around while saying「Just now, did you hear some kind of strange laugh?」. Naturally, there was no one inside the room except Hajime who was standing imposingly and the quivering Davis-kun.



「No, it's you just now, you.」



「Eh? What do you mean me……」



The gaze of Hajime whose hypothesis had turned into conviction, it now had gone past exasperation and turned instead into pity while his hand took a mirror that was on the table.



「Lily. Try to confirm, just what kind of face you are making right now.」



「Hajime-san's words and act are cryptic since some time ago though……」



Even while saying that, Liliana obediently accepted the mirror then looked at her own face and――she stiffened.



That was understandable.



After all in the mirror, there was an incomprehensible expression that was scowling in displeasure, yet even so for some reason the eyes of that expression were blazing fierily, while a fearless smile were merging on the lips. If it was said without any dressing up, then it was a really creepy expression. And that expression was pasted on her own face!



Liliana tilted her head thinking「Dear me? By any chance, is there another world inside the mirror?」while she tried knocking on the mirror, turning it upside down while waving it around. But no matter what the creepy Lily there wouldn't disappear.



Liliana stared at her own face for a while before she suddenly tossed away the mirror *pei-*. And then she turned her gaze at Hajime while putting her face between her hands.



「Ha, Hajime-san! Just what have you done to me! It's cruel that you make my face turn like this!」



「I ain't doing anything. It's only Lily's real nature surfacing on your face.」



「What do you mean with real nature!?」



For the time being Liliana laid the blame of her terrible face at Hajime, but Hajime then pointed his finger with a snap at her.



'What does real nature mean? If you don't understand then I'll tell you.'



With eyes glinting like a detective cornering the criminal, Hajime exposed the truth to the world!



「Lily. You are――a genuine, and what's more it's at super level, or rather it's at abnormal pervert level, WORKAHOLIC!」(TN: Here Hajime said it in Japanese English, wookaahorikku)



「WHA, WHAT DID YOU SAY―――!! ……No, wookaa……what is that?」



Liliana tried to get shocked following the mood, but she then tilted her head at the vocabulary that she heard for the first time.



「It refers to work addiction. First in the list is work, second is work, third and fourth is also work with work in the fifth. Personal life? What's that, is it delicious? Hobby? It's work, you got a problem? It refers to that type of person. Furthermore in Lily's case, it doesn't apply to mere normal work. You aren't able to feel it sufficient anymore unless it's something forced on you, with heavy responsibility, and its quality and quantity are in super hard mode, you are a work addict in abnormal pervert level.」



「E, ee!? Yo, you are wrong! Rather I actually hate working!」



「……Actually, recently there is this case where a friction is happening which concern the public safety, there might be dead victim coming out if the discussion failed. Lily, I'm thinking of leaving it to Lily――」



「Eh!?」



Lily-chan's eyes were sparkling brightly.



Hajime quickly picked up the mirror that was thrown *pei-* just now and thrust it in front of Liliana. It entered her eyes, the sight of her own face with incomprehensible expression that looked displeased while also looking delighted, in a sense it was an expression with superb harmony between the two emotions.



「My, my real nature is, a workaholic……what's more it's at abnormal pervert level……」



Liliana crumbled down. She fell from the bed, and then she trembled *quiver quiver* just like Davis-kun while her eyes were losing focus.



Even though she should have got away from the duty of royalty and crossed over world to chase the happiness as a normal girl, but as expected it was insufficient when she didn't have duty……



However, when it was pointed out to her like this, then certainly it was exactly like that. Even when she obtained the knowledge for living, even when she strived to study in the university, even when she built new human relations, even when she went somewhere and did something, all of those were for her own sake.



No matter what happened, the consequence would only affect herself, when she failed there wouldn't be any considerable loss or anything. Even if for example an unexpected situation that surpassed the acceptable range occurred, in front of her new family everything would be nothing more than a trifle.



It was truly a life of Easy Mode.



Compared to standing on the top of a country, leading the people, and fought a mighty enemy, this life was truly, truly……



――Lukewarm



「Hau!?」



「O, oi, Lily? Are you okay?」



The feeling toward her life on earth that was spontaneously welling up inside her caused Lily to crouch down with her hands pressing on her chest.



――Liliana S. B. Hairihi, 17 years old. The princess of Hairihi Kingdom.



Since she was born, she had been continuously immersed in "things that must be done no matter what". From that, her body had become something that couldn't be satisfied by "things that she can choose and want to do herself"!



Give more work! Works that troubled the mind so much it feel like the head's blood vessel will burst! Pressing problems that are nothing but excessive-. Paperwork that is piling up like a mountain range, that make you hallucinate like it won't end for eternity-!



「I'm not that kind of dangerous woma―――n-!!」



「Oooi-. Seriously are you okay, Lily!!」



Liliana held her head while writhing around due to her real nature. Even while feeling creeped out, Hajime went to soothe her somehow.



Thirty minutes later.



Liliana who calmed down somehow was now sitting while hugging her knees feeling dejected. While she was like that, Hajime folded his arms and he wracked his brain「H~m」.



「……Hajime-san. Perhaps it's better if I go home.」



「Hm? I somehow understand what you are thinking but, why?」



Liliana's body was stirring restlessly, she raised her chin that was put on her raised knees and spoke with a complicated sulky expression.



「As I thought, no matter where I go, I'm still a princess. No matter what I do, in the end I'll summarize it into the point whether it will become advantage for the kingdom or not. And then, the "insufficientness" in earth, it caused me to trouble Hajime-san and Sumire-okaasan like now.」



Her shoulders drooped and she delicately muttered something incomprehensible「Someone like me after all is just a princess that cannot become a normal girl」.



Hajime smiled wryly while answering.



「Well, whether you are going home or remaining here, it doesn't really matter which one you are going to choose though.」



「That's cruel-!? Is that something you can say to your wife!?」



Hajime's wry smile deepened saying「I'm joking」at the enraged Liliana while he continued speaking.



「Look here, I understood from the start that you cannot stop being a princess you remember? Your princess level is a bit above my expectation but……if you want to do work as a royalty, then I won't stop you. If Lily wish for it, then I'll make it so you can even come and go to there from here everyday. I'll need to concentrate a bit and improve the gate but……well, I'll manage somehow. That's why, don't say you are going home looking desperate like that.」



「Hajime-san……」



Of course, Liliana herself also didn't seriously say that she was going home. But, as expected it was something joyful to be told「Don't go」by her beloved like this.



Hajime continued talking at Liliana whose cheeks loosened up.



「I told you this several times already but, Lily, speak more selfishly. After all no matter what kind of impossible demand it is, I'll do it somehow.」



「……yes.」



Hajime said that while patting her head gently. Liliana's body trembled as though she was in anguish. Her eyes were starting to carry heat. Hajime averted his gaze from such Liliana and returned to the talk.



「And so. Becoming a commuting princess is also one way……」



「Commuting princess……it's the first time I heard that kind of vocabulary. But, I have the feeling that like that in the end I'll be swamped with work where I cannot stop even if I want to stop.」



「Yeah, I also think so. And so, how about doing work other than the work of the royalty? Even though I said that, you will still get swamped with work all the same, so you will be moderately busy doing things with moderate responsibility, like that little by little you will get used to "moderate work", and eventually your body and heart will get accustomed with "enjoying free time". Something like that.」



「So it's like, a rehabilitation then. I somewhat feel complicated……」



'Am I a sick person, ah, I'm an addict……' Liliana made a complicated expression with that thought. Hajime then suggested to such Liliana whether he should leave several businesses for her to manage.



Liliana pondered for a little before she shook her head.



「No, I'll refrain from work where I act as Hajime-san's representative. I know that even by doing anything else I'll still have the sense of security that everything will be fine no matter what happen, but even so I believe that doing work that is unrelated with Hajime-san for my first rehabilitation will be just right.」



「Hm~m? Is that so. However, in that case what will you do then?」



Liliana suddenly stood up and while bouncing *poyon* on the bed she thrust up her fist and proclaimed.



「Yes, I decided. I'll do part-time work!」



Honestly, it wasn't like Hajime wasn't thinking「Is it fine doing part-time work?」, but it seemed better for Liliana to be in a place where she didn't have the backing of Hajime, so he didn't really say anything.



And then, Liliana said「My aim, to be a normal girl! I won't let anyone say that I'm a workaholic anymore!」with rough breathing from her boiling up motivation, with Hajime giving her a noncommittal applause「Oo, do your best~」.





Chapter 226




*ding ding* The bell chimes rang. It was a withdrawn sound that felt pleasant to ear.



「Welcome.」



The two young male customers who entered were immediately addressed by a voice. The voice came from a bit away, but it was a pleasant and refreshing voice that didn't lose to the bell's chimes.



When they directed their gaze to there due to the lure of the voice, there was a stunning beautiful girl there. It was a blonde haired and blue eyed girl wearing a cute apron. Her luxuriant hair was tied on the back using a largish frilly ribbon.



Looking from the logo on the apron, the silver tray in one hand, and the plate placed on the other hand, it was obvious from a glance that this was this restaurant's employee.



「Dear guest. I will guide you to your seat right after this, so can I please ask you to wait for a bit?」



「「Ah, yes」」



The two male customers replied in a beautiful harmony. The waitress-san smiled cheerfully. The two of them staggered.



The waitress advanced smoothly through the gap between the tables with light footsteps and she set down the cooking she carried with a movement that even displayed elegance somewhat. The two female customers who received their ordered cooking were staring in a daze at the waitress.



After that the waitress once more gave a stunningly beautiful bow and smiled like a blooming flower at the two female customers who unconsciously returned the bow. The two female customers were shot through.



The waitress returned back toward the two male customers and bowed. A sweet aroma spread gently from the swaying hair of golden thread.



「I'm sorry for making you wait. Smoking seat or non-smoking seat, which one will be your preference?」



「E, either is fine.」



「Me, me too.」



The two male customers followed behind the waitress as though they were being lured by the constant smile. Even after they were sitting down, their gazes kept glued on the waitress who was going to bring some water and wet towel.



They were handed the menu by the returning waitress. She said「Please call me when you decided your order」before she was going to withdraw, but one man reflexively called out.



「He, hey. Before this, you weren't working here right?」



It was a sudden question, but the waitress that guessed this costumer had also gone to this restaurant before this nodded briefly.



「Yes. I worked part-time here just recently――I'm called Liliana. If I can become the acquaintance of you honored customer from here on――that will be great.」



She cutely smiled while bowing with her fingertips slightly clutching the tip of her skirt. That gesture swiftly shot through the two males with something. The way how at the end of her sentence her polite language broke down slightly, it caused a sense of familiarity to well up inside the two male customers.



「I super will become your acquaintance.」



「Rather already we are become your acquaintance.」



The Japanese of the two male customers crumbled.



After that, there was a profoundly mysterious happening when Liliana came to take their order, for some reason they ordered the menu one after another, even things that they didn't feel like ordering were ordered following Liliana's recommendation. The two looked like they were satisfied on the whole.



「Yuuka-san, I bring more order. Please take care of it.」



「Yes ye~s」



The chef who was wielding the frying pan inside the kitchen――Sonobe Yuuka replied back lightly.



It seemed that she had just finished cooking. She beautifully served the content of the fry pan on the plate and she faced toward the counter with the plate in one hand.



She was wearing a pure white chef coat and a crimson scarf on her neck. The limp beret on her head was also crimson colored.



At her student days, she had serious character but her appearance was showy, so she gave an impression that looked like a frivolous gal. But right now she was a splendid war potential of the western restaurant that was managed by her family. She was a chef who would become the second generation of this restaurant in the future.



It was only her dyed chestnut colored hair that didn't change, but the atmosphere she was clad in was somehow mature and kind. The look of her eyes that should be called as sharp if it had to be said, also seemingly looked like they had softened. Naturally those factors also dragged up her charm that had existed since the beginning by several times over.



In fact, there were a lot of regular customers who frequently visited this western restaurant【Wisteria】aiming at the beautiful chef. Also this restaurant was established just a bit before Yuuka was born, so it had already welcomed its twenty year anniversary, there were also a lot of veteran customers who extremely enjoyed seeing the growth of Yuuka who often helped since she was small.



「Yes, this is Kuban-san's meat pie, take it please. So, the next order is……」



Yuuka looked at the order tag she received from Liliana and her eyes blinked repeatedly. And then, she leaned out her body from the kitchen counter and took a look at the table where Liliana had taken the order just now.



Over there were two young male customers.



Yuuka dropped her gaze at the order tag once more. No matter how she looked there was order for about six people written there.



「……Since Liliana worked here, the customers became really big eater huh.」



「Yes, Japanese people are all gormandizer isn't it.」



Yuuka lifted her gaze from the order tag and sent an unblinking stare at Liliana, but then she sighed seeing Liliana putting a friendly smile.



「Well, they all ate the food without leaving any, so it's not a problem but……be careful to not make them force themselves too much okay.」



「Please leave it to me, Yuuka-san. It's my specialty to see through where is the limit. I'll use every method available and make the sales and repeater to be double the last month. I'll bet on my honor as a former princess!」



「It's fine even if you don't bet that. Anyway calm down first, former princess.」



Seeing Liliana whose nose breathed roughly with overflowing motivation, Yuuka acted the straight-man while smiling wryly.



「Now then, it will be the time soon when the customers will come in force. Let's put in our fighting spirit. I think it will be fine because Otou-san and Okaa-san will also return back soon, but until then spare me from the amount of order that I cannot deal with alone okay?」



「It's fine. I have finished grasping Yuuka-san's ability. I will take order in the amount where Yuuka-san can just barely manage!」



「Ah, yep. ――This, rather than being a rehabilitation for Liliana, isn't this actually a trial for me?」



Liliana said 'Leave it to me!' while putting the meats pie on her tray and headed out to give it to the customer. Yuuka murmured so while seeing her back.



After that, the two parents of Yuka returned from their business and the number of customers increased sharply when it was evening. Liliana who made the Sonobe family screaming from the orders that were coming like a surging wave then clocked out when it was time for her to depart for another part-time work.



After that, everyone of Sonobe family were left behind looking dead tired.



The customers also became sparse and after about an hour when it became time to close the restaurant for the day, *ding* the bell rang.



「Welco――wait, what, isn't this Nagumo.」



Yuuka had left the kitchen and was now sorting the cash register's sales slip. Just as she said, ahead of her gaze there was Hajime.



「What do you mean what when you are greeting a customer.」



Hajime entered the restaurant with a wry smile while sitting on the seat at the edge of the counter with a practiced movement. That spot was tacitly a reserved seat for Hajime who now had become a regular customer.



Since the party of the one year anniversary of returning home, Hajime who was pleased with this restaurant's cooking and coffee and also because of the friendly atmosphere due to the management who were his classmate and her family sometimes visited now and then.



The other classmates too, even after graduating high school they would aimlessly dropped by several times a month, and when they gathered for meal they would mostly gather in Yuuka's restaurant, so this place became something like a hang-out place for the another world summoning group.



……Although, Hajime was also made to feel an extremely unwilling feeling because for some reason he received an extremely disgraceful impression that said「He is like a man going to his mistress's place for an affair」from among his family and friends.



Even though most times when he was here he would be with one or more of his wives, yet why he was still evaluated like that……. It was something that was greatly baffling for Hajime.



And then, those wives who were mostly with him when he was here, especially recently they would be staring at Yuuka with a fixed gaze, just why was it…….



When Hajime sat down, Yuuka's father that replaced her to cook in the kitchen――Hiroshi, and Yuuka's mother Yuuri, they addressed Hajime「Welcome」looking very happy.



Hajime returned the greeting and then Yuuka who left behind the sales slips asked him.



「And, you are coming to eat? It's rare for you to come alone.」



「No, I finished having dinner already. I came here just to drink coffee a bit and also ask about how our part-time princess is doing.」



「Aa, I see.」



When Yuuka turned her gaze to her father, Hiroshi nodded as though to say「I don't mind」. In exchange Yuuri moved to take over sorting the sales slip. For some reason she was giving a thumb up at Yuuka while she was at it.



Yuuka asked while pretending to not see her mother who was like that.



「You are okay with blend coffee?」



「Ou. Or rather, you are the one making it?」



Hajime tilted his head, because if he remembered right, even though Yuuka had become able to be entrusted with cooking, she shouldn't have been entrusted with making coffee yet.



Seeing Hajime's questioning face, Yuuka showed a bit of a triumphant look while she swiftly prepared making the coffee.



「Yesterday I finally got the okay. I also took the barista qualification already. This is more or less the first blend that I will serve to a customer, so drink it with care.」



「What's with that condescending attitude huh.」



A wry smile leaked out once more. The exchange between Hajime and Yuuka was very relaxed with each other from this kind of visit that spanned through several years. This was related with the impression of「He is like a man going to his mistress's place for an affair」, but the two of them didn't have the awareness of that.



A fragrant aroma enveloped the space. Hajime made a wondering expression at the coffee that was presented to him and brought it to his mouth to test how good it was. And then, a beat later, he went「Oh」with his eyes snapped open in admiration. And then without pause he took the second and then third gulp. From that it seemed that Yuuka's first blend was a good work.



Yuuka made a delighted expression that was mixed with a little bit of relieve while she slouched forward a bit and rested her chin on her hand above the counter. Her other hand was playing around with her crimson scarf with her fingertips twirling it, one of her feet was tapping *ton ton* on the floor with her toes.



「So? What is it that you want to ask? Lily is doing really well here though?」



「Is that so? She is a princess and she shouldn't have any experience in service trade, she doesn't become a bother about various things because of that?」



「Nope, rather she is serving the customer so perfectly it is wasted for this kind of neighborhood western restaurant. She is elegant and refined――and it looks like there are already customers coming here for Lily.」



「Just from two weeks?」



「Yep, just from two weeks. And not just that, she even gave advice for the management. It's to the level that it feels like we got the scale falling from our eyes. You know, she was having fun when she calculated how much the expenses this month got reduced.」



「As expected from the addict of office job. Just why she is doing consultation even though this is part-time job huh.」



Hajime sighed in exasperation. A smile emerged on Yuuka's lips with a chuckle seeing such Hajime.



「Well, I too was anxious at first though. Suddenly a call came from Nagumo telling me『Wont you try hiring a former princess for part-time work』, what's with that. I myself am still a novice and it's the best I can do just doing my own part. But, well, now I'm glad that Lily came to work here.」



「Is that so……. I too was really worried letting Lily go for part-time at a place I don't know about at all. In that point, if it's Sonobe that I can trust you, and so I entrusted her here……it's great if her being here also benefited this place.」



「……As always, you are overprotective toward your relative huh. Today too you come directly here to expressly check on her.」



Yuuka's expression turned into an exasperated one. However, her fingertips were twirling and toying her crimson scarf even more. The tapping of her foot became even more rhythmical *ton, toton-*.



For some reason, the mother who was in the middle of sorting the sales slip was grinning broadly seeing such Yuuka.



「Well, I can deny being overprotective but……I'm coming today because that girl is starting to act unexpectedly, no, in a sense it's just as expected from her I guess. Hey, Sonobe. When she was in the middle of working, did Lily's atmosphere feel like she is unsatisfied somewhat?」



「Eh? ……H~m, I didn't really feel anything like that. She was really in high spirits taking the order, she was scattering around courtesy so much it was sly to increase the repeater. Why are you asking? By any chance, did she say that working part-time here is dull for her?」



「No no, she isn't saying anything like that. Rather she was saying that she is having fun.」



Yuuka tilted her head at Hajime who spoke evasively.



Hajime hesitated a little before he confirmed to Yuuka「I've told you the detail about why Lily is working part-time right?」. When Yuuka nodded, Hajime continued.



「Since a week ago, that Lily, she often didn't come home.」



「Somehow, that line sounds like something that would be said by a no good husband who let her wife run away.」



「Shut up. And then. When I tried asking what she is doing, it seemed that she is also starting to work part-time with the supplier that is doing business with your place. She said the work is completely desk job.」



「Eh? Is that so?」



That fact caused the eyes of Yuuka who didn't know that to turn round. But, it appeared the story didn't stop there.



「It seemed, the fare configuration of that supplier is problematic, and then while Lily was talking about various things to the supplier, she then got scouted by the person of that company. I don't know what kind of talk she had with them though.」



「He, hee. I wonder since when it became like that.」



「Yeah exactly. But, even with that, it's unthinkable that she would be so busy that she needed to absent from several lectures of the college and became unable to come home. I'm only guessing but……」



「She is doing more part-time work?」



「Yeah.」



Hajime who nodded while looking like he got a headache. Although it seemed he didn't have a positive proof, that was why he thought of asking a bit to Yuuka, whether Liliana was feeling insufficient just working part-time in this restaurant.



「You can just ask her directly.」



「That girl is giving me the slip. I don't want to get the answer out of her forcefully. And observing her with artifact will make me look like a controlling husband, so I don't feel like doing that.」



「Oh, really.」



Hajime drank his coffee miserly while looking really worried or perhaps overprotective, and yet for all that he behaved indecisively. Yuuka replied curtly with an expression that looked disappointed to that.



「In the end, what are you going to do? When she is working part-time at our place, she doesn't look like she is feeling insufficient, she look like she is having quite some fun you know? Should I indirectly tell her that Nagumo is worrying? I don't know if the workaholic Lily will be able to restrain herself by doing that, but perhaps she will talk to you by her own initiative what part-time work she is doing right now.」



「I, see. Can I ask you to do that?」



「Yes yes. It's fine, doing just that much.」



Yuuka nodded while lazily waving her hand. Hajime drank up his coffee and said thanks before standing up.



「My bad that I sounded like whining there. I feel relaxed when I come here every time. I guess it's not just for show that you are the second generation owner of the place for relaxation that lured even the demon king.」



「Even if you praise me I cannot give you anything except delicious western meal and coffee okay. There also won't be any discount.」



「Uh oh, that's unfortunate.」



The two cracked jokes to each other. Yuuka's scarf was twirled around so much it was already starting to fray, while her tapping toes were already like a tap dance.



Hajime said his goodby to Hiroshi and Yuuri and then exited the restaurant. Yuuka saw him off before closing the door and when she turned around, there were her two parents there with a truly nice smiling face.



「……What?」



Yuuka asked with obvious wariness. In respond, the gentle Yuuri,



「What to do, Hiroshi-san. This daughter of us, her trait is completely a mistress.」



「H, h~m. But from my standpoint, I wish that she will marry properly though.」



「Lo, look here! Just what are you two speaking about your daughter! I'm not Nagumo's mistress, and I also got not plan to enter that guy's harem!」



Yuuka howled. However, the chain of events just now where a man with wives and kid unexpectedly showed up, then she treated him with food, heard his complaining, and gave him comfort――those acts, even considering that this place was a restaurant, seen from the side she looked enough like a mistress.



Seeing her parents who lightly deflected「We get it, we get it」toward her words of denial, Yuuka became especially displeased.



However, it was natural that her words didn't have any persuasiveness.



After all, Yuuka's toes tapping *ton ton* on the floor was her habit when she was in a good mood. And furthermore that habit wouldn't come out just from being in good mood, it would only come out if she also felt embarrassed at the same.



In addition, there were the crimson scarf and limp beret that Yuuka was wearing. Actually those items had a lot of color variety, but Yuuka only had those items in crimson color, even including the spare. When she went to buy replacement, as expected she would pick crimson again. The same color with the light of magic power of a certain someone.



And then, her habit of rolling around her scarf with her fingertips was a new habit that was formed in these several years. It was an unconscious habit that came out only when she was talking with a certain someone.



「Heey, Otou-san, Okaa-san? Are you two listening?」



「Yes yes, we get it already. We better start closing up the restaurant soon~」



「The most important thing for Otou-san is that Yuuka is happy, that's all.」



「I, told, youu~~~」



A month after Hajime showed just a bit of good-for-nothing act at Yuuka's restaurant.



Currently, everyone was gathering in the living room of Nagumo residence. The【120th something of Nagumo Family Meeting】was opened.



The one who sat at the center of the large dining table was Hajime, and right in front of him was Liliana who was sitting with an awkward expression.



「Now then, Lily. Do you know what is the meaning of this family meeting?」



「u, mo, more or less……」



Liliana averted her face quickly to the side, but ahead of her gaze there were Yue and others who weren't even hiding their exasperated expression. What gouged her heart especially deeply was that even Myuu was looking at her with eyes as though she was looking at someone hopeless.



Hajime was about to open his mouth toward Liliana whose gaze was swimming *sui~* to the opposite side.



But, before he could speak, *pururururu* a phone's ringtone rang.



「Ah, I, I'm sorry. Please excuse me a bit.」



「Ah, oi, you」



Liliana looked the other way even when Hajime raised his voice while putting her own smartphone on her ear. And then, what could be heard after that were only words related to business like contract or client and so on.



Before long it seemed that they had reached an end and Liliana cut off the call. Seeing that, Hajime sighed while opening his mouth.



But, before he could speak, *pururururu* a phone's ringtone rang.



「Ah, I, I'm sorry. Please excuse me a bit.」



「……」



She answered the phone. This time it seemed there was a problem occurring regarding the shift at her part-time workplace. Liliana was listening to the phone while going 'uh-huh, uh-huh' before she quickly started to give out instructions, like who to call, who to substitute the shift change, what to do about the lacking place such and such, and then what she want to be dealt with next and so on……



Hajime wanted to act the straight-man 'Managing shift schedule obviously ain't the work of a part-timer right!', but for the time being he endured it.



Before long the talk came to an end and Liliana cut off the phone. Hajime then sighed while opening his mouth.



But, before he could speak, *pururururu* a phone's ringtone rang.



「Ah, I, I'm sorry. Please excuse me a bit.」



「……」



Liliana answered the phone. For some reason there was a sobbing voice coming from the other side of the phone. Liliana was consoling her talking partner while sometimes she also reprimanded, and then in order to deal with a grave problem that seemed to occur from some kind of miss, she took out one more smartphone from her pocket and quickly began to give out instructions.



Before long it seemed that she finished and Liliana cut off the phone. Hajime who got a vein pulsing on his forehead was opening his mouth.



But, before he could, *gatari* the sound of someone standing up from a chair resounded.



「I'm sorry, Hajime-san. It seems that the section chi――cough-, a regular employee who was entrusted with an important project made a miss, and it turned out into something that a part-time worker like me has to deal with. And so, I'll go out for a bit!」



A part-time worker that followed up for a regular employee's miss. Or rather, a regular employee who came crying to a part-time worker even though it was his miss. Furthermore, it seemed this regular employee was a section chief.



Since when the definition of part-time work had changed drastically like this.



Liliana quickly put her outfit in order while saying things like「At this rate the two hundred employees there will be out in the cold! As a part-time leader, I have to do something」before she tried to go outside.



*snap-* One more vein emerged on Hajime's forehead. And then a word.



「Shia.」



「Yes sir desuuu」



From behind, the rabbit-eared wife who was dancing to the same beat with the husband embraced Liliana who right now was about to exit the room.



「Shi, Shia-san? I'm sorry, but I'm going to wo――」



「Yes yes, I'll just make you cool your head a bit heree」



「Eh? Wai-, NOOOOOO-」



Liliana screamed, and then after that she received an artistic German suplex and the floor struck the back of her head.「My head-, my head hurts like it got splitttttt-」The former princess was shouting while rolling around on the floor in agony.



「Uu, just what are you doing. After this I have an important work……」



「Is that, something more important than the family discussion?」



Liliana complained while rubbing the back of her head with teary eyes. Hajime asked her with a sigh mixed in it.「Uu-」Liliana was at lost for words, and Hajime said in respond.



「If that's how it is, then I'll attempt to solve the root of the problem and make it so you lose your reason for going.」



「E, err, Hajime-san, what do you mean specifically?」



「……Today's weather is sunny, it seem that there will be random meteor impact later.」



「Let's have a discussion.」



Indeed, the root of the problem would be cleared. If there wasn't any troubled person, then there also wouldn't be any trouble.



Feeling how unbearable it would be if the meteor shower that once annihilated the capital of her own country was dropped on her part-time workplace, Liliana took her seat in panic.



「Look at you, even though recently you were grieving because not to mention me, you weren't able to even converse satisfactorily with anyone in the family because of work, work, work, but then you tried to get out abruptly from the discussion to talk about that, just what's with that?」



「Tha, that's, obviously, even I is also fed up here you know, Hajime-san? I really want to yell out loud, just why are they all relying on just me, please manage it somehow just by yourself. But, before I realized it everyone relied on me and I was placed at a position with responsibility, and now it's really hard to break out from it.」



「Even though it's part-time work?」



「Even though it's part-time work, yes.」



Hajime sighed for who knew how many times already. He then handed over the mirror he had prepared to Liliana who was talking with a voice that couldn't hide her emotion of「I'm fed up already」.



The face that was reflected in the mirror, was the creepy face of workaholic Lily with fierily blazing eyes.



Liliana gently put down the mirror.



「This is a mistake. It's not like I'm starved or anything. This is a misunderstanding. Thanks to doing moderate amount of work from the part-time, day by day I'm in the process of getting closer to become "a normal girl" ――」



「Including the part-time at Sonobe's place, how many part-time works you are currently holding?」



「……I, it's, seven.」



「The job description?」



「A, a bit of managing stocking and dealing with the client.」



「Other than that?」



「Something like fast food restaurant.」



「The specific.」



「……I'm in charge of the part-time at the main restaurant while entrusted to coordinate the surrounding seven branch restaurants.」



「The call just now?」



「At another establishment related with food and drink where I'm working part time, various things happened and I worked like an advisor of the head office trade section……it seems there was a miss at the transaction that was started from my advice where the company's fortune is at stake, at this rate it would get complete revocation. If that happen, depending on the situation there is even the possibility that the company will go under.」



Hajime wordlessly pushed out the mirror. It was as though he was an exorcist that was pushing out a cross toward a girl who was possessed by a devil! What was reflected in that mirror was a creepy face that seemed to say「This is a heavy responsibility you know, Lily! Gufufuh」……



Immediately,「Stooppp――. Don't show me the mirrorrr――!!」Liliana writhed in agony.



……She was completely like a girl who was possessed by a devil.



「Yes yes, at~~ten~~tion! Now that we have confirmed that presently Lily-chan's workaholic level isn't improved at all, everyone please state your opinion!」



Sumire who held the role as the chairman of the meeting tapped the table *kan kan* with a spoon and asked for opinion from everyone.



「Yes!」The one who raised her hand the very first was Myuu. Sumire pointed with a fork at Myuu「Yes, Myuu-chan!」. Her manner was really bad.



「I think that Lily-oneechan's addiction, it won't be fixed even if she died!」



「Kafuh!?」



Myuu launched her words like a bullet of anti-material rifle grade with a cheerful smile on her face. Liliana pressed her chest and collapsed.



Next,「Yes desuu!」was Shia with her rabbit ears standing straight. Sumire pointed sharply with long chopsticks「Yes, Shia-chan!」. Just where did she take it out from?



「I think that something like rehabilitation, is meaningless to fix a person's core nature desuu!」



「Guhih!?」



That opinion actually had much persuasiveness. A~ll of Shia's family were people with screwed up core nature. Incidentally, Shia's self-proclaimed best friend the princess of the elf was also a pervert at the core. Soon she might turn from her best friend into her step-mother. However regarding this case, Shia was averting her rabbit ears from the reality.



The next one who hurriedly raised her hand was Tio. After her Remia also raised her hand while smiling. Sumire said「Yes Tio-chan, Remia-chan!」while pointing with a snap using a ladle. For a moment it looked like the ladle materialized from empty air……was that just an imagination?



「For example, if I hath mine butt spanked moderately in the name of rehabilitation, and then asked if this nature of mine can be fixed by that or not, then the answer is it's impossible! This art the same.」



「What a hardship. Even though she wishes to stop working and be together with family, but without working she will be frustrated……it will be great if there is something else other than work that she can do.」



「Uu. I'm the same like Tio-san……even if you ask me something other than work……after all I'm just a hollow person……hics-」



Liliana lost her nerve. And then she fell down before starting to trace circles on the floor with her fingertip in an easy to understand gesture.



「Nn-」Yue raised her hand. Sumire said「Yes, Yue-chan!」while pointing with a fry pan for rolled egg so hard it made *buon* sound. ……It looked like she took it out from her cuff though.



Beside Sumire, Shuu's eyes were sparkling, 「Sumire, you, your party performance skill had gone up again!」his tension was climbing up to the sky.



「……You want, remodeling?」



「Hiih!? No thank you!」



'That difficult nature, want me to remodel it along with your soul?' Yue wriggled her hands while standing up from her chair. In respond to that, Liliana screamed while dragging her body backward.



Hajime gave a glance at Liliana who was trembling like Davis-kun before he scratched his head and opened his mouth.



「Well, it's positive that this nature of Liliana cannot be fixed just from doing part-time work.」



「Uu, Hajime-san?」



Liliana's shoulders dropped despondently.



Hajime's gaze ran around toward Yue and others. He judged that they all had reached a conclusion. And then, he made Liliana to sit on her chair in order to tell her that conclusion.



「Lily. Anyway, these two months of rehabilitation turned out meaningless, that's why, how about if in the next two months you don't do anything?」



「Not doing, anything?」



Liliana was bewildered. Hajime nodded「Yeah」. In a sense, this was a shocking proposal for Liliana.



「Resign from all your part-time works, and then, become a shut-in NEET for two months.」



「Eh?」



Like this, with the unanimous vote from【The 80th or 130th, well it doesn't matter which of Nagumo Family Meeting】, it was decided that the princess of another world was to become a shut-in NEET.



By the way, regarding the mismanagement of a certain trade department that made a miss, it was resolved in moderation by Hajime due to Lily's entreaty. Of course it was resolved using a way that wasn't a random meteor impact in a sunny day.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I uploaded three chapters consecutively for the celebration of this story's resumption, but for some reason this Lily arc didn't end.



Unexpectedly I have fun writing and unconsciously the story got dragged on.



Especially, how it became as though this is Yuuka's turn even though this is Lily arc……Lily, how pitiful.



Now then, my deepest apology, but next week's update at Saturday will be Lily arc too.



In this After II, I'm thinking to try to write about the wives or classmates that didn't get spotlight.



And when I finished with that, unexpectedly there are a lot of wishful voices and Shirakome himself is also growing in the mood for it, so I'm thinking that perhaps I should try writing about the story of Kouki-kun got kidnapped too muchhh.



Well then, please take care of Arifureta from here on too.





Chapter 227




AN: I'm sorry, Lily arc hasn't end……



PS



I got the chronological order pointed out, so as soon as I have time I'll revise it.



☆NEET Queen Lily



Two months had passed since that【It's troublesome already to count the number y'know, Nagumo Family Meeting】where it was decided for Liliana to become a shut-in NEET.



During that time, in order to rescue the workaholic former princess, Liliana who was constantly drifting around from too much free time was consoled by everyone of Nagumo family with every kind of amusement. It was so that she could forget the matter of work even for just a little.



Everyone was worried from the bottom of their heart about their family member who was addicted to work in abnormal level.



Then, specifically what kind of amusement was provided for her? For example there was something like this.



The one who moved the very first even among the Nagumo family was Myuu. She visited Liliana's room with toys in her hands.



「Lily-oneechan, let's play this!」



The thing that Myuu brought and presented to her with a lot of energy like that caused Liliana to tilted her head.



「Err, what is this, Myuu-chan?」



「It's Raptor nano.」



'I'm not asking in that kind of meaning', while thinking that, Liliana dropped her eyes toward that thing that was handed to her――a 1/48 model of a fighter aircraft of earth, multi-purpose tactical fighter F-22, alias Raptor.



Myuu nodded in satisfaction at Liliana who accepted the model even while she was in bewilderment, and then she took out another model of fighter aircraft. 「Flanker-tan is also hard to discard, but it cannot win against the charm of variable wing. Tomneko-tan, I pick you!」She did that while saying such thing.



「Now, Lily-oneechan. Shut-in NEET Lily-oneechan who is only staying indoors. In order to master being a shut-in NEET, let's blast off to the sky while secluding yourself inside the room nano!」



「Err, Myuu-chan? I wish you won't repeatedly call me shut-in NEET too much like that……. It's more or less something decided in the family meeting, it's something like a medical treatment……」



「Shut your mouth, warrant officer Lily. Do you want me to beat you up? nano」



「……Recently, you are increasingly growing similar to Hajime-san aren't you, Myuu-chan. Especially in that unreasonable aspect.」



Surely, if there was the entry of "unreasonable" in the status plate, then Myuu's parameter would surely extended out with terrific momentum.



Before Liliana realized, Myuu who seemed to change completely into a military personnel was clad in something like a pilot suit, equipped with a short mustache, and a teardrop type sunglasses sharply put *sucha!* on her face.



And then, she handed over a matching sunglasses and short mustache along with something like a game joystick to Liliana. Perhaps for Myuu, speaking of a military personnel meant short mustache……



「Warrant officer Lily. This is a flying toy that papa created. Something like a drone. A distant viewing stone is used for its cockpit screen, and its field of vision can be shared through this sunglasses. The control is performed using this joystick. Do you understand? nano」



「Ah, yes. No, I don't understand. First of all, what's with the warrant officer?」



「Ah, Myuu is the flight lieutenant and is above Lily-oneechan, that's why properly call Myuu as captain nano.」(TN: Should I use lieutenant here or captain? This is how the raw is. I don't really get the structure of military command.)



「No, that's not what I'm asking……」



Myuu already opened the window and put her F-14 Super Tomcat in standby. Whether when she was a princess or when she wasn't princess anymore, the point where she was ignored didn't seem to change.



「Preparation OK. Demons squadron, Demon 1 Super Tomcat. Launch- nano!」



「Eh, do I need to say that too? E, err, Demon 2, Raputar? La, launching!」(TN: When the word Raptor is Japanized, it was spelled as raputaa)



The fierce gleam from Myuu's eyes emitted a wordless demand. Liliana who sensed that spoke in a matching sentence with Myuu. There wasn't any runway, but Captain Myuu's first aircraft and Officer Lily's second aircraft floated lightly using gravity control, and then both flew outside the window.



After that, the sight of the vast sky that was visible from the sunglasses cleared up even if just temporarily the gloominess of Liliana who was feeling depressed from not working.



Liliana was opening her mouth to thank Myuu for her consideration and her invitation for this wonderful playing time, but when she glanced to her side, for some reason Myuu was making a fearless smile that was just like her father. Seeing that Liliana was assaulted by a fierce bad premonition.



Right after that,「Finally they are coming huh. Fine then, I'll play with you nano」Myuu spouted out such ominous words. Liliana was glancing to such Myuu from the corner of her eyes while she became speechless from the scenery that was visible through her sunglasses.



After all, there was a "real fighter aircraft" flying in parallel with their model aircrafts.



Liliana questioned Myuu with naked agitation, but according to Myuu's careless reply, it seemed that the place their toys were flying was right above the base of JDF.



Actually, before this Myuu already had previous offense of flying on the JDF base while raining down missiles that were crammed with ketchup and mayonnaise.



The vehicles and facilities on the base, and also everyone of JDF who came outside to shot down the aircraft model, they were all dripping with ketchup and mayonnaise at that time. It seemed they were flying into rage already from that. Perhaps because of that too, this time even the fighter aircrafts of JDF finally scrambled just for facing a small fighter aircraft「That damned screwing around drone came again!」that was displaying a performance that was unbecoming compared to the existing drone of modern era.



The pilot of the aircraft flying parallel with them for the time being moved around his hand from the cockpit pointing down, he was demanding them to land down.



「Myu, Myu Myu Myuu-chan! What are you thinking! As expected, this is crossing over the limit of things that can be done!」



「Lily-oneechan. There are great saying in Japan nano――it's not a crime if it's not exposed.」



「Hajime-saa――n! Remia-saa――n! Myuu-chan here is dashing to an improper directionnn! Please revise the education policy-! Or rather stop her quicklyyy!」



「Fuh, naïve. Both papa and mama, and also everyone else are away from home nano. Myuu has made no oversight!」



Ignoring the shaken Liliana, Myuu said something like「Demon 1, engage!」while controlling the plane with pointlessly refined piloting. And then, the cockpit of the startled pilot was fired at by vulcan.



Right after that, *bichi bichi bichi-* small bullets hit the canopy of the JDF aircraft. Naturally, the canopy was dyed bright red. It wasn't the pilot's blood, but ketchup. Furthermore, there might be some kind of particular composition included in it, because the ketchup was clinging stickily without getting blasted away by the wind pressure.



The pilot's movement stopped. No, he was starting to move slowly. He was moving his hand. His hand was once more moving lower――tracing his neck, and then his thumb dropped downward. It was obvious what the pilot meant,「Fall to hell」he gestured.



It went without saying that after that it turned out into a grand dogfight against JDF aircraft.



Even while pleading for them to just go home already while half-crying, Liliana continued to escape from the JDF aircraft with excessively skilled piloting. Myuu said「If we escape here, it will be the shame of woman of sea!」while displaying beautiful midair maneuvers one after another like Immelmann turn and Cobra and so on. She didn't stop her grand rivalry with the JDF aircraft. Naturally even Liliana's straight-man act「Woman of sea you say……this is the sky!」was ignored as nothing.



But, the end visited so suddenly.



Because out of nowhere, the back of Myuu's head was tightly held in eagle grip.



*gi gi gi* When the short moustache and sunglasses Myuu turned around like a machine that forgot to be oiled, there was the figure of her papa there half-smiling.



After that, the drone was forcefully self-exploded in the blink of eye,「Aa!? Myuu's Tomneko-tan!」even such scream echoed in vain and signaled the end of Myuu's "playing".



And then, the main offender Myuu met a punishment of a hundred strikes on her butt by Hajime from going too far in playing, and in that day a sobbing voice was echoing in Nagumo residence without stopping until the dinner time.



Liliana who got the feeling that recently Myuu's attitude was becoming too flashy was looking at Myuu who was reflecting with teary eyes. She thought, 'perhaps it ended all right like this'.



……She felt like for an instant she saw a color of ecstasy at the expression of Myuu while she was rubbing her swollen red butt, but surely, without a doubt that was just her imagination. Because if that wasn't just her imagination, then one black dragon would surely vanish from this world without trace.



At another time, she was also invited by Yue and Shia and tried working diligently at sewing steadily.



Yue had the experience of tailoring Hajime's outfit at her period in abyss, right now sewing was becoming half a hobby for her. Shia was a rabbit skilled in housework from the start, so sewing was her forte. Taught by the two of them, Liliana's sewing skill was improving conspicuously.



There, Remia who recently became known as an up-and-coming designer who was enveloped in mystery with unknown face offered an idea, and Liliana tried to sell the clothes and accessory she created through the internet.



When she did that, it unexpectedly sold well and Liliana was having fun more and more……



She established the marketing and advertisement of the internet sales, what's more she started to investigate the procedure in order to start up a company――and got a knuckle dropped on her head from Hajime.



It was understandable why Hajime did so. After all she got shadow under her eyes from thinking of the prospect of internet marketing in the future from morning until evening.



Most likely, the environment where she was made to be a shut-in NEET caused her to manifest withdrawal symptoms. No matter how much work she was chased with, it didn't show up at all on her surface for even once. That was why it showed just how much she was starving for work that her face's complexion changed.



And at the end, in the midnight, Myuu rolled out from the closet of Hajime's room looking scared because she could hear a strange voice. She was clinging in tear on Hajime.



……Let's put aside for now just why she was hiding in the closet of Hajime's room at midnight.



Let's also put aside for the time being, the appearance of Myuu who was wearing adult lingerie with black tone unbecoming for a ten years old girl.



While we were at it, let's also put aside the fact how without anyone noticing there was a hole opened in the closets of the rooms of Hajime and Myuu with a size that could be freely entered by a child.



Even while his expression was grandly twitching, Hajime carefully wrapped Myuu inside a futon and put her into sleep. He then entered "the place of strange voice"――the room of Liliana. When he confirmed inside, he found Liliana making noise from a nightmare there.



She was breathing roughly looking like she was in pain while moaning. ……While sometimes,「fuheh」she was raising a strange giggle. Her expression was the usual creepy face.



It seemed, even inside her dream, she looked like she was going「Ge, geez-, this is really hopeless. Fine then, I'll do it already. If I don't do it, then who else will do it☆」, it seemed in her dream she was being happily chased by work even while acting displeased.



This princess couldn't escape from work whether in dream or reality.



Hajime devised a plan.



In the first place, Liliana had a habit of fantasizing. Especially regarding love affair. And then, in this house there was a leading person of that road. Yes, it was the famous shoujo manga artist Sumire.



With the work of such Sumire as the first in the list, the book collection of shoujo manga that was deposited in large amount at her workplace was given to Liliana.



Because of her seriousness that came since birth and her workaholic nature, since Liliana came to earth she was busy in learning various things and didn't really come into contact with this thing called manga. For Liliana, her reading was mostly thick learning book. She wasn't familiar with book that mainly had picture in it.



Because of that, at first Liliana was smiling wryly from the really unfamiliar experience, but because it was something prepared for her with effort she gave it a try,



And the result was,



「Munch munch-, gulp-……puhah. Aa, what's with this good-for-nothing. What are you doing just seeing her off there. Good grief, you don't understand a woman's heart……. Nn, continue to the next volume. Eerr, the next one, the next……」



She got addicted, and she was not just merely, but totally addicted in the world of shoujo manga.



Liliana was lying down on the bed while right beside her was a bottle of Co○ Cola and a bag of potato chip constantly in standby, she brought them to her mouth while still lying down while dragging her body forward and reaching her other hand toward the next volumes of manga piled up without rising up her body at all. She had reached this kind of advanced level now.



In addition, she was in a state that wasn't concerned at all with her rolled up skirt, generously exposing her thighs that recently had become somewhat plump, in addition, she sucked up *chupa-* her fingers that got gleamingly oily from the potato chip before wiping up those fingers on her flipped up skirt.



Already, there wasn't even a shred of atmosphere as a former princess from her.



She was an existence that shut herself inside her own room in broad daylight, equipped with carbonated drink and potato chip, and continuously adventured to the world of literary creation without getting tiring of it.



Liliana S. B. Hairihi.



Right now she had become a genuinely splendid shut-in NEET without anything that could be complained of from her!



「How did it turn out like this……」



Hajime who was standing beside the door of Liliana's room while looking at the state of such Liliana was pressing his head with one hand looking pained.



Certainly, it was Hajime who handed over the great amount of shoujo manga so that Liliana could enjoy her free time a bit. But, while that might be the case, he wondered just why in mere one month that work addict in abnormal pervert level could become a splendid shut-in NEET like this.



Hajime sighed while feeling troubled「Was the recoil from the work addiction too powerful?」at the former princess whose way of living was overly extreme.



And then, he approached toward Liliana who wasn't even noticing that Hajime was right behind her while she kept lying down and indulged in manga with her bare legs swinging up and down.



Standing beside the former princess whose panty's visibility wasn't just in glimpse anymore but already at completely exposed level, Hajime let out a deep sigh once more and held that plump butt in an eagle grip.



「Hinyah!? What is thisss!?」



Liliana's butt twitched up with her panty still fully exposed. Even so she didn't let go of her manga and she also didn't even stand up and only looked back across her shoulder. She then went「What, it's just Hajime-san」in understanding and smiled before returning to the world of manga without pause.



「No, don't go back there. Look over here, butt-naked princess.」



「Bu, butt-naked princess……that's a really cruel remark.」



As expected, Liliana couldn't just accept the way Hajime called her and she raised her body squirmingly. Yet even so, she only moved to a girl's sitting posture with her slovenly state unchanged seeing her skirt was still flipped up.



「And so what business do you have Hajime-san? As expected, it's to grope my butt? Ufufu, even though the sun is still high up……the love of my husband is strong.」



After saying such thing, Liliana fidgeted around while closing her eyes and she pushed out her lips「Nn」. An oily lips that was gleaming from potato chip remains.



Hajime's shoulders was falling in dejection at Liliana who didn't have even a shadow of the proud princess in the past while inside his heart he was complaining「In a sense, Liliana might be number one if speaking about the level of things not going as planned」.



And then, he gently used a tissue to wipe up the lips of the potato chip princess who was waiting for a kiss.



Liliana felt an out of place sensation on her lips and she showed a puzzled expression at Hajime who kept wiping.



「Your current appearance, I wonder what the bunches at the kingdom will feel if they see it.」



「? Won't they think, 'she is really living in happiness', like that? I'm happy you know?」



「……You also have potato chip and cola with you.」



「No, not really, that's not……certainly, they are really delicious though. I also think that they are the strongest combo. ……Want to eat?」



Liliana tilted her head thinking「Perhaps, he want to eat too?」while she rolled her body and took a bag of potato chip that was placed beside the pillow. And then, she rolled once more and returned to her former position with a really natural motion to get back to a girl's sitting posture.



And then, when she felt the lightness and silence of the potato chip bag she was presenting, she blinked「Eh?」and confirmed its content. The inside was already empty.



「Err, I thought it still has some remain……」



Giving only a glance at Hajime whose expression was gradually turning speechless, Liliana rolled and rolled once more to move to the edge of the bed. And then, she reached out her hand while still lying down and rummaged around under the bed searching for something.



「A, there is. ……Here, Hajime-san. Please take one.」



She lifted up a box with a familiar movement, and then she took out that from the bag while hiding it with her body before she held out her hand smoothly toward Hajime. Right after that, from her arranged fingers, *chakin!* a po○ky flew out.



Liliana's face looked triumphant. It seemed she saw a commercial and wanted to imitate it. And then next while she was at it, her other hand that was held in front of her chest also had a po○ky *shakin-* flying out. She ate that one herself.



「……」



「This is really delicousss」



Seeing Liliana who was smiling cheerfully while wordlessly doing 'aa~n' at him, Hajime was starting to show a tired expression all the more.



「……So, about my business.」



「A, that's right. What's the matter?」



「No, it's not really a big matter, today is exactly the second month. I'm wondering how it turn out.」



「……Ah, now that Hajime-san mention it.」



It seemed that she had completely forgotten the aim of being shut-in NEET. Liliana was making ○cky sticks went *shakin shakin* from her fingertips while nodding in understanding. ……Her fingertips *shakin* was surely using magic. Truly a waste of magic use.



Liliana smiled cheerfully and spread her hands widely as though to flaunt herself.



「Please look, Hajime-san. Hajime-san's strategy is right on the mark! I am splendidly free from any withdrawal symptoms even without doing any work, not just that I had turned into a normal girl who can think from the bottom of my heart that I don't want to do anything like work anymore!」



Liliana proclaimed energetically. An ambiguous groan「uboa」leaked out from Hajime's mouth.



It was truly just like this princess-sama who was unable to live except in an extreme way of living. No, perhaps it was exactly because she was a royalty that she could only live extremely……



「Lily. I don't know if you remember, but until the end this is a rehabilitation to cure your workaholic, it doesn't mean that it's fine for you to just roll around like this for your whole life you know?」



「Eh…………but, Hajime-san. If you work, you lose isn't that right?」



Hajime went「uboa」once more. This was no good, this former princess was no good already. Just within two months, she had thoroughly become a regretful princess.



「Listen, Lily. I am also an otaku, in my roots I'm with the indoor faction. That's why, I cannot unsparingly reject the saying to work is to lose. Tou-san also told me in the past, that a person who can become shut-in with their own money is the winner in a sense.」



「Hear that, just as I thought, we lose if we work!」



「Oi, are you listening to me? I said "your own money" just now.」



「Ee~rr, but, I am Hajime-san's wife……in short, Hajime-san's money is my money――higyahn!?」



An iron forehead flick burst out toward Liliana who was talking like Giant.「My forehead-, my foreheaaad-」Liliana screamed while writhing around.



Liliana's skirt inevitably got rolled up once more with her panty completely laid bare. A vein pulsed on Hajime's forehead while he spitted out「I'll stop being gentle」and he put an eagle grip on her plump thigh.



「Fuwah. Wha, what are you doing Hajime-san. As I thought, you are craving me right from the afternoo――」



「This thigh has become really plump huh. It feels chubby.」



「Eh? Is, is that so?」



「Yeah. Far more than two months earlier.」



Hajime was giving an unblinking gaze while「This place too, and also here too huuh」he grasped at Liliana's butt and her upper arm.



Guessing what Hajime wanted to say, Liliana's girl power finally reacted. Her complexion was turning pale drastically.



Hajime's fingertip was sliding toward the most dangerous place on her body. Hajime's eyes kept being unblinking and he ignored even when Liliana tried to stop him, and pinched at that place.



――puni-



「Stooppp――!! Don't pinch my stomachhh-」



「Oi oi, what's this. What's with this flabby stomach? Hmm?」



「Tha, that's not it! This is, there is just a bit of that going this, should I say that it's……」



Liliana was pressing on her stomach while her eyes were rolling round and round while she was desperately searching for excuse, but the scattered wreckage of snacks, the remains of carbonated drinks, they all stole the persuasiveness from her.



Hajime turned his heart into demon king and dealt the finishing blow to such Liliana.



「At this rate, in one more month……the overweight princess Liliana will be completed.」



「O, overweight princess.」



Liliana crumbled down. It seemed that a sense of danger for her current situation was finally sprouting. She threw her poc○y *pei-* still with teary eyes. Furthermore, she took out Hap○y Turn from under the sheets and *pei-*. She took out a great amount of gummy from under her pillow and *pei-*. She reached out her hand under the bed and took out every kind of potato chip, Tonga○ Corn, Pota○ta Yaki, Do○tachos, boxes of ○maibou, Country ○'am, Cho○ Pie, etc……and threw them all *pei-*. And for the last, she hopped up and down *pyon pyon* which caused candies to fall down from all over her clothes. She threw *peeeeei-* all of them altogether. (TN: , , , , , , )



The snacks built a mountain at the corner of the room. Just how much she had piled up?



「Hajime-san. It appears that I have the fate that I have to work no matter what.」



「You are going extreme again. Why cannot you do things in "moderation" huh?」



「I am Liliana. A woman who can only choose white or black, one or ten!」



「No, even if you proclaim like that it's still」



Liliana who was growing somewhat completely desperate caused Hajime to scratch his cheek wondering what to do.



But, at that time,



「I have heard the story!」



The closet of the room was thrown open *bam*. From there, the one who leaped out with a pointlessly refined somersault was the mother of Nagumo family――Sumire. Just what was going on with the closets of Nagumo residence? It was terrifying because it felt like it would access another world at this rate.



Hajime ignored Sumire and investigated inside the closet. While he was doing that, Sumire made a cool pose while pointing with a snap at Liliana.



「Lily-chan! Become mine(my assistant). If you do that, then I'll give you half the work!」



「Yes, happily!」



In respond to that sentence of invitation that was like a certain demon king somewhere, the former princess replied swiftly like a certain pub worker somewhere. (TN: Anyone know the reference here?)



「Saay, Okaa-san. Just from where in the world you entered into this closet? There is no hole inside, and there is no way I won't notice if it is hidden……」



Hajime turned around while his head was cocked in puzzlement. There was already no one else there.



「What……the……」



Hajime who didn't notice their presence exiting the room at all was astonished.



Hajime couldn't suppress his shudder against his mother who recently seemed to learn the skill of appearing at unexpected places and at unexpected moments. Actually, in the world of publishing business there was a rumor that Sumire-sensei was a real life Dorae○n though……



It was story of a bit later when it was finally known that it was because Sumire was using and applying the artifacts that Hajime created in preparation for the worst case or artifacts for making the daily life convenient.



☆Shoujo Manga Artist Lily



「Thank god~, you really saved me, Lily-chan. I thought that you can become a battle-ready force because your fingers are dexterous, but this surpass my expectation.」



「I'm honored that I can be useful. I myself is having fun getting involved with the creation work of manga……」



It was about a week after Sumire took away Liliana without Hajime even noticing to become her work's assistant.



Because several of Sumire's assistants who were working with her until know suddenly got sick or had family problem, she became short of hand all of a sudden and in need of substitute assistant in a hurry.



Of course, because Sumire was a big-shot manga artist, the publisher would prepare excellent assistant even in such situation. But, Sumire who knew that recently Liliana got really addicted with shoujo manga thought that this was a good chance and she tried making Liliana became her helper.



As the result, Liliana who was skillful and possessed uncommon concentration power from the start managed to learn the skill that wasn't inferior even when compared with veteran assistant in just a week. Now she had become a very satisfactory battle force.



It appeared that manga creation work suited Liliana. The work also had a moderate pressure where she couldn't bear to make a mess of the manuscript that was drawn by Sumire who was someone she loved, it needed precise attentiveness, it had a clear time limitation that was the deadline, and the work amount was also quite much.



And then, the best thing for Liliana above all else, was that this work "wasn't a work that she was forced to do". It was a work that Liliana liked where the factor that she was helping Sumire was strong.



In a sense, it could be said that this work was fit for Liliana to a T.



「Fufu, Lily-chan. Right now you are making a really good face you know? You have shadow under your eye, but it feels more like something healthy and fulfilling.」



「Yes. Perhaps this is the first time I'm getting absorbed in work with an excited feeling like this.」



They had just somehow finished the manuscript in time right before the deadline. Now they were talking to each other leisurely while drinking café au lait that was filled with a lot of milk. The other assistants were also unanimously praising Liliana's work attitude.



Here she wasn't standing in the lead. They all were working hard together where everyone was praising their peers. It was something really fresh for Liliana and gave her a great sense of fulfillment.



「So Lily-chan. I asked you to come helping for the time being but, what will you do after this. If it's okay with you, I'll employ you formally.」



「Sumire-okaasama――no, Sumire-sensei, if it's fine with you then please, by any means.」



The two exchanged a firm handshake with each other.



Like this, the workaholic part-time leader had gone through being a shut-in NEET and finally become a shoujo manga artist's assistant.



Half a year after that.



「Haa, Sumire-okaasama. As I thought, it's just no good. It's fine already, so please go back to your own work.」



「What are you saying now. There is still time. It's too fast for you to give up.」



「Uu, but……」



Liliana dejectedly turned her eyes to the clock on the wall. It was just a bit more until the time limit.



Well-balanced meal and the fierce and violent battlefield that was the approaching deadline had shaved off the excessive fat from Liliana's body. However, in reverse her body build became just right――even though she was slim, yet her style became voluptuous and her sensuality increased considerably. There was also how her age had turned seventeen years old, her charm as a woman was increasing by far and away.



Liliana who was putting on such adult sensuality was now in a state that was being down, for some reason it caused anyone who was looking at her to harbor various desire without reason.



「Come one, don't be that down. Lily-chan is the prized pupil of this Sumire-sensei, that's why hold yourself more confidently.」



「Sumire-okaasama……that's right. Besides, even Hajime-san is a person who won't give up until the end. It's no good if I give up now.」



Liliana clenched her small fist and made an appeal of not giving up.



Now then, if it was asked what Liliana and Sumire were waiting together for, they were waiting for a call.



In this half a year, Liliana whose heart was completely stolen by the world of literary creation had increased her skill by a great margin. And then, she made her superabundance delusion to erupt and secretly drew her own shoujo manga, but Sumire who knew that invited her to apply for the Rookie of the Year Award.



Today was the day where the winner would be announced. If someone won a place then they would be told by phone. If there wasn't any call until the appointed time, then that meant that their work was rejected.



The work where she poured her heart and blood got evaluated by other people. This experience that was the first for her was heightening Liliana's nervousness to a new height.



Seeing Liliana who was staring fixedly at the needle of the clock, Sumire who thought inside her heart「The nervous face of Lily-chan who recently grew into a completely lewd body――not that, she recently look adult……it's unbearableee」unconsciously reached out her hand squirmingly, it was at that time,



――purururururururu-



「!?」



「I'm sorry-, it's just a sudden impulse! Forgive me!」



The resounding ringtone caused Liliana to stand up in a flash. She left behind Sumire who for some reason was apologizing while making excuse and took her smartphone into her hand.



She answered the phone timidly, and a beat later, her expression turned bright in a flash. She expressed words of thanks「Thank you very much-」many times while bowing her head repeatedly as though she was a pure Japanese person.



Like that after Liliana cut off the phone, she leaped toward Sumire who was smiling broadly from guessing the result.



「I did it, Sumire-okaasama! I, I did it!」



「You see, it's just as I told you right? I told you it will be fine if it's Lily-chan. And, which place you won?」



「Yes, it's the first place! The number one! The grand victor!」



「Oh my. I thought that it might be possible, but you actually really took it. As expected from Lily-chan.」



It seemed that Lily's submitted work took first place.



After that, the work of Liliana who took the Rookie of the Year Award obtained an explosive popularity and it sold out like hot cakes.



Surely her being a relative and also a prized pupil of that famous shoujo manga artist great Sumire-sensei was also one of the factors of her high newsworthiness.



By the way, the story of the manga was about the journey of a talentless young man who was summoned to another world, where he brushed aside adversity until he defeated an evil god, in the process of that journey the main character was connecting his heart with the princess of the kingdom. It was a really common love fantasy genre.



In the middle of the journey, the princess of vampire, rabbit-eared girl, a dragon onee-san, a widow and her daughter, the teacher and girl classmates who were summoned together with the young man made their appearance and they had a nice atmosphere with the young man, but the young man's heart was leaning toward the princess of the kingdom. Like that, there was also the desire of certain someone laid bare in the content of the story.



It went without saying that Liliana was given a coo~~~ld chilly gaze from the wives who were reading the manga.



Although, even though the story was something common, the emotion of the characters, the story's development, and the scene depiction were something overflowing with realisty as though the creator had seen it with her own eyes. It seemed that caused it to be received by the readers.



Now then, Liliana who had discovered something for her to live for, became Sumire second gen, and took a seat in manga world, inside such person there was a trait that couldn't be ignored by the people related with business world.



That was her elegance as a royalty that she had recovered from discovering something to live for. And then, her personality and beauty that once in the past charmed millions of people. In addition, was her refined sex appeal that recently she was clad with.



In short, she had the appearance and personality that was extremely appealing for media.



Because of that, once she showed up in things like autograph session or interview, her popularity exploded greatly separated from the manga.



After all, because she was a former princess she was used with going out in front of a lot people, she also had the full knowledge of what kind of expression she needed to give the impression she wanted to other. Compared to probing the gut of each other against foreign negotiator or noble, just making herself to be received favorably by the mass was just too easy.



Because she was recognized as the prized pupil of great Sumire-sensei by society, there was no way she could smear mud on the face of her treasured mother-in-law. She also wanted to respond to the feeling of her fans who said to her that they liked her manga.



Liliana who was thinking like that displayed her princess skill in full without holding anything back.



As the result, a year after Liliana started her activity as shoujo manga artist, at the time when her manga was decide to be turned into anime in an unprecedented speed, Liliana was,



「Everyy~~one! Thank you very much for coming today! Anime decision☆ Congratulations! This is Lily who will sing the theme song as the work's creator dee~~su! I'll sing with my all, so please enjoy it okay!」



――WAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!!!



While a thousand fans raised their loud cheers (because the ticket was limited, only a thousand people could enter), Liliana stood on a stage wearing a cute outfit like an idol, and then she sent a wink *pachin-*.



The former princess, former part-time leader, former shut-in NEET, and the popular shoujo manga artist, was now turning into an existence that was laying her hand on the seat of top idol.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I'm sorry that Lily arc turn long.



I'll end it in the next chapter, after that I'll write a bit of the wives who didn't get spotlight, and I'm also thinking of trying to write about the Getting Kidnapped Too Much Case.



Incidentally, in the main story, is there any section that feels like「This part is written vaguely, more detail please」? Sometimes in the middle of writing I often thought 'I want to try writing it in more detail someday', but the After and extra story are too fun that those things are completely at far distance of the memory.



If you have request, then please don't hold back and tell me whether through review or message.



The next update is planned to be be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 228




☆Top Idol Lily



In the center of a dressing room that was quite large, Liliana who was buried in bouquets and also presents and letters from fans was moving her pen with a terrific momentum *scratch scratch scratch scratch scratch* while still dressed in a cute stage dress.



Without even feeling bothered that her fingertips were dirtied with ink, she kept moving her pen with a momentum that felt like it would even produce afterimage. The reason for this was of course in order to draw her manga.



There wasn't even thirty minutes until her next show. And then once she stood on the stage she wouldn't be able to make it to the deadline. Therefore, she had to finish her manuscript in less than this thirty minutes!



*whoosh* Liliana's left hand reached out. What that hand grasped was a Calory ○te. It was a really excellent ration if you ignored how it would turn lumpy inside the mouth. She had no time to eat since the morning, so she replenished her nourishment like this. (TN: I never ate Calorie Mate before and the author here is using a word ぱっさぱさ(passa pasa) that I cannot find the meaning, to describe the sensation. I just put the word lumpy as placeholder, anyone know how to describe the sensation of eating Calorie Mate?)



And, at that timing, regardless of how Liliana's had asked the staffs so that no one entered the room until the decided time, the door of the dressing room was knocked.



Liliana whose princess skill was lively even in this kind of time was replying brightly with a voice that would make anyone who heard it to feel happy despite how Liliana's eyes didn't even look away from her manuscript and how her hand also didn't stop moving.



「Ye~~s. The door is not locked~」



「Eerr, excuse us.」



「E, excuse us for the intrusion.」



Seeing the people who entered, then indeed, they were people who weren't a problem even if the staffs let them enter.



「Ah, Kaori! Also even Shizuku! You two really came for me!」



Just as Liliana said, the people who timidly entered inside the dressing room were Kaori and Shizuku. The two of them were making a really speechless expression toward Liliana who was surrounded by bouquets and many other things, wearing a showy dress, yet her fingertips were dirtied by ink while diligently drawing pictures.



「Somehow, you really feel like an entertainer here……. Eer, so, Lily. You suddenly sent that kind of mail, 『Emergency! Emergency! Hee~lp-. Especially Kaori!』, just what in the world with that?」



Just as Kaori said, Liliana sent reinforcement request to the wives.



It seemed that she especially needed Kaori's reinforcement, the reason for that was,



「Yes, I'm glad that it's Kaori who arrived first. I'm sorry for the hurry, but please use the magic to prolong time. Also, it has to be finished in about twenty minutes……for now, please expand the time difference to ten times. Ah, Shizuku sit over there, please help with the inking.」



「「Eee~~~」」



It seemed this former princess at last found herself lacking time and she now attempted to solve the problem using magic. Asking to use magic that interfered even with the principle of the world in order to finish a manuscript――it was a special bargain sale of an age of god magic. In a sense, it could be said that this was really fitting for a wife of the demon king.



Kaori and Shizuku couldn't hide their complicated face after hearing the reason they were called here.



「I understand that you are really in trouble but……somehow I don't really feel it at all.」



When Kaori unconsciously muttered that, Liliana lifted her face and showed a crisp expression.



And then,



「Kaori.」



「Eh, wha, what is it, Lily?」



「I am Liliana. A woman who will do anything if it's to protect the deadline.」



「Aa~, yep, that's right.」



Kaori went「Well, isn't it fine」and sent a half-smile at the crisp Liliana while releasing her age of god magic. With this, a ten-fold time difference was created between inside this room and outside it.



For a while, the sound of *scratch scratch scratch scratch scratch scratch* and the sound of *splat splat, plop plop* resounded inside the room. Putting aside the content of the manga, both Kaori and Shizuku knew very well that Liliana was working hard, so they seriously endeavored to help her.



Like that, after around an hour, some more reinforcement arrived. It was Hajime, Yue, and Shia. Even while they too showed an exasperated face at the reason they were called here, their thought toward Liliana was already like「Good grief, just go until as far as you can go」, and so they began to participate in helping her.



「Hey, Lily. When we passed through beside the stage just now……」



「Yes? What is it?」



While Yue and Shia were obediently helping, Hajime suddenly started talking.



「Somehow, two people who I recognize really well were wearing black suits and sunglasses while doing otagei with really smooth move. That wasn't just my hallucination right?」(TN: Otagei=Fans who were yelling and dancing at pop concerts)



「Aah, about Shinji-san and Yoshiki-san.」



「……As I thought, it's those two huh.」



「Yes. You don't know Hajime-san? Those two right now are starting up a security firm and working as bodyguard that specialized in protecting celebrity. This time they are accepting to guard my concert also because they are acquaintance.」



Liliana was tilting hear head while saying incomprehensible thing like「Since they became a hot topic that "the otagei of the black suited bodyguards is godly", it seems they are also undertaking the role of the captain of the groupies」.



Nakano Shinji and Saitou Yoshiki.



Those two who were the bunches who once were doing spiteful harassment toward Hajime, after the death of Hiyama Daisuke and Kondo Reiichi who the often hanged out with, they began to change little by little. They displayed a desperately earnest fight in the legendary decisive battle even when facing the apostles and right now they didn't hold any antagonism even against Hajime.



Such Shinji and Yoshiki, after graduating from high school they were living aimlessly without doing particularly anything, but just recently they started up a security firm that specialized in guarding celebrity.



They were wearing uniform of black suit and sunglasses which would make anyone want to give a straight-man retort that they watched too many movie, but their skill as bodyguard was super first class. Their experience in facing monster and god's apostle in another world was something that couldn't possibly be surpassed by the like of suspicious person, so it could be said that this was only natural. They had already piled up many achievements and received deep trust from the world of show business.



And those two, from piling up many days of being the security of idol concert, they saw the groupies who were doing otagei activity and it seemed that for some reason they got triggered. While those two were standing at both sides of the stage to keep a watchful eye for anyone suspicious, they displayed generously the physical ability their body was blessed with and completely and thoroughly copied the otagei moves.



Since a video of two bodyguards wearing black suits and sunglasses doing otagei with really smooth move was uploaded in a certain video site, they were treated as god of otagei world and won a popularity that wasn't inferior even against the idols at the present from a part of the community.



Rather, their fame was so much that there were even people who came to the concert just to witness the "dancing black suited bodyguards".



「Nn, their dance was really amazing.」



Yue said that while lifting her hand midair. She connected spaces using space magic and tried to secretly have a look.



Like that a hole manifested midair and the spectacle at the other sight of that hole was――



「Lily-, Lily-! Fuuh, fuuh, fuuh, fuuh!!」



「You guys-, put your soul more into it! Heat up the concert with your whole body and spirit! Here are the audience seats. But this place is also another stage-」



Shinji was waving around a light stick with really smooth moves while inciting up more shouts of support for Lily. Yoshiki was showing a movement that was completely synchronized with his partner while passionately leading the groupies.



「Ca, captain. The movement is just too intense, my stamina is already……」



「These dancing bodyguards……they are monster.」



One person, then one more person, the group of otaku was collapsing before the concert was starting. By the way, the captain referred to Shinji, while Yoshiki was called as the demonic vice-captain.



Shinji who was dancing single-mindedly while dressed in a smart black suit shouted at the collapsed otakus.



「Is this fine with you? Ending it here like this.」



「Eh?」



「Are you fine with this, giving up on everything.」



「Cap, tain?」



The group of otaku who was heaving and drenched in sweat, turned their eyes toward Shinji who was smoothly dancing.



「We are, the people who protect the idols. We protect their body, their heart, we are the people who offer them our life so they can shine!」



The smoothness in Shinji's dance was gradually increasing. It was truly a master-class otagei that was filled with soul and spirit!



「Stand up you guys! Never Give Up! If someone doesn't give up, then they will surely be able to reach the summit of their dream! A man taught that to me!」



The gazes of Yue and others turned toward Hajime. Surely if talking about a man who exerted strong influence to Shinji and others, then it could only mean Hajime.



Shinji's words that were overflowing with spirit caused one of the collapsed otaku to ask in amazement. Even during that time, Shinji was drawing a beautiful trajectory of light stick in the air while demonstrating an artistic dance.



「Captain. Just what is your dream? Just what is it, that make you go until this far!?」



It was a heated question that came from an otaku who was somehow swallowed by the place's atmosphere. Right now, the people who collapsed, and also the people who didn't, everyone was drenched in sweat while directing a serious gaze at Shinji.



「What is this for, you ask? That's obvious.」



Shinji looked at them, and then he looked at his pal, then he declared powerfully!



「It's to-, HAVE A SHOTGUN WEDDING WITH IDOL-!!!」



*DOLL DOLL DOLL~~*, the proclamation of Shinji was echoing inside the concert venue that was in the middle of preparation. It echoed really clearly.



……It seemed, that was the main reason why they founded a security firm that specialized in celebrity. Yoshiki beside Shinji was looking up to the sky while his lips formed a thin line as thought he was biting his lip against something.



「Wha, what are you saying!? Something like that is obviously impossible! It just cannot happen!」



The otaku who asked just now argued. But, such words didn't reach Shinji. The reason was, because Shinji had seen it. In a world where he was walking along right beside death, he had witnessed the indomitable spirit of that man!



「No, it's not impossible! Because I know! I know a man who even though he was dropped into the bottom of hell, even though he faced nothing but despair-, yet he continued to struggle without giving up and created a harem-. A man who day after day, is always having a debauch party with transcendentally beautiful girls-. The man who reached the summit-」



*gachari* A sound rang. When Yue and others came back to their senses with a 'hah' and turned their gaze toward the sound, over there they saw the figure of Hajime drawing out Donner. It seemed he was planning to snipe at Shinji through the connected spaces. In panic, Shia moved to stop him using Cobra Twist.



「Even we, if we don't give up we should be able to achieve a shotgun wedding with idol! We should be able to do it! Or rather, about this matter, even if we put aside Nagumo, I just cannot grasp how the hell that Endo can create harem-. Why, why Endo? Why am I no good huh? Forget harem, there ain't even any sign I'll be able to get a girlfriend y'know. Or rather, there ain't even any encounter. There ain't even a tiny bit of it! I ain't popular at the level 'am I actually cursed as retaliation for harassing the demon king in the past?' level already here! GODDAMN IT ALLLLLLLL-」



Right now the light stick was leaving behind afterimages while Shinji's otagei was showing a movement that was unthinkable to be at the level of human. That was, the dance of someone who had stepped their foot into the territory of god! The manifestation of the overflowing yell of the soul!



「Captain……a person like you is……」



「Are you trying, to challenge the impossible……」



「Heh. What an idiot. But, I don't hate it yeah, a passionate idiot like you.」



The otaku group was starting to stand back up! Perhaps they felt sympathy at that yell of the soul that laid everything bare. A fearless grin was emerging on every single one of their――



Yue closed the space.



「……Nn. Lily. Is this okay?」



「Ah, yes. Yue-san. Your precise work really helps.」



「Yes, Lily. I also finished here. What's next?」



「As expected from Shizuku. That's an excellent work. Please do this next.」



They resumed their work as though nothing had happened. It seemed they decided that they didn't see anything. Even Hajime who ate a smooth transition from Cobra Twist to Triangle Choke by Shia also obediently go back to his seat.



「Come to think of it Lily. Is there anything particular in your surrounding?」



「Anything, particular?」



Hajime asked while he was rubbing his neck. Liliana sent Hajime a glance while tilting her head without dropping the speed of her pen at all.



Hajime was putting tone on his manuscript page while nodding「Yeah」.



「Look, recently my existence became known right? Especially because Kaa-san dropped the bomb.」



「Yes. Well, even if Hajime-san called it dropping the bomb, but I too am calling Sumire-okaasama as "okaa-sama" normally, so it became known with natural flow though.」



「No, not just about your relationship with me, but also about this and that in private.」



Those words caused Liliana's face to spontaneously turn red.



Just some time ago, when Liliana received interview in television, Sumire also participated there as a special guest. At that time, Sumire jokingly said「Liliana is the wife of my son you know, so don't make a move on her okay~」.



If that was all then it would be nothing big because it was something already known, but Sumire who got carried away then dropped the bomb by frankly exposing a part of the married private life between Liliana and her son. That was already a talk that could smash apart the dream of the male fans into pieces.



Furthermore, Sumire also casually said「It's not just Lily-chan you know~」while giving hints that Liliana's partner actually also had other women and he had an indulging relationship with those women too.



Naturally, there was no way the media wouldn't bite at the impure private life of Liliana-sensei who was a beautiful manga artist and also an idol who was at the peak of her popularity, though Hajime crushed the commotion before it could create a stir.



Thanks to that, for some reason the topic wasn't getting excessively discussed in TV shows and the like, but even so it didn't mean that there wasn't any effect at all.



One of the effects was the rash acting of a part of the wildly fanatic fans.



「Before this too, you almost got attacked by a reckless fan right? Who knows what can happen.」



「Perhaps that is so but, currently there is no sing like that. Besides, I'm not so weak that a civilian can take me by surprise. I have also trained much in "Hauria-style close quarter hand-to-hand combat art ~This is the bunnies' way y'know~" from Shia-san's direct teaching.」



「……」



Hajime's gaze turned toward Shia. Shia looked aside. When Hajime muttered「It's really fresh how the style name is accompanied with subtitle there」, Shia's cheeks blushed with a puff. There was no doubt that her currently invisible rabbit ears were surely a flopped down rabbit ears from shame.



「Rather than that, everyone. Can you all come to listen to my concert today?」



Liliana changed the topic to wave off Hajime's worry and also implying that she was fine. Hearing that question, Hajime and others looked at each other's face.



This was the stage where their important family was standing on. Although they had attended her concert several times before this, it was impossible for them to go home after coming this far. Their answer could only be one. With an unanimous decision, they would cheer at the idol wife, and idol fellow wife.



After that, Liliana who somehow managed to finish the manuscript before the deadline handed it over to her editor with a really nice smile. The editor gave a thumb up with a posed look before she straddled her beloved motorcycle Kawasaki's Ninja ZX10-R and vanished into the city. ――Though she was a woman who finally welcomed her 60th birthday this year……



Like that the last concert for today began. Liliana in her fluttery and frilly dress lavishly sent winks and *twinkle-☆* and heated up the venue.



Below that stage, even the two black suited and sunglasses bodyguards who were taking position as security while demonstrating smooth otagei like they were possessed, they were greatly heating up the venue by becoming one with the otaku group whose gaze seemed to conceal some kind of determination.



After the concert closed the curtain with enthusiasm and excitement and fulfillment, surprisingly there was still works for Liliana to attend an autograph and handshake session. Even while Hajime and others were getting exasperated with just how much work she was doing, they still stood from slight distance away and watched over Liliana who was currently mass producing fans with her 'former princess & real idol smile-!'



Fan number 1――a silver haired and mismatched eyes young man with atmosphere like a stepping stool reincarnator. (TN: Fumidai tenseisha(stepping stool reincarnator)= a term for characters who are used as foil to make other character look good, or characters that tried to carry out wicked scheme only to meet unfortunate end themselves at the end. Like Kouki or Hiyama, I guess. I just looked up this term in a hurry, so please correct me if my understanding is wrong.)



「Lily-sensei. I'm a great fan! It's a lie that you have a husband right!?」



「Thank you very much. Can I trouble you to teach me your name?」



「Eh, ah, I'm Satoshi.」



「……To Satoshi-san, here. Thank you very much for always coming to my concert. Please come again next time okay?」



「Yo, you remember me……yes-. I'll absolutely come! I will cheer for you!」



Fan number 2――a girl with her front hair styled like Sada○.



「Sensei. What do you think about love between the same gender?」



「Can you please tell me your name?」



「u……○ko, desu.」



「Aah, you are the person who were always cramming your fan letter with the words "I love you" aren't you? Thank you very much. I'm happy that a cute girl like you is supporting me.」



「a, u」



「Please support me from here on too.」



「yes」



Fan number 3――A male hero wearing a high-class suit that had the embroidery of super-deformed Lily.



「Lily-sensei. I come here today bringing a marriage registration. Plese, give your sign at here.」



「That's a splendid embroidery no matter how many times I see it. What's more, it always has different pattern each time. If I remember correctly, you sewed it yourself right? I feel embarrassed somehow, thank you very much. So it's fine if I sign here then. Fufu, what a humorous person.」



「Say, Lily-sensei. I cannot read this though……are these letters from a country somewhere?」



「They are Hairihi Kingdom letters. ……Is it, no good?」



「-. Don't be absurd. Though I will be happy if next time I can have you write it in Japanese.」



「My. Ufufu. Then, please come again at the next concert okay?」



「Of course.」



Fan number 4――An onee-sama person who was strangely muscular



「Lily-chaaan! The concert today is also reeaally great!!」



「Dear me, I'm totally moved」



「Fufu, thank you very much for every time. It's because all of you onee-sama are always cheering up with loud voices(deep voices) that I immediately notice when onee-sama's group is coming.」



「Oh noes, how embarrassing. When we are excited, our voice unconsciously turned ju~st a little bit burly you knooww」



「Oi, just now, someone said『It's not the level of burly anymore. That voice was completely like the voice of beast』, who's the guy saying that, aaa!? I'm gonna butche――cough-. I'll give him punishment mon.」



「Now now, Kenji――cough-. Reika-san. If you make that kind of gallant face(berserker face), everyone will be charmed(traumatized) you know? Rather than that, please come next time too without fail. I also want to meet all the other onee-sama.」



「Ah geez, Lily-chan, you always know what to say to make us happy. Yes, of course, we will come to cheer for you again. After all we, the members of "Manly Woman Path", all of us love Lily-chan so much!」



Even while conversing intimately with the fans, Liliana was still handling the long queue so swiftly it was a mystery.



Seeing her like that, Hajime commented briefly.



「So deep.」



It seemed he commented about the fans.



By the way, all those fans would participate in the event where Liliana appeared every time without fail, so Hajime and others also knew their face. And then, Hajime became really uneasy with their speech and conduct, so he investigated their background from feeling worried.



What he understood from the result was, for example the fan number 1 the young man, his appearance was completely like a stepping stool reincarnator, but actually he was a splendid monk with priesthood. He disguised(?) himself using wig and colored contact and attended Lily's event secretly.



Furthermore, fan number 2 the girl, she was actually the young daughter of Japan's preeminent great conglomerate that managed long-standing department stores. Fan number 3 the male hero was the oldest son of a lawyer family that had continued for generations, a son of the current chairman of JF○A. Fans number 4 were the Japan version Chrysta――the leaderships of an organization that took control of the underworld of the underworld of the pleasure district of the whole Japan. (TN: Japan Federation of Bar Associations. Btw, will I get any problem by brazenly putting the censored names like this? Should I put some censoring?)



Other than them, there was a frog faced virtuoso doctor that was said to possess god's hand, a detective that often said 'in the name of my grandfather', a super high school student level female high school student, an unfortunate looking young man that called a fat kitty cat「sensei」, a foreigner whispering「The human of this star is――」while holding a canned coffee in one hand……etc (TN: Can anyone help me with the references here? I only know about the doctor, as for the rest, I give up)



Certainly they were really deep. Those fans came from a deep fan stratum. There was no doubt that inside Liliana there was an ability to attract people. And then, she conversed intimately with those men and women of dee~p character, sometimes she ignored them, sometimes she led them on, and she then ended the conversation in a pleasant note and sent them back. Seeing her figure like that reminded Hajime and others of the princess who once fiercely fought against the nobles and empire diplomats using smiling face and dignity and words (thorn and indirect implication are optional).



「It's true they have deep personality but……how should I say it, Lily's personality, it's different from normal idol, it's……」



Kaori spoke in hesitation while her cheeks were twitching. Yue and others supplemented on her saying with an expression that seemed to say that they really understood what she meant.



「……They are clingy.」



「I can feel obsession from them desuu」



「Perhaps this is saying too much but……recently I also feel something like worship from them.」



Exactly like they said, actually a really small proportion――in places like BBS in internet and so on, a topic that talked about 'there are a lot of fellows with screw loose among Lily-sensei's fans' was spreading.



「Is this really fine?」



Kaori was staring at Liliana worriedly. Following her, Hajme and others were also staring at the figure of the idol princess who was showing a natural and perfect smile that was overflowing with so much elegance and intimacy.



For Liliana who had been competing against veteran nobles and foreign diplomats since her childhood, it was a trifling matter to pound a degree of information of her fans into her head. If she could exchange words with them for just once, she would never forget their face, and if she conversed with them just for a bit, even from just that she would see through what kind of gesture and way of talking they would like and dealt with them using that.



Against someone like that, there was no way an idol fans wouldn't have their heart captured, which continuously increased the production of fanatic fans even now.



Like that, by the time the line was handled until only half remained, the worry of Hajime and co became reality.



「Sorry but, you can stop right there.」



Before Hajime and others moved, Shinji who was standing by near Liliana quietly walked forward and called at one of the fans to stop moving. At the same time, Yoshiki moved casually beside Liliana.



「Eh, eh? Wha, what is it?」



「……I won't say anything bad. Just go home for now. I don't want to create a disturbing topic in this kind of place.」



It was a man who looked like a fan who was told right to the face「Please leave」by a black suited bodyguard. The fan looked cowering without any composure, but behind his hanging down long hair could be seen a glaring gaze peeking out.



The young man argued vehemently with small stifled voice why it was only him that got stopped like this. Shinji's gesture and gaze expressed that he would never let the man pass. The overwhelming pressure from Shinji that was different from a civilian greatly scared the young man while also made him lost a bit of temper.



The bright atmosphere until now completely changed and the fans and staffs at the surrounding felt a strained tension in the air. While they were starring uneasily between the young man and Shinji, Liliana who guessed the situation stood up.



「Shinji-san. I'll be fine, so please let that person through.」



「No, but still. This is also pretty much my work……」



Liliana called at Shinji. Shinji frowned with a troubled look while looking behind over his shoulder.



But, at that time, the atmosphere of the young man who was shrinking away from Shinji suddenly changed entirely. His fingertips that were moving restlessly stopped still.



「Shinji? Right now, you called that man by name? That man who should be a mere security guard?」



That voice was small and sounded a bit stuttering like before. However, a hint of dangerousness that came from boiling great emotion could be felt from it.



Perhaps the people at the surrounding also felt that hint of danger, they were starting to take distance like a tide drawing back.



In the middle of that, it was only Liliana who kept staring straight at the young man and she nodded.



「Yes. I called him by name just now. Because he is my friend.」



「You act as you please again in a place where I don't know. What a bad child. You always always, with other man at a place where I don't know. Even though I have been this patience like this. Even though I was thinking of forgiving you about that self-proclaimed husband too.」



「Forgiving? Why, do I need your forgiveness? What is that forgiveness for?」



「Shut up-. I won't forgive you anymore-. Unforgivable-」



The young man was talking incoherently, however, seeing Liliana who was staring straight at him without faltering and asked him back, the young man faltered in return and he shouted.



Like that, he entered his hand into his breast pocket and took out a kitchen knife from there. Before this the security had carried out inspection when audiences entered at the beginning, so it was unclear how this young man could bring in something like that. Shinji and Yoshiki grimaced at the hole in security.



The surrounding people screamed and they backed further away. They were forming a circle around Liliana and the others where there was nobody else other than them.



Hajime looked like he was going to move at the corner of her sight, but Liliana stopped him with her gaze. In respond Hajime scratched his cheek before he leaned his back on the wall to show he that he was watching carefully. That gestured showed his trust toward her, at the same time it also expressed Hajime's intent that no matter how the situation ended up he would help her dealing with it. Liliana's cheeks loosened slightly seeing that.



Although, for the young man, it seemed he saw that smile as something that was mocking him. He shouted「So you are also laughing at me-」while charging forward with the kitchen knife raised high.



Shinji sighed while clenching his fist to subdue the young man. But, beside him a silhouette stepped forth smoothly.



Of course, it was Liliana. Behind, Yoshiki leaked out a stupid voice「Ah」.



「You-, you forever, belongs to meee-」



「First, you should hear what other people say.」



The kitchen knife was swung down. The surrounding people held their breath. They screamed and averted their eyes from the tragedy that would happen in the next moment.



In an instant.



The up and down of the young man was reversed.



「Ah, eh?」



The young man leaked out a confused voice at himself who before he knew it was rolling on the floor with just a light impact.



「I don't know what kind of life you have experienced until now, but I'll feel troubled if you are demanding from me the responsibility for that feeling where things cannot go as you wished it.」



The young man came back to his senses from those words of Liliana. He forcefully stood up once more and rushed while shouting again. He thought that surely just now he only slipped.



But, the result was the same.



Just before he could touch Liliana, his field of vision was overturned in a circle and he then faced up to the sky along with a light impact.



This time he understood. That he was thrown down by Liliana.



The humiliation and the reality that wouldn't move like how he wanted caused the young man to spew out words that were already hard to comprehend while this time he charged forward trying to stab his knife.



But, perhaps it should be said as expected. The arm that he thrust out was softly grasped, right after that the young man's body revolved around Liliana once like a satellite in contrary to his wish. He was swung around back to the path he just came from and then he was pushed away by one of Liliana's hand.



「I'm very good in remembering people's face. However, I don't remember you.」



The screaming young man charged. Liliana's arm rolled up his arm, and then she twirled beside him as though she was dancing on the stage and she flung away the young man with a really natural flow.



「You-」



「In other words, you had never came to an event where I participated even once. Isn't that correct?」



The young man was only thrown without any pain. The young man whose face was dyed bright red from shame and rage was rapidly approaching while swinging around his kitchen knife senselessly, but……the arms of Liliana who smoothly stepped close to the young man gripped his collar, at the same time, the young man was thrown down to look up to the sky without being able to offer any resistance.



「Most likely, you had watched me through television at home. And then, it caused you to hold an emotion that lead you until you are causing something like this. But, is that really something that you wished for?」



Irimi Nage(Stepping-in Throw)



Kote Gaeshi(Wrist Reversal)



Shihou Nage(Four Directions Throw)



Tenchi Nage(Heaven and Earth Throw)



Kokyuu Nage(Respiration Throw)



Kaiten Nage(Rotation Throw)



Liliana was talking about the situation while continuing to knock down the young man unharmed with her techniques at the center of the empty circle.



「Oi, Shia. Is that the "This is the bunnies' way y'know" you taught Lily?」



「Please don't mention the subtitle…… I don't really teach her anything. I taught her the basic of hand-to-hand fighting, and also the basic of Aikido more or less, but in the first place I'm not someone who is using that kind of flowing Aikido.」



「But, isn't that guy practically handled by bunnies there?」



「That's why please stop it with the bunnies, Hajime-san. That's something that Lily-san learned by herself. It seems she watched the technique in internet video and copied from that.」



「What's with that learning aikido through correspondence. Is that girl actually a hidden buggy character huh?」



「Isn't that right desu. She is already in the level where it might be dangerous for me if I don't use physical reinforcement in our bout. I tasted the terror of Aikido before this. Well, even so I don't really have the motivation to learn it though. As I thought, for a rabbit it has to be an impactful battle that made your blood boil and your flesh dance.」



「Just what kind of rabbit you are huh? Ah, you are a rabbit from another world.」



While Hajime and Shia were conversing about Liliana's hidden talent, a sobbing sound was starting to echo in the venue before one knew it.



When they looked at there, the aforementioned young man was crouching while raising a sad weeping voice. As for Liliana, there wasn't even a single crease on her frilly idol dress and her breathing also wasn't disordered at all.



The audiences were still petrified from admiration and shock. Shinji and Yoshiki were taking out Uma○bou from somewhere and turned completely into spectators. What happened with being a bodyguard?



Liliana approached the young man who was continuing to do nothing but crying in a posture that looked like half prostration. And then, she began to gently brush the young man's head.



「It's painful isn't it? It's so tiring, so much so that you cannot stand up anymore isn't it?」



It appeared that while Hajime and Shia were conversing, Liliana had gotten out the circumstance of the young man from him. And it seemed that Hajime and co had interest in the young man's circumstance and emotional state as much as they had interest with the darkened skid mark on the road that they completely failed to hear the story.



Feeling the sensation of the gentle brushing on his head, the young man raised his head in astonishment while crying. Liliana smiled gently to him. And then, she whispered something into his ear.



When the young man received those words, his face that got soppy from tears and snots became even more disheveled and he broke out crying loudly once more.



Liliana gently brushed the young man's head once more. She looked like a mother consoling her child.



It appeared that she succeeded in persuading the madly rampaging young man. A completely speechless air was flowing inside the astonished concert venue.



Hajime ran his gaze through the venue, before he suddenly started clapping. Of course, it was in order to prompt the praising toward Liliana who even though she was attacked, instead she admonished down the attacker. He did this because he didn't do anything, so in exchange he would at least give cover fire.



The scheme of Hajime who took the role of being a hired applauder splendidly struck home. At first there was only sparse applause, but gradually it was getting louder before at last grand applauses reverberated like thunder along with cheers.



Even though there wasn't any encore or anything, yet the venue was filled with repeated call of「LILY-! LILY-!」.



In the middle of that, Liliana who seemed to guess Hajime's intention sent a glance at expressed her thanks to him with her gaze. Right after that,



「……Oi, did you see?」



「……Nn. Her lips, for an instant, really it was only just for an instant but――it grinned.」



「It felt like she said『Just as planned』……don't tell me, this assault situation is planned? ……How terrifying.」



「No, Shia. There is no way, surely it's impossible to plan for that young man to be here. Everything from the persuasion and then Hajime's applauding act until the reaction of the fans, it isn't anything like 'just as planned'.」



「Shizuku-chan. As for me, rather than saying it's『just as planned』, I think it's more like『Ku-ku-, seizing the mentality of the mass is no trouble at all』. Remember, even at that time in the decisive battle she also said something like『Manipulating the mass is just too simple』.」



When Hajime and others returned their gaze to the scene while feeling slight shudder in their back, over there they saw the figure of Liliana responding to the applause of the fans while smiling gently like a holy mother and helping the young man to stand up.



What was truly terrifying was this most excellent queen who properly possessed both purity and impurity.



The beautiful girl that was a famous shoujo manga while also being an idol, she had suppressed an assailant right from the front using martial arts, and she didn't stop there, due to the dramatic development where she reformed the assailant, the fans in this place became delirious with passion and went wild with enthusiasm.



Surely this unexpected occurrence would become news at night today that would be broadcasted to the whole country. Like that, Liliana's fame would be going to a new height without knowing any place to stop.
